
rat 



4^ HJt^W^uNI wengewang.ora 



\ 



oo 



eft pj JC ^jJf^uNI wenqewanq.org 



Previously Published Wellek Library Lectures 



The Breaking of the Vessels 
Harold Bloom 

In the Tracks of Historical Materialism 
Perry Anderson 

Forms of Attention 
Frank Kermode 

Memoires for Paul de Man 
Jacques Derrida 

The Ethics of Reading 
J. Hillis Miller 

Peregrinations: Law, Form, Event 
Jean-Francois Lyotard 

Reopening of Closure: Organicism Against Itself 
Murray Krieger 

Musical Elaborations 
Edward W. Said 

Three Steps on the Ladder of Writing 
Helene Cixous 

Other Works by Fredric Jameson 

Sartre: The Origins of a Style 
Marxism and Form: Twentieth -Century Dialectical Theories of Literature 

The Prison-House of Language 
Fables of Aggression: Wyndham Lewis — The Modernist as Fascist 

The Political Unconscious 
The Ideologies ofTherory: Essays, 19JI-1986, 2 vols. 
Late Marxism: Adorno; or, The Persistence of the Dialectic 

Signatures of the Visible 
Postmodernism; or, The Cultural Logic of Late Capitalism 
The Geopolitical Aesthetic; or, Cinema and Space in the World System 



o 

Q 



The Wellek 
Library Lectures 
at the 
University of 
California, Irvine 



Fredric Jameson 



COLUMBIA UNIVERSITY PRESS 



x 
u 
tn 
cn 
S3 
tn 

H 

' u 
■S 

cc 
se w 

0 u 

*E 

W X 
Z u 



Copyright © 1994 Columbia University Press 
All rights reserved 

Library of Congress Cataloging-in- Publication Data 
Jameson, Fredric. 

The seeds of time / Fredric Jameson. 

p. cm. — (The Wellek Library lectures at the 
University of California, Irvine) 

Includes bibliographical references and index. 
ISBN 0-231-08058-1 PA ISBN 0-231-080J9-X 
1 . Postmodernism (Literature) 2 . Utopias 
in literature. 

I. Title. II. Series. 
PN98.P67J36 1994 

809'. 93372 — dc2o 94-873$ 

CIP 

@ 

Casebound editions of Columbia University Press books 
are printed on permanent and durable acid-free paper. 



Printed in the United States of America 
c 10987654321 

p 10 9876543 



Editorial Note 



The Wellek Library Lectures in Critical 
Theory are given annually at the University of 
California, Irvine, under the auspices of the 
Critical Theory Institute. The following 
lectures were given in April 1991 . 

The Critical Theory Institute 
John Carlos Rowe, Director 



Jor Wang Feng-zhen 

. . .for who can look into the seeds of time 
And say which grain will grow and which will not . . . 



Contents 



Introduction xi 

PART ONE The Antinomies of ' Postmodemity 1 

PART TWO Utopia, Modernism, and Death J3 

PART THREE The Constraints of Postmodernism 129 

Bibliography 20 J 

Index 211 

Photo Credits 215 



Introduction 



The three chapters in this book, which origi- 
nally took the form of lectures in the annual 
Wellek Library Lecture series at the University 
of California at Irvine in 1991, have a some- 
what deeper interrelationship, which their new 
title seeks to emphasize. Even after the "end 
of history," there has seemed to persist some 
historical curiosity of a generally systemic — 
rather than a merely anecdotal — kind: not 
merely to know what will happen next, but as 



lion xn 



a more general anxiety about the larger fate or destiny of our 
system or mode of production as such — about which individual 
experience (of a postmodern kind) tells us that it must be 
eternal, while our intelligence suggests this feeling to be most 
improbable indeed, without coming up with plausible scenar- 
ios as to its disintegration or replacement. It seems to be easier 
for us today to imagine the thoroughgoing deterioration of the 
earth and of nature than the breakdown of late capitalism; 
perhaps that is due to some weakness in our imaginations. 

I have come to think that the word postmodern ought to be 
reserved for thoughts of this kind. The term and its various 
substantives seem instead to have evolved into various partisan 
expressions of value, mostly turning on the affirmation or 
repudiation of this or that vision of pluralism. But these are 
arguments better conducted in concrete social terms (those of 
the various feminisms, or the new social movements, for 
example). Postmodernism as an ideology, however, is better 
grasped as a symptom of the deeper structural changes in our 
society and its culture as a whole — or in other words in the 
mode of production. 

Inasmuch as those changes still remain tendencies, however, 
and our analyses of actuality are governed by the selection of 
what we think will persist or develop, any attempt to say what 
postmodernism is can scarcely be separated from the even 
more problematic attempt to say where it is going — in short, 
to disengage its contradictions, to imagine its consequences 
(and the consequences of those consequences), and to conjec- 
ture the shape of its agents and institutions in some more fully 
developed maturity of what can now at best only be trends 
and currents. _4h^pojrtmfld£rjiisai^^ 

Ji LturtL. with an imperfect deck . Whether the analysis of the 
"current situation" has always amounted to this is an interesting 
question, one that I do not want to decide: perhaps the 
millenarian visions of modernism were somehow closer to the 
present of its visionaries than our visions today, about which 



xiii In t 



we are assured that whatever they are they are neither mille- 
narian nor Utopian. 

At any rate, each chapter of this book attempts a diagnosis 
of the cultural present with a view toward opening a perspec- 
tive onto a future they are clearly incapable of forecasting in 
any prophetic sense. But they do this on the basis of three 
relatively distinct methodological operations. The first chapter, 
on the antinomies of contemporary thought and ideology, 
ignores the discontinuities of separate opinions and positions 
and searches out crucial points at which even opposing posi- 
tions seem to share a common conceptual dilemma, which is 
nowhere brought to light and reflected on in its own terms. 
The working fiction here is therefore that a host of specific 
positions and texts (in themselves more or less coherent and 
self-contained) share an unrepresentable ground that can only 
be conveyed as a mass of logical paradoxes and unresolvable 
conceptual paralogisms. These cannot, of course, be "solved" 
from any higher perspective, and I imagine that there exist 
many more of the antinomies than those enumerated here (or 
at least that they come in many more realizations, which a 
logician might, to be sure, reduce to some simpler primal 
form). What it seemed to me useful to do, in an ambitious 
idea that here remains the merest sketch, is to suggest an 
outside and an unrepresentable exterior to many of the issues 
that seem most crucial in contemporary (that is to say, post- 
modern) debate. The future lies entangled in that unrepresent- 
able outside like so many linked genetic messages. This chap- 
ter, then, is an experiment at giving a certain representation 
to the way in which contradiction works, so that it might be 
called dialectical on one use of that term, even though what it 
sets out from is a stalled or arrested dialectic. 

To the same degree, the final chapter might be character- 
ized in some very general sense as structural, since unlike the 
first chapter it posits a very rigid notion of closure, in the form 
of Greimas's semiotic rectangle, with the its finite number 



ction 



xiv 



of conceptual combinations and possibilities. This semiotic 
technology is now used to prospect and explore, not ideologi- 
cal variety, as in the first chapter, but aesthetic multiplicity 
and "pluralism." Indeed, it springs from a certain exasperation 
with myself and with others, who have so frequently expressed 
their enthusiasm with the boundless and ungovernable richness 
of modern artistic — in this case architectural — forms and 
styles, which, freed from the telos of modern, are now "law- 
less" in any number of novel and invigorating or enabling ways 
(which one had better not call "new" or original, since it was 
the very release from that old modernist taboo of Newness 
that, like a magic wand, freed the postmodern to its unimagin- 
able contemporary flourishing). In my own case it was the 
conception of "style" — very familiar to me from a previous 
period — that prevented me for so long from shaking off this 
impression of illimitable pluralism; but it did so negatively, 
working through the conviction that personal style as such was 
no longer possible after the regime of the individual centered 
subject, while the reduction of an entire period to some 
generalizable period style such as the baroque or the gothic 
seemed not merely intolerably idealist but also undialectical; it 
failed to take account of the role henceforth played in contem- 
porary or postmodern production by the sheer fact of the 
historicist persistence of all the previous period and world 
styles well into our own present, which now surcharged those 
in well-nigh mediatic fashion. The postmodern, in other 
words, was also constitutively defined by its inclusion of all 
possible styles and thereby its own incapacity to be globally 
characterized, from the outside, by any specific style as such: 
its resistance in other words to aesthetic or stylistic totalization 
(and it is this aesthetic resistance that is probably always 
meant when polemics are incorrectly waged against political 
or philosophical totalization). 

I then overestimated the variety of actually existing post- 
modern "styles" and seemed to have forgotten the fundamental 



xv In 



structuralist lesson that a totality is a combination or permuta- 
tion scheme, endowed with a closure of its own no matter 
how ineffably fluid and dynamic its processes may be: which is 
to say that any attempt to conceptualize such processes: — in 
chaos or catastrophe theory, for example — can do so only by 
endowing them with a representation that is itself a mode of 
closure. But there is a fundamental difference between the 
closure of the situation and the closure of the responses to it: 
the latter is alone idealistic, since it posits a structural limit in 
the response, the act or work or style, rather than in the 
material situation itself. I was looking for that limit in the 
architectural works themselves (had it been possible to find it, 
as it is in certain historical periods, the formal limit would 
have taken the form of a specific period style). In reality, 
however, the structural limit is to be found in the situation or 
dilemma to which the individual architects and their specific 
and unique projects all have to respond in some way or 
another. 

Anyone who thinks my account is somehow offensive and 
insulting to the architects themselves, all artists of a rare talent 
whom I admire greatly, has not understood that creativity lies 
in the response rather than in the initial givens and raw 
materials of the situation itself. And the error about freedom 
and indeterminacy that forms the philosophical and metaphysi- 
cal accompaniment to such discussions is of a similar kind: it 
attributes some old-fashioned deterministic causality to a map- 
ping of structural limits for which causality must rather be 
redefined as the conditions of possibility. Like Gide's Lafcadio, 
nobody wants to be predictable and fully known in advance 
(and they think God, "totalization," or determinism tend to do 
that, to have you predestined down to the smallest misguided 
effort at sham creativity or the vain exercise of a spurious free 
will). The doctrine of limits goes very far indeed, deep into 
the individual psyche and its structural formation as a kind of 
inner situation within which a reduced kind of individual 



duction xvi 

o 

Is 

c 
~s 

freedom is required to operate. It does not dispel or erase 
agency altogether — rather, it makes the specification of such 
agency alone possible. 

My little chart of the closure of the architectural postmod- 
ernisms — itself nothing more than a sketch, as in the first 
chapter — does not try to forecast the future by projecting it as 
what will overcome these oppositions (or be neutralized and 
paralyzed by them). Rather, it is inspired by Hegel's old idea 
that when we identify a boundary or a limit (Kant's block, in 
his case), we nonetheless modify that limited situation, that 
situation or experience of absolute limits, ever so slightly by 
drawing the situation as a whole inside itself and making the 
limit now part of what it had hitherto limited, and thereby 
subject to modification in its own turn. But this vague aim or 
ambition is then at one with the limits of structuralism as well, 
whose precisions always began to run off into the blurred and 
the watery when it came to the moment of truth or decision, 
and the prospect of a certain praxis. 

My remaining chapter, then, the second one, which stands 
out like a sore thumb from these other, postmodern discus- 
sions no less than from the order of my commentary here, is 
probably best characterized formally in more Freudian or 
depth-psychological terms, as a matter of repression and nega- 
tion, even sublimation, and probably of mourning as well. For 
here we confront what has vanished from the postmodern 
scene, in every but a literal sense (since it was very precisely 
during the sway of a tendentially global postmodern culture, 
in the 1980s, that this fundamental text of Platonov, along 
with others, was rediscovered and printed for the first time). 

Here, then, we have to do with what must now be called 
Second World culture, an emergent socialist culture whose 
development, in its Eastern or Slavic form, has been cut 
short. I would want to argue — at least this second chapter 
presupposes such an argument — not only that there was a 
specific Second World culture, whose originality was defined 



xvii In 



in part by its distance from commodity fetishism, but also that 
what has in the West been called dissidence was largely part 
of that as well, as witness Solzhenitsyn's rage at finding that 
Vermont, noncommunist although it may have been, was as 
corrupt and Western, as capitalist, as any Slavophile or Soviet 
communist might have always predicted it would turn out to 
be. Dissidence is thus a Second World form of intellectual life, 
and the anticommunist opinions of its aesthetic practitioners 
no more make them over into First World writers and artists 
than the opposition to the State over here makes us nonbour- 
geois. 

I say this because, although in my view Platonov's Utopia is 
nonironic, the grisly pictures and visions it yields might well 
be taken as ironic by readers unforewarned, and might be 
supposed to be arguments against communism rather than 
expressions of the experience of it. I want to argue, in other 
words, that the very violence of Chevengur, for some of us 
almost intolerable, is the very price to be paid for the authen- 
ticity of its Utopian impulse (as that produces its text in waves 
of new, ever self-canceling figuration): the price for what 
rescues Utopia from the edulcoration of its status in the West. 
But it is all of this that must be worked through in detail — all 
the raw dust and savagery of the Utopian vision and the half- 
baked simple-mindedness of its village citizens — in order for 
us to grasp once more what is omitted from the postmodern 
worldview, or better still, what had to have been repressed 
from it with some new violence in its own right, for that 
"worldview" (which is of course not really a worldview in the 
older sense but rather a positivist and technocratic cancellation 
of all of those) to come into being in the first place. This 
chapter, then, serves as something of a slow movement for the 
others, and sets in place some echoes of a past whose structural 
absence must also presumably define our future to come al- 
most better than some of the most obvious components of our 
present. 



duction xviii 

o 

■w 

The inscription of the name of an old friend, in thanks for 
his intellectual and social hospitality, will also define these 
pages with yet another kind of limit, and juxtapose a global 
(but still Western) postmodernity with the immense hetero- 
topia of China itself. 

Killingworth, Connecticut 




The Antinomies oj Vostmodernity 



o 

i— 

Q_ 



It is conventional to distinguish an antinomy 
from a contradiction, not least because folk 
wisdom implies that the latter is susceptible of 
a solution or a resolution, whereas the former 
is not. In that sense, the antinomy is a cleaner 
form of language than the contradiction. With 
it, you know where you stand; it states two 
propositions that are radically, indeed abso- 
lutely, incompatible, take it or leave it. 
Whereas the contradiction is a matter of par- 



Postmodernity 2 



tialities and aspects; only some of it is incompatible with the 
accompanying proposition; indeed, it may have more to do 
with forces, or the state of things, than with words or logical 
implications. Contradictions are supposed, in the long run, to 
be productive; whereas antinomies — take Kant's classic one: 
the world has a beginning, the world has no beginning — offer 
nothing in the way of a handle, no matter how diligently you 
turn them around and around. 

All of which probably implies that the contradiction is a 
singular substance, about which several different, seemingly 
contradictory, things get said; a little sweat and ingenuity then 
suffices to show that the two contradictory things are somehow 
related, or the same — the one implied by the other, or follow- 
ing from it in some unsuspected way. In that case, it is the 
situation that accounts for the disparity, in its very incom- 
pleteness generating the multiple perspectives that make us 
think the matter at hand is now x, or y; or better still, x-like 
and j-like all at the same time. Whereas the antinomy is 
clearly and unequivocally two separate things: y or x; and that 
in such a way that the question of a situation or a context fades 
away altogether. 

The age is clearly enough more propitious for the antinomy 
than the contradiction. Even in Marxism itself, the latter 's 
spiritual homeland, the most advanced tendencies have nagged 
and worried at the contradiction, as at some last inexpungeable 
remnant of idealism capable of reinfecting the system in some 
fatally old-fashioned way (like vapors or brain fever). Thus the 
most brilliant of all Marx's commentators, Lucio Coletti, 
began to play Kant off against the dialectic, and to persuade 
himself (and us) that contradictions were not in nature, since 
there all phenomena are positive. I think he was wrong about 
this, as far as Kant was concerned, since in Kant it is precisely 
only "in nature" (or rather, in what he calls the "real in 
appearance") that oppositions do exist; in fact, the critical 



3 The Antinomies 



position with which Coletti began to flirt here is called positiv- 
ism, and it led him out of Marxism altogether. (There can be 
no doubt, however, that the return to Kant, today, has gener- 
ally had the value of an antidialectical move.) 

A still greater and more influential Marxian theorist, Louis 
Althusser, seems to have conceived of his mission as a reso- 
lutely modernizing (or postmodernizing) one; as the intent to 
cleanse Marxism of all its Hegelian — which is to say Germanic 
and idealist — baggage. He went so far as to cast doubt on the 
concept of mediation (which might, indeed, in a pinch be 
substituted by that of transcoding), but one has it on good 
evidence that he meant to forge ahead and ultimately to 
stigmatize and exorcize the very notion of contradiction itself: 
something he in fact inspired his more distant anti-Marxist 
followers Hindess and Hirst to go on and do. Their example 
makes one wonder whether any other way of doing it could 
have left Marxism as such intact either. 

If these were the most advanced trends at work within 
Marxism, what was going on outside it need perhaps not be 
imagined. Equivalents of the general notion of contradiction 
persisted in the various psychoanalyses; structuralism itself — 
even while Levi-Strauss continued to emphasize the impor- 
tance for him of both the Marxist and the Freudian conceptions 
of contradiction — tended rather, along with emergent semiot- 
ics, to reinforce the slippage of the category of contradiction 
toward the more logical one of the antinomy. But the currency 
of this second term (itself equally of no interest to the prevail- 
ing forms of positivism) we seem to owe primarily to decon- 
struction, where it became, particularly in the hands of Paul 
de Man, an instrument for showing up everything that was 
self-conflicted about a thought and its language at the same 
time that its essential paralysis and nonproductivity was fore- 
grounded in a kind of conceptual freeze-frame. Something of a 
return toward the contradiction, however, seems on the 



Postmodernity 4 



agenda today, in Hegelian Lacanianism, where Slavoj Zizek's 
notion of the "symptom" proposes a rethinking of both Freud 
and Marx. 

My own feeling has been that, rather than positing a situa- 
tion in which we have to choose between these two categories 
(contradiction standing for the modernist option perhaps, 
while antinomy offers a more postmodern one), it might be 
worthwhile using them both concurrently and against one 
other, insofar as each is uniquely equipped to problematize the 
other in its most vital implications. The pair do not themselves 
form an opposition, exactly (although it would be an amusing 
logical exercise to pretend they do, and to try to decide 
whether their difference amounts to an antinomy or is itself 
merely one more contradiction); rather, they stand as each 
other's bad conscience, and as a breath of suspicion that clings 
to the concept itself. To wonder whether an antinomy is 
not really a contradiction in disguise; to harbor the nag- 
ging thought that what we took to be a contradiction was 
really little more than an antinomy — these pointed reciprocal 
doubts can do the mind no harm and may even do it some 
good. 

That being said, I will organize my symptomatology accord- 
ingly, and operate as though an antinomy were a symptom of a 
contradiction: this may presuppose a multidimensional model 
or image, as well as the notion that our own age — that of 
technocratic positivism and experiential nominalism — is one- 
or two-dimensional by choice just as much as by historical 
development. So it is that depth forms (if any exist, like 
prehistoric monsters) tend to be projected up upon the surface 
in the anamorphic flatness of a scarcely recognizable afterim- 
age, lighting up on the board in the form of a logical paradox 
or a textual paralogism. We have to swim in both these worlds 
at once; learn to work the remote -control glove within the 
contamination chamber; posit a noumenal shadow world of 
seismographic movements and shoulderings that inscribes itself 



S The Antinomies 



with grotesque delicacy as minute and pencil-thin lines on the 
graph. 

These figures suggest that the deeper problem with the 
concept of contradiction — a problem that cannot be resolved 
and that has no equivalent in anything surrounding the concept 
of the antinomy — is representational. Contradiction is always 
one step before representation: if you show it in its conflicted 
moment, you freeze it over so rigidly that it tends to take on 
the form of the antinomy. If on the contrary you anticipate its 
resolution, you empty it of all its negativity and generate the 
impression of a rigged ballot, a put-up job, a sham conflict 
whose outcome has already carefully been arranged in advance. 
Or, if you prefer, the sheer fact of having each foot in a 
different irreconcilable world — Antigone versus Creon — 
means that a representation that wants to remain true to those 
distinct worlds and their laws can only show its credentials 
and document its authenticity by failing to provide some third 
representational language in which they both seem falsely 
reconciled. This situation means, however, that the philosophi- 
cal languages in which contradiction is accounted for will 
always be deficient and arouse a properly philosophical dissatis- 
faction: even Hegel's grand architectonic stages tend to fall on 
one side or another of the central tension, and seem to 
intensify into pictures of a dramatic or historical, essentially 
narrative scene on the one hand, or else to thin out into those 
formal abstractions of identity and difference that are finally 
the domain of the antinomy rather than of the contradiction 
itself. 

Such tendencies are everywhere in contemporary thought, 
and they can be explained as the results and consequences of 
the latter 's fundamental trends, which I have characterized as 
positivism and nominalism (leaving aside the interesting matter 
of the relationship between these two things, which can be 
thought of as objective and subjective respectively, as the 
realms of the system and of the subject). This "explanation" is, 



Postmodernity 



6 



of course, one always wants to hasten to add, in current 
language, only one of the narratives we can tell about the 
current situation. But it is a good story, which can be foreshad- 
owed by way of Adolf Loos's notorious attack on ornament 
in architecture and design, in which such figuration was assimi- 
lated to crime and the antisocial on the one hand, and degener- 
acy (still a popular concept in that period) on the other. After 
positivism and pragmatism, indeed, abstraction itself comes to 
be thought of as something like ornament: superfluous and 
unpractical, self-indulgent, "speculative" and metaphysical, the 
signs and indices of a slovenly and sinful leisure and privilege. 
Getting rid of the old names, of all those abstractions that still 
reek of universalism or generality, cleaving with even greater 
determination to the empirical and the actual, stigmatizing the 
residual as philosophical in the bad sense, which is to say as 
sheer idealism, without thereby lapsing into a materialism 
equally occult and metaphysical — these are the postmodern 
watchwords, which were once a guide to a kind of Wittgen- 
steinian witch-hunt in the name of the health and purity of the 
language, but now circulate through the economy as effort- 
lessly as the deliveries at your corner supermarket. 

It is a reduction that can presumably not succeed; but its 
current hegemony not only means that much of what charac- 
terized classical philosophy must disappear but also that there 
can remain very little, in the way. of the syncategoremic 
abstraction, to bind together the disparate words and syllables 
of a nominalistic and fragmented set of perceptions. This is the 
situation and the crisis from which two large and crude sorting 
systems tend to reemerge, from archaic time, like the return 
of the repressed. They are the grandest and most empty of all 
abstractions whose earliest (Western) avatar can be witnessed 
in formation in the primal indistinctions of the first forms of 
secular thought in the pre-Socratics: the categories of Identity 
and Difference (which Kant and Hegel knew as concepts or 
categories of reflexion), the most formal of all, which now 



7 The Antinom 



survive to constitute the last extant evolutionary conceptual 
species, insofar as they have the advantage of seeming to 
offer virtually no content in their own right, no smuggled 
philosophical contraband, as neutral and value-free as technol- 
ogy or the market. 

These are nondialectical categories, and you would have to 
bend them out of shape with some violence to appropriate 
them for Hegel's "identity of identity and non-identity." Iden- 
tity and Difference are, rather, the realm and the domain of 
the antinomy as such: something they readily offer to demon- 
strate by effortlessly turning into one another at the slightest 
pretext. Rather than as dialectical, even as an arrested or 
paralyzed dialectic, it might be better to characterize them in 
terms of a kind of reversal of Freud's (modernist) conception 
of the "antithetical sense of primal words," which drew our 
attention to the way in which, etymologically X-rayed, a single 
term proved to carry within itself, along with its primordial 
meaning, the latter's negation or opposite (most famously, 
heimlich, what is most familiar and homely, also turns out to 
mean the same thing as unheimlich, what is most uncanny, 
weird and strange). Here, on the contrary, as for example in 
that specific postmodern antinomy whereby what is anti-Uto- 
pian turns out to be Utopian in its most fundamental signifi- 
cance, it is (as we shall see) the antitheses that turn out to be, 
somehow, "the same." Paradoxes of this kind are not, how- 
ever, in postmodern discourse, the telltale scandals or anoma- 
lies (the failure of a star to correspond infinitestimally to its 
predicted trajectory) that used to incite to the rethinking of 
the paradigm as a whole. Here, rather, they provide the bread- 
and-butter concepts of all of so-called contemporary theory 
(or theoretical discourse), and offer training in state-of-the-art 
mental gymnastics not unrelated to the verbal games and 
logical tricks rehearsed by the sophists (as Lyotard has pointed 
out). 

In what follows, however, we will collect a few of these 



Postmodernity 8 



paradoxes for examination as symptoms rather than as occa- 
sions for demonstrating something about the structural inca- 
pacity of the mind itself, or of its languages. This will take the 
form of brief evocations of four distinct postmodern antino- 
mies, about which one is of course free to wonder whether 
they are not all fundamentally the same thing, a possibility to 
which we will return in the conclusion to this chapter. The 
first two antinomies concern Kant's "a priori representations," 
namely time and space, which we have generally come to 
think of in historical terms as implicit formal frames that 
nonetheless vary according to the mode of production. We 
may presumably, then, learn something about our own mode 
of production from the ways in which we tend to think of 
change and permanence, or variety and homogeneity — ways 
that prove to have as much to do with space as with time. 

The second pair of antinomies would seem to have more to 
do with the spatial ways in which we fantasize the possibility 
of the transformation of our system as a whole. The third 
antinomy, indeed, raises the issue of naturalism in the strict 
sense, of nature and human nature, or of the absence of such 
limits and constraints; while the final one, as I promised, takes 
up the matter of Utopia (as a goal of all change) and of its 
many contemporary critics and enemies who try today even 
more enthusiastically than in earlier periods to persuade us to 
agree that this is indeed the best of all possible worlds. 

I 

But time is today a function of speed, and evidently percepti- 
ble only in terms of its rate, or velocity as such: as though the 
old Bergsonian opposition between measurement and life, 
clock time and lived time, had dropped out, along with that 
virtual eternity or slow permanence without which Valery 
thought the very idea of a work as such was likely to die out 
(something he seems to have been confirmed in thinking). 



9 The Antinomies 



What emerges then is some conception of change without its 
opposite: and to say so is then helplessly to witness our first 
two antinomies folding back into each other, since from the 
vantage point of change it becomes impossible to distinguish 
space from time, or object from subject. The eclipse of inner 
time (and its organ, the "intimate" time sense) means that we 
read our subjectivity off the things outside: Proust's old hotel 
rooms, like old retainers, respectfully reminded him every 
morning how old he was, and whether he was on vacation or 
"at home," and where — that is to say, they told him his name 
and issued him an identity, like a visiting card on a silver 
salver. As for habit, memory, recognition, material things do 
that for us (the way the servants were supposed to do our 
living, according to Villiers de ITsle Adam). Subjectivity is an 
objective matter, and it is enough to change the scenery and 
the setting, refurnish the rooms, or destroy them in an aerial 
bombardment for a new subject, a new identity, miraculously 
to appear on the ruins of the old. 

The end of the subject-object dualism, however — for which 
so many ideologues have yearned for so long — carries with it 
hidden retroparadoxes, like concealed explosives: Virilio's, for 
example, which shows how the seeming speed of the outside 
world is itself a function of the demands of representation. 
Not, perhaps, the result of some new subjective idea of veloc- 
ity that projects itself onto an inert exterior, as in stereotypes 
of classical idealism, but rather technology versus nature. The 
apparatus — and very specifically the photographic and filmic 
one — makes its own demands on reality, which, as in the Gulf 
War, reality then scrambles to fulfill (like a time-lapse photo 
in which the photographer himself can be seen breathlessly 
sliding into place at the end of the row of already posing 
faces): "[T]he disappearance of the proximity effect in the 
prosthesis of accelerated travel made it necessary to create a 
wholly simulated appearance that would restore three-dimen- 
sionality to the message in full. Now a holographic prosthesis 



Postmodernity 10 



of the military commander's inertia was to be communicated 
to the viewer, extending his look in time and space by means 
of constant flashes, here and there, today and yesterday . 
Already evident in the flashback and then in feedback, this 
miniaturization of chronological meaning was the direct result 
of a military technology in which events always unfolded in 
theoretical time" (Virilio, J9~ 6 °)- 

Such a "return of the repressed" (an old-fashioned, now 
relatively metaphorical name for it to be sure) means that 
eliminating the subject does not leave us with the object wie es 
eigenthch gewesen, but rather with a multiplicity of simulacra. 
Virilio' s point, like that of so many others today, is that it is 
the cinema that is the truly decentered subject, perhaps indeed 
the only one: the Deleuzian schizo being only a confused and 
contradictory idea alongside this apparatus that absorbs the 
former subject-object pole triumphantly into itself. But it 
raises the embarrassing secondary question of whether, in that 
case, there ever was a (centered) subject to begin with: did 
we ever have to wait? Is boredom a figment of the imagination 
along with its cousin eternity? Was there a time when things 
did not seem to change? What did we do before machines? All 
flesh is grass: and life in the ancient polls strikes us as being 
more fragile and ephemeral than anything in the modern city, 
even though we ought to be able to remember how many 
changes this last has undergone. It is as though an illusion of 
slower permanence accompanies the lived present like an 
optical projection, masking a change that only becomes visible 
when it falls outside the temporal frame. 

But to put it this way is to measure a gap and to assure 
ourselves of everything that is radically different from the 
modernist form-projects and the modernist "time-senses" in 
the postmodern dispensation, where the formerly classical has 
itself been unmasked as sheer fashion, albeit the fashion of a 
slower, vaster world that took ages to cross by caravan or 
caravel, and through whose thickened time, as through a 



11 



The Antinomies 



viscous element, items descended so slowly as to acquire a 
patina that seemed to transform their contingencies into the 
necessities of a meaningful tradition. For a world population, 
the languages of Periclean Athens can no longer be any more 
normative than that of other tribal styles (although it is very 
easy to imagine a cultural United Nations Security Council 
operation in which the "great civilizations" pooled their various 
classical traditions with a view toward imposing some more 
generally "human" classical canon): time thereby also becomes 
multicultural, and the hitherto airtight realms of demography 
and of industrial momentum begin to seep into each other, as 
though there were some analogies between great crowds of 
people and dizzying rates of speed. Both then spell the end of 
the modern in some renewed and paradoxical conjunction, as 
when the new styles seem exhausted by virtue of their very 
proliferation, while their bearers, the individual creators, 
prophets, geniuses, and seers, suddenly find themselves un- 
wanted owing to sheer population density (if not the realiza- 
tion of the democratic ethos as such). 

That the new absolute temporality has everything to do 
with the urban my references have suggested, without under- 
scoring the requirement in that case of revising traditional 
notions of the urban as such, in order to accommodate its 
postnaturality to technologies of communication as well as of 
production and to mark the decentered, well-nigh global, scale 
on which what used to be the city is deployed. The modern 
still had something to do with the arrogance of city people 
over against the provincials, whether this was a provinciality 
of peasants, other and colonized cultures, or simply the pre- 
capitalist past itself: that deeper satisfaction of being "absolument 
moderne" is dissipated when modern technologies are every- 
where, there are no longer any provinces, and even the past 
comes to seem like an alternate world, rather than an imper- 
fect, privative stage of this one. Meanwhile, those "modern" 
city dwellers or metropolitans of earlier decades themselves 



Postmodernity 12 



came from the country or at least could still register the 
coexistence of uneven worlds; they could measure change 
in ways that become impossible once modernization is even 
relatively completed (and no longer some isolated, unnatural, 
and unnerving process that stands out to the naked eye). It is 
an unevenness and a coexistence that can also be registered in 
a sense of loss, as with the slow partial changes and demoli- 
tions of Baudelaire's Paris, which almost literally serve as the 
objective correlative of his experience of passing time: in 
Proust all this, although apparently more intensely elegiac (and 
in any case surcharging the text of Baudelaire itself), has 
already been subjectivized, as though it were the self and its 
past that were regretted and not its houses (but Proust's 
language knows better: "la murailk de l'escalier, ou je vis monter 
le reflet de sa bougie, n'existe plus depuis longtemps" [I, 36], as does 
his spatial plot construction). Today the very meaning of 
demolition as such has been modified, along with that of 
building: it has become a generalized postnatural process that 
calls into question the very concept of change itself and the 
inherited notion of time that accompanied it. 

These paradoxes are perhaps easier to dramatize in the 
philosophical and critical realm, than in the aesthetic one, let 
alone in urbanism as such. For demolition has surely defined 
the modern intellectual's vocation ever since the ancien regime 
tended to identify its mission with . critique and opposition 
to established institutions and ideas: what better figure to 
characterize the strong form of the cultural intellectual from 
the Enlightenment philosophies all the way to Sartre (who has 
been called the last of the classical intellectuals), if not beyond? 
It is a figure that has seemed to presuppose an omnipresence 
of Error, variously defined as superstition, mystification, igno- 
rance, class ideology, and philosophical idealism (or "meta- 
physics"), in such a way that to remove it by way of the 
operations of demystification leaves a space in which therapeu- 
tic anxiety goes hand in hand with heightened self-conscious- 



13 The Antinomies 



ness and reflexivity in a variety of senses, if not, indeed, with 
Truth as such. By attempting to restore, alongside this negative 
tradition, the intellectual's older mission of the restoration of 
meaning, Ricoeur sharply dramatized everything the various 
strands of what he called "the hermeneutics of suspicion" had 
in common, from the Enlightenment and its relationship to 
religion all the way to the deconstructive relation to "Western 
metaphysics," emphasizing above all the three great formative 
moments of Marx, Nietzsche, and Freud, to which even post- 
modern intellectuals still owe joint allegiance in one form or 
another. 

What has changed is then perhaps the character of the 
terrain in which these operations are carried out: just as the 
transitional period between aristocratic and clerical, ancien- 
regime societies and mass-democratic industrial capitalist ones 
has been must longer and slower than we tend to believe 
(Arno Mayer suggests that significant remnants of the former 
survived in Europe until the end of World War II), so also the 
objective role of intellectuals to implement modernization's 
cultural revolution long remained a progressive one. But the 
process itself has often tended to impress observers and partici- 
pants alike by its self-perpetuating and indeed self-devouring 
energies. It is not only the Revolution that eats its own 
children; any number of visions of pure negativity as such, 
from Hegel's account of freedom and the Terror to the Frank- 
furt School's grim theory of the "dialectic of enlightenment" as 
an infernal machine, bent on extirpating all traces of transcen- 
dence (including critique and negativity itself). 

Such visions seem even more relevant for one-dimensional 
societies like our own, from which the residual, in the forms 
of habits and practices of older modes of production, has 
been tendentially eliminated, so that it might be possible to 
hypothesize a modification or displacement in the very func- 
tion of ideology-critique itself. This is at least the position of 
Manfredo Tafuri, who offers a kind of functionalist analysis of 



Postmodernity 14 



the avant-garde intellectual, whose "anti-institutional phase" 
essentially involved "the criticism of outworn values" (70). The 
very success of such a mission, however, coterminous with the 
modernizing struggles of capital itself, "serves to prepare a 
clean-swept platform from which to depart in discovery of the 
new 'historic tasks' of intellectual work" (70). Not surpris- 
ingly, Tafuri identifies these new "modernizing" tasks with 
rationalization as such: "what the ideologies of the avant- 
garde introduced as a proposal for social behavior was the 
transformation of traditional ideology into Utopia, as a pre- 
figuration of an abstract final moment of development coinci- 
dent with a global rationalization, with a positive realization 
of the dialectic" (62); Tafuri's formulations become less cryptic 
when one understands that for him Keynesianism is to be 
understood as a planification, a rationalization, of the future as 
such. 

Thus seen, demystification in the contemporary period has 
its own secret "ruse of history," its own inner function and 
concealed world-historical mission; namely, by destroying tra- 
ditional societies (not merely the Church and the old aristocra- 
cies but above all the peasants and their modes of agricultural 
production, their common lands, and their villages), to sweep 
the globe clean for the manipulations of the great corpora- 
tions: to prepare a purely fungible present in which space 
and psyches alike can be processed and remade at will, with 
a "flexibility" with which the creativity of the ideologues 
busy coining glowing new adjectives to describe the potentiali- 
ties of "post-Fordism" can scarcely keep up. Demolition, under 
these circumstances, begins to take on new and ominously 
urbanistic overtones, and to connote the speculations of the 
developers far more than the older heroic struggles of opposi- 
tional intellectuals; while just such objections to and critiques 
of demolition itself are relegated to a tiresome moralizing 
and undermine themselves by virtue of their vivid dramatiza- 
tion of outmoded mentalities that are better off being demol- 



15 The Antinomies 



ished anyhow ("denn alles, was entsteht, / 1st wert, dass es zugrunde 
geht'). 

These are now media paradoxes, which result from the 
speed and tempo of the critical process, as well as the way in 
which all ideological and philosophical positions as such have 
in the media universe been transformed into their own "repre- 
sentations" (as Kant might put it) — in other words into images 
of themselves and caricatures in which identifiable slogans 
substitute for traditional beliefs (the beliefs having indeed been 
forced to transform themselves into just such recognizable 
ideological positions in order to operate in the media market- 
place). This is the situation in which it is easier to grasp the 
progressive value of conservative or residual modes of resis- 
tance to the new thing than to evaluate the range of ostensibly 
left-liberal positions (which, as in Tafuri's model, often func- 
tionally prove to be indistinguishable from the structural re- 
quirements of the system itself). The diagnosis also projects 
the mirage of some possible sound barrier, like a telltale line 
blurring away against the sky; and indeed the obvious question 
of how much speed the human organism can bear may play its 
part in the naturalist revivals that will be mentioned later on, 
in the third section of this chapter; while the new fact itself 
does seem to offer a fleeting but vivid dramatization of Eng- 
els's old law about the transformation of quantity into quality 
(or at least of that "law" 's afterimage). 

In this form, the paradox from which we must set forth is 
the equivalence between an unparalleled rate of change on all 
the levels of social life and an unparalleled standardization of 
everything — feelings along with consumer goods, language 
along with built space — that would seem incompatible with 
just such mutability. It is a paradox that can still be conceptual- 
ized, but in inverse ratios: that of modularity, for example, 
where intensified change is enabled by standardization it- 
self, where prefabricated modules, everywhere from the media 
to a henceforth standardized private life, from commodified 



Postmodernity 16 



nature to uniformity of equipment, allow miraculous rebuild- 
ings to succeed each other at will, as in fractal video. The 
module would then constitute the new form of the object (the 
new result of reification) in an informational universe: that 
Kantian point in which raw material is suddenly organized by 
categories into an appropriate unit. 

But the paradox can also incite us to rethink our conception 
of change itself. If absolute change in our society is best 
represented by the rapid turnover in storefronts, prompting 
the philosophical question as to what has really changed when 
video stores are replaced by T-shirt shops, then Barthes's 
structural formulation comes to have much to recommend it, 
namely, that it is crucial to distinguish between rhythms of 
change inherent to the system and programmed by it, and a 
change that replaces one entire system by another one alto- 
gether. But that is a point of view that revives paradoxes of 
Zeno's sort, which derive from the Parmenidean conception 
of Being itself, which, as it is by definition, cannot be thought 
of as even momentarily becoming, let alone failing to be for 
the slightest instant. 

The "solution" to this particular paradox lies of course in 
the realization (strongly insisted on by Althusser and his disci- 
ples) that each system— better still, each "mode of produc- 
tion" — produces a temporality that is specific to it: it is only if 
we adopt a Kantian and ahistorical view of time as some 
absolute and empty category that the peculiarly repetitive 
temporality of our own system can become an object of 
puzzlement and lead to the reformulation of these old logical 
and ontological paradoxes. 

Yet it may not be without its therapeutic effects to continue 
for one long moment to be mesmerized by the vision attrib- 
uted to Parmenides, which however little it holds for nature 
might well be thought to capture a certain truth of our social 
and historical moment: a gleaming science-fictional stasis in 
which appearances (simulacra) arise and decay ceaselessly, 



17 The Antinomies 



without the momentous stasis of everything that is flickering 

for the briefest of instants or even momentarily wavering in its o 

ontological prestige. 5 

Here, it is as if the logic of fashion had, accompanying the 2 
multifarious penetration of its omnipresent images, begun to ^ 
bind and identify itself with the social and psychic fabric in 
some ultimately inextricable way, which tends to make it over 
into the very logic of our system as a whole. The experience 
and the value of perpetual change thereby comes to govern 
language and feelings, fully as much as the buildings and the 
garments of this particular society, to the point at which 
even the relative meaning allowed by uneven development (or 
"nonsynchronous synchronicity") is no longer comprehensible, 
and the supreme value of the New and of innovation, as both 
modernism and modernization grasped it, fades away against a 
steady stream of momentum and variation that at some outer 
limit seems stable and motionless. 

What then dawns is the realization that no society has ever 
been so standardized as this one, and that the stream of human, 
social, and historical temporality has never flowed quite so 
homogeneously. Even the great boredom or ennui of classical 
modernism required some vantage point or fantasy subject 
position outside the system; yet our seasons are of the 
post-natural and postastronomical television or media variety, 
triumphantly artificial by way of the power of their National 
Geographic or Weather Channel images: so that their great 
rotations — in sports, new model cars, fashion, television, the 
school year or rentree, etc. — simulate formerly natural rhythms 
for commercial convenience and reinvent such archaic catego- 
ries as the week, the month, the year imperceptibly, without 
any of the freshness and violence of, say, the innovations of 
the French revolutionary calendar. 

What we now begin to feel, therefore — and what begins to 
emerge as some deeper and more fundamental constitution of 
postmodernity itself, at least in its temporal dimension — is 



Postmodernity 18 



that henceforth, where everything now submits to the perpet- 
ual change of fashion and media image, nothing can change any 
longer. This is the sense of the revival of that "end of History" 
Alexandre Kojeve thought he could find in Hegel and Marx, 
and which he took to mean some ultimate achievement of 
democratic equality (and the value equivalence of individual 
economic and juridical subjects) in both American capitalism 
and Soviet communism, only later identifying a significant 
variant of it in what he called Japanese "snobisme, " but that we 
can today identify as postmodernity itself (the free play of 
masks and roles without content or substance). In another 
sense, of course, this is simply the old "end of ideology" with 
a vengeance, and cynically plays on the waning of collective 
hope in a particularly conservative market climate. But the end 
of History is also the final form of the temporal paradoxes we 
have tried to dramatize here: namely that a rhetoric of absolute 
change (or "permanent revolution" in some trendy and mere- 
tricious new sense) is, for the postmodern, no more satisfac- 
tory (but not less so) than the language of absolute identity 
and unchanging standardization cooked up by the great corpo- 
rations, whose concept of innovation is best illustrated by the 
neologism and the logo and their equivalents in the realm of 
built space, "lifestyle," corporate culture, and psychic pro- 
gramming. The persistence of the Same through absolute Dif- 
ference — the same street with different buildings, the same 
culture through momentous new sheddings of skin — discredits 
change, since henceforth the only conceivable radical change 
would consist in putting an end to change itself. But here the 
antinomy really does result in the blocking or paralysis of 
thought, since the impossibility of thinking another system 
except by way of the cancellation of this one ends up discredit- 
ing the Utopian imagination itself, which is fantasized, as we 
shall see later, as the loss of everything we know experien- 
tially, from our libidinal investments to our psychic habits, and 



19 The Antinomies 



in particular the artificial excitements of consumption and 
fashion. 

Parmenidean stasis or Being to be sure knows at least 
one irrevocable event, namely death and the passage of the 
generations: insofar as the system of Parmenidean simulacrum 
or illusion is a very recent one, constituted in what we call 
postmodernity, the temporality of the generations in all their 
mortal discontinuity is not yet visible in results, except retro- 
actively and as a materialist historiographic imperative. But 
death itself, as the very violence of absolute change, in the 
form of the nonimage — not even bodies rotting off stage but 
rather something persistent like an odor that circulates through 
the luminous immobility of this world without time — is ines- 
capable and meaningless, since any historical framework that 
would serve to interpret and position individual deaths (at 
least for their survivors) has been destroyed. A kind of abso- 
lute violence then, the abstraction of violent death, is some- 
thing like the dialectical correlative to this world without time 
or history. 

But it is more appropriate to conclude this section with a 
remark about the relationship of this temporal paradox — 
absolute change equals stasis — to the dynamics of the new 
global system itself, for here too we can observe an effacement 
of the temporalities that seemed to govern an older period of 
modernity, of modernism and modernization alike. For in that 
older period, most Third World societies were torn by a 
penetration of Western modernization that generated over 
against itself — in all the variety of cultural forms characteristic 
of those very different societies — a counterposition that could 
generally be described as traditionalism: the affirmation of a 
cultural (and sometimes religious) originality that had the 
power to resist assimilation by Western modernity and was 
indeed preferable to it. Such traditionalism was of course a 
construction in its own right, brought into being as it were, 



Postmodernity 20 



by the very activities of the modernizers themselves (in some 
more limited and specific sense than the one now, widely 
accepted, that all traditions and historical pasts are themselves 
necessarily invented and constructed). At any rate, what one 
wants to affirm today is that this second reactive or antimodern 
term of tradition and traditionalism has everywhere vanished 
from the reality of the former Third World or colonized 
societies; where a neotraditionalism (as in certain recent Chi- 
nese revivals of Confucianism, or in religious fundamentalisms) 
is now rather perceived as a deliberate political and collective 
choice, in a situation in which little remains of a past that must 
be completely reinvented. 

This is to say that, on the one hand, nothing but the mod- 
ern henceforth exists in Third World societies; but it is 
also to correct this statement, on the other, with the qualifica- 
tion that under such circumstances, where only the modern 
exists, "modern" must now be rebaptised postmodern (since 
what we call modern is the consequence of incomplete mod- 
ernization and must necessarily define itself against a nonmod- 
ern residuality that no longer obtains in postmodernity as 
such — or rather, whose absence defines this last). Here too 
then, but on a social and historical level, the temporality that 
modernization promised (in its various capitalist and commu- 
nist, productivist forms) has been eclipsed to the benefit of a 
new condition in which that older temporality no longer 
exists, leaving an appearance of random changes that are mere 
stasis, a disorder after the end of history. Meanwhile, it is as 
though what used to be characterized as the Third World has 
entered the interstices of the First one, as the latter also 
demodernizes and deindustrializes, lending the former colonial 
otherness something of the centered identity of the former 
metropolis. 

With this extension of the temporal paradox on a global 
scale something else becomes clear as well, a kind of second 
paradox or antinomy that begins to make its presence felt 



21 The Antinomies 



behind and perhaps even within the first. Indeed, the repeated 
spatial characterizations of temporality here — from Proust to 
storefronts, from urban change to global "development" — now 
begin to remind us that if it is so that postmodernity is 
characterized by some essential spatialization, then everything 
we have here been trying to work out in terms of temporality 
will necessarily have passed through a spatial matrix to come 
to expression in the first place. If time has in effect been 
reduced to the most punctual violence and minimal irrevocable 
change of an abstract death, then we can perhaps affirm that in 
the postmodern time has become space anyhow. The founda- 
tional antinomy of postmodern description lies then in the fact 
that this former binary opposition, along with identity and 
difference themselves, no longer is an opposition as such, and 
ceaselessly reveals itself to have been at one with its other pole 
in a rather different way than the old dialectical projection 
back and forth, the classic dialectical metamorphosis. In order 
to see what this involves, we now necessarily turn to the other 
spatial antinomy, which apparently we have been rehearsing all 
along it its temporal version, with a view toward determining 
whether spatiality has any genuine thematic priority. 

2 

It is at least certain that the form by which one dimension of 
the antithesis necessarily expresses itself by way of the figur- 
ality of the other, time being required to express itself in 
spatial terms, is not repeated here; nor is the time-space 
antithesis symmetrical or reversible in this sense. Space does 
not seem to require a temporal expression; if it is not what 
absolutely does without such temporal figurality, then at the 
very least it might be said that space is what represses tempo- 
rality and temporal figurality absolutely, to the benefit of other 
figures and codes. If Difference and Identity are at stake in 
both the temporal and the spatial antinomy, then the difference 



Postmodernity 22 



preeminent in considerations of space is not so much that of 
change in any temporal understanding of the form, as rather 
variety and infinity, metonymy, and— to reach some more 
influential and seemingly definitive and all-encompassing ver- 
sion — heterogeneity. 

Historically, the adventures of homogeneous and heteroge- 
neous space have most often been told in terms of the quotient 
of the sacred and of the folds in which it is unevenly invested: 
as for its alleged opposite number, the profane, however, one 
supposes that it is a projection backward in time of postsacred 
and commercial peoples to imagine that it was itself any single 
thing or quality (a nonquality, rather); a projection indeed to 
think that anything like a simple dualism of the profane and 
the sacred ever existed as such in the first place. For the sacred 
can be supposed to have meant heterogeneity and multiplicity 
in the first place: a nonvalue, an excess, something irreducible 
to system or to thought, to identity, to the degree to which it 
not merely explodes itself, but its opposite number, positing 
the spaces for normal village living alongside the chthonic 
garbage heaps of the im-monde (Lefebvre) but also the empty 
spaces of waste and desert, the sterile voids that punctuate so 
many naturally expressive landscapes. For by definition there 
must also have been as many types or kinds of the sacred as 
there were powers, and one must drain these words of their 
feeble archaic overtones before we realize that abstractions 
such as sacred or power have, in the face of the realities they 
were meant to designate, about the same expressive force as 
the abstraction color for the variety of intensities that absorb 
our gaze. 

This also bears on the meaning of landscape, whose secular 
and painted modern version is a very recent development, as 
interpreters such as Deleuze or Karatani have so often re- 
minded us. I hesitate to lapse into the fantasies of Romantics 
like Runge, with his languages of the plants; but they are 
certainly attractive fantasies, at least until they become socially 



23 The Antinomies 



stabilized in the form of kitsch (with its "language of flowers"). 
Such notions of a space that is somehow meaningfully orga- 
nized and on the very point of speech, a kind of articulated 
thinking that fails to reach its ultimate translation in proposi- 
tion or concepts, in messages, ultimately find their justification 
and theoretical defense in Levi-Strauss's description, in La 
Pensee sauvage, of prephilosophical "perceptual science"; while 
their aesthetic reaches at least one kind of climax in the 
anthropologist's classic reading of the Pacific Northwest Coast 
Indian Epic of Asdiwal, where the various landscapes, from 
frozen inland wastes to the river and the coast itself, speak 
multiple languages (including those of the economic mode of 
production itself and of the kinship structure) and emit a 
remarkable range of articulated messages. 

This kind of analysis effectively neutralizes the old opposi- 
tion between the rational and the irrational (and all the satellite 
oppositions — primitive versus civilized, male versus female, 
West versus East — that are grounded on it) by locating the 
dynamics of meaning in texts that precede conceptual abstrac- 
tion: a multiplicity of levels is thereby at once opened up 
that can no longer be assimilated to Weberian rationalization, 
instrumental thought, the reifications and repressions of the 
narrowly rational or conceptual. It is thereby to be character- 
ized as heterogeneity; and we can go on to describe the 
sensory articulations of its object, in the mobile landscapes of 
Asdiwal, as heterogeneous space. As Derrida has famously 
shown, in one of the inaugural documents of what later comes 
to be called poststructuralism, Levi-Strauss's analysis remains 
somehow centered around homologous meanings: it fails to 
reach the ultimately aleatory and undecideable; it persists in 
clinging for dear life to the very concept of meaning proper; 
and in a situation that ought to put an end to that concept, it 
does not even attain the openness of Bakhtinian polyphony or 
heteroglossia, since there is still a collective agency — the 
tribe — that speaks through its multiplicities. 



of Postmodernity 24 



But that then becomes the failure of Levi-Strauss to reach 
true heterogeneity rather than the historical insufficiency of 
this latter concept as such, about which Bataille's whole life's 
work demonstrates that it exists in situation and is, like the 
surrealism from which it derived and that it repudiates, a 
strategic reaction against a modern state of things. This leads 
one to wonder whether heterogeneity can in fact mean any- 
thing suitably subversive until homogeneity has historically 
emerged, to confer upon it the value and the force of a specific 
oppositional tactic. What has to be described, therefore, is not 
so much the prestige of such forms of multiplicity and excess 
that overspill the rational modern mind and rebuke it, as 
rather their values as reactions against it whose projection into 
the past is at best a doubtful and suspicious matter. The prior 
object of description is rather the gradual colonization of the 
world by precisely that homogeneity that it was Bataille's 
historical mission (as of so many others) to challenge: its 
tendential conquests, the setting in place of forms of identity 
that only after the fact allow the anachronistic illusion of 
heterogeneity and difference to come to seem the logic of 
what they organized and flattened out. 

That process, as far as space is concerned, can surely be 
identified with some precision: it is the moment in which a 
Western system of private property in real estate displaces the 
various systems of land tenure it confronts in the course of its 
successive enlargements (or, in the European situation itself, 
from which it gradually emerges for the first time in its own 
right). Nor does a language of violence — otherwise perfectly 
appropriate for these supercessions and still observable in 
course in settler colonies such as Israel and also in the various 
"transitions to capitalism" in Eastern Europe — convey the 
way in which the substitution of one legal system for another, 
more customary one is a matter of calculation and elaborate 
political strategy (see Guha). The violence was no doubt al- 
ways implicit in the very conception of ownership as such 
when applied to the land; it is a peculiarly, ambivalent mystery 



2$ The Antinomi 



that mortal beings, generations of dying organisms, should 
have imagined they could somehow own parts of the earth in 
the first place. The older forms of land tenure (as well as the 
more recent socialist forms, equally varied from country to 
country) at least posited the collectivity as the immortal gover- 
nor into whose stewardship portions of the soil are given over; 
nor has it ever been a simple or easy matter to undo these 
social relationships and replace them with the apparently more 
obvious and manageable ones based on individualized owner- 
ship and a juridical system of equivalent subjects — East Ger- 
many in this respect today rather resembles what the American 
North had to do to the conquered South after the Civil War; 
while the Israeli settlements often remind one of the brutal 
displacement of Native American societies in the West of the 
United States. 

The point is, however, that where the thematic opposition 
of heterogeneity and homogeneity is invoked, it can only be 
this brutal process that is the ultimate referent: the effects 
that result from the power of commerce and then capitalism 
proper — which is to say, sheer number as such, number now 
shorn and divested of its own magical heterogeneities and 
reduced to equivalencies — to seize upon a landscape and flat- 
ten it out, reorganize it into a grid of identical parcels, and 
expose it to the dynamic of a market that now reorganizes 
space in terms of an identical value. The development of 
capitalism then distributes that value most unevenly indeed, 
until at length, in its postmodern moment, sheer speculation, 
as something like the triumph of spirit over matter, the libera- 
tion of the form of value from any of its former concrete or 
earthly content, now reigns supreme and devastates the very 
cities and countrysides it created in the process of its own 
earlier development. But all such later forms of abstract vio- 
lence and homogeneity derive from the initial parcelization, 
which translates the money form and the logic of commodity 
production for a market back onto space itself. 

Our own period also teaches us that the fundamental con- 



Postmodernity 26 



tradiction in this reorganization of space, which seeks to stamp 
out older and customary forms of collective land tenure (that 
then swim back into the modern historical imagination in the 
form of religious or anthropological conceptions of "the sa- 
cred" or of archaic heterogeneity), is to be identified as what 
we equally used to call agriculture itself, when that was associ- 
ated with a peasantry or even yeoman farmers. In a postmod- 
ern global system, in which the tendency of a hitherto over- 
whelming peasant population to drop to some 7 or 8 percent 
of the nation can be observed everywhere in the modernizing 
fully as much as in the "advanced" countries, the relationship 
between peasant agriculture and traditional culture has become 
only too clear: the latter follows the former into extinction, 
and all the great precapitalist cultures prove to have been 
peasant ones, except where they were based on slavery. 
(Meanwhile, as for what has until today passed for a capitalist 
culture — a specifically capitalist "high culture," that is — it can 
also be identified as the way in which a bourgeoisie imitated 
and aped the traditions of its aristocratic feudal predecessors, 
tending also to be eclipsed along with their memory and 
to give way, along with the older classical bourgeois class 
consciousness itself, to mass culture — indeed to a specifically 
American mass culture at that.) 

But the very possibility of a new globalization (the expan- 
sion of capital beyond its earlier limits in its second, or 
"imperialist," stage) depended on an agricultural reorganization 
(sometimes called the green revolution owing to its technolog- 
ical and specifically chemical and biological innovations) that 
effectively made peasants over into farm workers and great 
estates or latifundia (as well as village enclaves) over into 
agribusiness. Pierre-Philippe Rey has indeed suggested that we 
understand the relationship of modes of production to one 
another as one of imbrication or articulation, rather than as 
one of simple supercession: in this respect, he suggests the 
second or "modern" moment of capital — the stage of imperial- 



2J The Antinomies 



ism — retained an older precapitalist mode of production in 
agriculture and kept it intact, exploiting it in tributary fashion, 
deriving capital by extensive labor, inhuman hours and condi- 
tions, from essentially precapitalist relations. The new multi- 
national stage of capital is then characterized by the sweeping 
away of such enclaves and their utter assimilation into capital- 
ism itself, with its wage labor and working conditions: at this 
point, agriculture — culturally distinctive and identified in the 
superstructure as the Other of Nature — now becomes an 
industry like any other, and the peasants simple workers whose 
labor is classically commodified in terms of value equivalen- 
cies. This is not to say that commodification is evenly distrib- 
uted over the entire globe or that all areas have been equally 
modernized or postmodernized; rather, that the tendency to- 
ward global commodification is far more visible and imaginable 
than it was in the modern period, in which tenacious premod- 
ern life realities still existed to impede the process. Capital, as 
Marx showed in the Grundrisse, necessarily tends toward the 
outer limit of a global market that is also its ultimate crisis 
situation (since no further expansion is then possible): this 
doctrine is for us today much less abstract than it was in the 
modern period; it designates a conceptual reality that neither 
theory nor culture can any longer postpone to some future 
agenda. 

But to say so is to evoke the obliteration of difference on a 
world scale, and to convey a vision of the irrevocable triumph 
of spatial homogeneity over whatever heterogeneities might 
still have been fantasized in terms of global space. I want to 
stress this as an ideological development, which includes all 
the ecological fears awakened in our own period (pollution 
and its accompaniments also standing as a mark of universal 
commodification and commercialization): for in this situation 
ideology is not false consciousness but itself a possibility of 
knowledge, and our constitutive difficulties in imagining a 
world beyond global standardization are very precisely indices 



Postmodernity 28 



and themselves features of just that standardized reality or 
being itself. 

Such ideological limits, invested with a certain affective 
terror as a kind of dystopia, are then compensated by other 
ideological possibilities that come into view when we no 
longer take the countryside as our vantage point but rather the 
city and the urban itself. This is of course already an opposition 
that has left significant traces in the science-fictional or Utopian 
tradition: the antithesis between a pastoral Utopia and an 
urban one, and in particular the apparent supercession in the 
last years of images of a village or tribal Utopia (Ursula Le 
Guin's Always Coming Home of 198^ was virtually the last of 
those) by visions of an unimaginably dense urban reality 
(therein nonetheless somehow imagined) that is either explic- 
itly placed on the Utopian agenda, as in Samuel Delany's 
Triton (1976) (or Raymond Williams' prescient forecast that 
socialism, if it is possible, will not be simpler than all this but 
far more complicated) or by masquerades under a dystopian 
appearance whose deeper libidinal excitement, however, is 
surely profoundly Utopian in spirit (as in most current cyber- 
punk). 

Once again, however, we have to do with the conceptual 
difficulties in which we are plunged by the disappearance of 
one of the terms of a formerly functioning binary opposition. 
The disappearance of Nature — the co.mmodification of the 
countryside and the capitalization of agriculture itself all over 
the world — now begins to sap its other term, the formerly 
urban. Where the world system today tends toward one enor- 
mous urban system — tendentially ever more complete mod- 
ernization promised that, which has however been ratified 
and delivered in an unexpected way by the communications 
revolution and its new technologies: a development of which 
the immediately physical visions, nightmares of the "sprawl" 
from Boston to Richmond, or the Japanese urban agglomera- 
tion, are the merest allegories — the very conception of the 



29 The Antinomies 



city itself and the classically urban loses its significance and no 
longer seems to offer any precisely delimited objects of study, 
any specifically differentiated realities. Rather, the urban be- 
comes the social in general, and both of them constitute and 
lose themselves in a global that is not really their opposite 
either (as it was in the older dispensation) but something 
like their outer reach, their prolongation into a new kind of 
infinity. 

Ideologically, what this dissolution of the boundaries of the 
traditional city and the classically urban enables is a slippage, a 
displacement, a reinvestment of older urban ideological and 
libidinal connotations under new conditions. The city always 
seemed to promise freedom, as in the medieval conception of 
the urban as the space of escape from the land and from feudal 
labor and serfdom, from the arbitrary power of the lord: "city 
air" from this perspective now becomes the very opposite 
of what Marx famously characterized as "rural idiocy," the 
narrowness of village manners and customs, the provinciality 
of the rural, with its fixed ideas and superstitions and its hatred 
of difference. Here, in contrast to the dreary sameness of the 
countryside (which is also, however inaccurately, fantasized as 
a place of sexual repression), the urban classically promised 
variety and adventure, often linked to crime just as the accom- 
panying visions of pleasure and sexual gratification are insepa- 
rable from transgression and illegality. 

What happens, then, when even that countryside, even that 
essentially provincial reality, disappears, becomes standard- 
ized, hears the same English, sees the same programs, con- 
sumes the same consumer goods, as the former metropolis to 
which, in the old days, these same provincials and country 
people longed to go as to a fundamental liberation? I think that 
the missing second term — provincial boredom, rural idiocy — 
was preserved, but simply transferred to a different kind of 
city and a different kind of social reality, namely the Second 
World city and the social realities of a nonmarket or planned 



Postmodernity 30 



economy. Everyone remembers the overwhelming power of 
such Cold War iconography, which has perhaps proved even 
more effective today, after the end of the Cold War and in the 
thick of the current offensive of market propaganda and rheto- 
ric, than it was in a situation of struggle where visions of 
terror were more quintessentially operative. Today, however, 
it is the memory of the imagined drabness of the classic Second 
World city — with its meager shelves of consumer goods in 
empty centrals from which the points of light of advertising 
are absent, streets from which small stores and shops are 
missing, standardization of clothing fashions (as most emblem- 
atically in Maoist China) — that remains ideologically operative 
in the campaigns for privatization. Jane Jacobs' fundamental 
identification of a genuine urban fabric and street life with 
small business is ceaselessly rehearsed ideologically, without 
any reminder that she thought the diagnosis applied fully 
as much to the North American or capitalist city in which 
corporations have equally, but in a different fashion, driven 
small business out of existence, and created canyons of institu- 
tional high-rises without any urban personality at all. 

This urban degradation, which characterizes the First 
World, has, however, been transferred to a separate ideologi- 
cal compartment called postmodernism, where it duly takes 
its place in the arsenal of attacks on modern architecture and 
its ideals. As for the Second World city, its vision is rather 
enlisted in the service of a rather different operation, namely 
to serve as the visual and experiential analogon of a world 
utterly programmed and directed by human intention, a world 
therefore from which the contingencies of chance — and 
thereby the promise of adventure and real life, of libidinal 
gratification — are also excluded. Conscious intention, the 
"plan," collective control, are then fantasized as being at one 
with repression and renunciation, with instinctual impover- 
ishment: and as in the related postmodern polemic, the ab- 
sence of ornament from the Second World city — as it were 



31 



The Antinomies 



the involuntary enactment of Adolf Loos's program — serves 
as a grim caricature of the puritanical Utopian values of a 
revolutionary society (just as it had served as that of the 
equally puritanical Utopian values of high modernism in the 
other campaign that in certain recent theory in the Eastern 
countries — in particular Groys' Gesamtkunstwerk Stalin — is ex- 
plicitly linked to this one in an instructive and revealing way). 

Only the spatial features of this particular ideological tactic 
are new: Edmund Burke was of course the first to develop the 
great antirevolutionary figure, according to which what people 
consciously and collectively do can only be destructive and a 
sign of fatal hubris: that only the slow "natural" growth of 
traditions and institutions can be trusted to form a genuinely 
human world (a deep suspicion of the will and of unconscious 
intention that then passes over into a certain Romantic tradi- 
tion in aesthetics). But Burke's pathbreaking attack on the 
Jacobins aimed at the middle-class construction and formation 
of market society itself, about whose commercialism it essen- 
tially expressed the fears and anxieties of an older social 
formation in the process of being superceded. The market 
people today, however, marshall the same fantasies in defense 
of a market society now supposed itself to be somehow "natu- 
ral" and deeply rooted in human nature; they do so against 
the Promethean efforts of human beings to take collective 
production into their own hands and, by planning, to control 
or at least to influence and inflect their own future (something 
that no longer seems particularly meaningful in a postmoder- 
nity in which the very experience of the future as such has 
come to seem enfeebled, if not deficient). 

But this is precisely the ideological and imaginary back- 
ground against which it is possible to market and to sell the 
contemporary capitalist city as a well-nigh Bakhtinian carnival 
of heterogeneities, of differences, libidinal excitement, and a 
hyperindividuality that effectively decenters the old individual 
subject by way of individual hyperconsumption. Now the 



Postmodernity 32 



associations or connotations of provincial misery and renuncia- 
tion, of petty bourgeois impoverishment, of cultural and libidi- 
nal immiseration, systematically reinvested in our images of 
the urban space of the Second World, are pressed into service 
as arguments against socialism and planning, against collective 
ownership and what is fantasized as centralization, at the same 
time that they serve as powerful stimuli to the peoples of 
Eastern Europe to plunge into the freedoms of Western con- 
sumption. This is no small ideological achievement in view of 
the difficulties, a priori, in staging the collective control over 
their destinies by social groups in a negative way and investing 
those forms of autonomy with all the fears and anxieties, the 
loathing and libidinal dread, which Freud called counterin vest- 
ment or anticathexis and that must constitute the central effect 
of any successful anti-Utopianism. 

This is then also the point at which everything most para- 
doxical about the spatial form of the antinomy under discus- 
sion here becomes vivid and inescapable; our conceptual ex- 
hibit comes more sharply into view when we begin to ask 
ourselves how it is possible for the most standardized and 
uniform social reality in history, by the merest ideological flick 
of the thumbnail, the most imperceptible of displacements, to 
reemerge as the rich oil-smear sheen of absolute diversity and 
of the most unimaginable and unclassifiable forms of human 
freedom. Here homogeneity has become heterogeneity, in a 
movement complementary to that in which absolute change 
turned into absolute stasis, and without the slightest modifica- 
tion of a real history that there was thought to be at an end, 
while here it has seemed finally to realize itself. 

3 

But as might have been expected, the disappearance of Nature 
in its traditional form as social space has also stimulated some- 
thing like a return of the repressed of another kind of Nature 



33 The Antinomies 



in another dimension of things altogether; not unexpectedly, 
this reappearance generates paradoxes and perhaps even antin- 
omies that are no doubt symmetrical to the preceding ones, 
but of a wholly different character and with quite different 
consequences. For the question of Nature — the problem of 
the concept of Nature — is lodged deeply at the very heart 
of two influential and indeed closely related contemporary 
ideological positionings in the realm of philosophy and also 
that of doxa more generally. As they are not exactly them- 
selves philosophical movements or schools, one is indeed 
tempted to describe them rather as something like a new 
doxa about the positions to be taken on doxa itself — I mean 
antifoundationalism and its distant gendered cousin antiessen- 
tialism. Both in effect turn centrally on the question of Nature, 
taken first in the sense of an object of scientific research 
around which a philosophical epistemology can be constructed 
that guarantees knowledge, and second in the sense of a human 
nature of which specific varieties can be normatively deduced 
and ascribed (for in its relationship to the world and being and 
to nonhuman objects, the doctrine of essences is Aristotelian 
and can be said to have been discredited and dismantled by the 
coming into being of those very — modern — epistemologies 
that it is the task of antifoundationalism to challenge and 
dismantle in its turn: something that happens most dramati- 
cally and paradigmatically in Richard Rorty's Philosophy and the 
Mirror of Nature). Surely the popular subsistence of the term 
nature in both these rather different contexts needs to be 
factored into the discussion as a significant symptom, if not 
any ironclad guarantee that the two positions really share the 
same problematic. 

Their kinship can be documented in another way by recall- 
ing the now forgotten adventure of philosophical existential- 
ism, whose Sartrean version united both positions in a com- 
mon polemic — virtually its basic philosophical politics before 
Marxism and another kind of "politics" came along. For the 



Postmodernity 34 



first great campaign of Sartrean existentialism challenged the 
notion of nature head-on and affirmed in particular that noth- 
ing like an essential human nature existed; that all essences 
were "constructed," as we might say today; and that any appeal 
to preexisting conceptions of psychic or characterological or 
metaphysical norms of that kind was to be met with alertness 
and suspicion, the norm— very specifically in its guise as this or 
that notion of human nature— being from times immemorial 
that cutting instrument whereby the abnormal and the weak, 
the womanish, the deviant, or the marginal, the criminal and 
the pathological, are excised and sundered from the social 
order grasped as eternal and natural. .This great lesson was 
surely taught us more effectively by Sartre than by Heidegger, 
to whom it would be difficult to attribute any great concern 
about such matters; it then develops into a whole dialectic — 
or better still an arrested dialectic — of self versus other, which 
finds a rich prolongation in Simone de Beauvoir's feminism on 
the one hand, and Frantz Fanon's diagnosis of colonialism and 
race on the other, until, in Foucault, it reaches a kind of 
stabilization, not to say reification, which creates new para- 
doxes in its own right. For if this repressive effect of the 
affirmation of a natural self is taken to be part of an ideological 
opposition, then a new question swims into being about the 
nature of that mysterious other term, the Other itself, which 
leads us into an interminable play of reflections, an endless 
house of mirrors and optical illusions, in which the quest for 
some ultimate radical otherness takes precedence over the 
rather different Sartrean critique of bourgeois normativity. 
This is why — even though it is proper and even necessary for 
the great Sartrean attack on the idea of human nature to be 
renewed and reinvented with every new generation — there 
seems to be something misguided about slogans such as "anties- 
sentialism" and "antifoundationalism," which imply the conver- 
sion of an antinormative bias or philosophical habit into a kind 
of norm in its own right and a brand-new philosophical posi- 



35 The Antinomies 



tion wide open to the objection that it has itself become 
something of a dogmatic foundation and has come to imply 
something of a new kind of human essence in its turn. But this 
facile objection, while no doubt true, does not seem to me as 
interesting as other perspectives on these new philosophical 
values, which raise questions of their historical conditions of 
possibility. 

Indeed, if following Lyotard's luminous formula, we accus- 
tom ourselves to thinking of both strategies not so much as 
philosophical stances as rather in terms of desires — the desire 
called antifoundationalism, the desire called antiessentialism — 
we will be better able to bracket the content of such positions 
provisionally and to turn to the more historically interesting 
question of why intellectual or social strata in contemporary 
society have found the new ethical doxa congenial and useful. 
This is the only question that can lead us to any increase in 
collective self-knowledge. 

Indeed, it is by way of cognate "desires" in aesthetics that 
we can best grasp the specificity of this philosophical ambition 
to live dangerously, as Nietzsche might put it; to try to think 
without backup or presuppositions, to deal with problems ad 
hoc and without a system. In aesthetics, all this — which will 
look rather different — can be said to take the form of the ideal 
of the "pure" work of art, the work that is nothing but form 
and has somehow absorbed or expunged everything that was 
content. "What strikes me as beautiful, what I would like to 
write," cried Flaubert in a famous letter to Louise Colet, "is a 
book about nothing, a book with no external links, which 
would hold itself together by the sheer internal force of its 
style, just as the earth hangs in the air without anything 
holding it up, a book that would have virtually no subject 
matter or at least where the subject would be virtually invisi- 
ble, if that is conceivable. The most beautiful works are 
those that contain the least matter ..." (January 16, i8c2). 
Everything depends in that case on what matter or "content" is 



Postmodernity 



36 



thought to mean in this new aesthetic situation, which is 
henceforth that of modernism; and why its presence in the 
work, its persistence in the work, would be felt to be an 
artistic flaw or blemish, traces whose forensic removal sets a 
whole new aesthetic agenda. A complete answer to these 
questions would lead us to the very heart of modernism itself, 
and to some fuller assessment of characteristic artifacts such as 
the great freestanding syntax of a Mallarmean sentence that 
becomes a complete and self-sufficient thing in its own right, 
or the transparency of Miesian constructions in which there 
subsists as the barest shadow or momentarily glimpsed opacity 
the distilled remnant and Platonic afterimage of wall or frame. 
Not innovation but rather prohibition, and the production of 
ever more stringent taboos and methodological procedures, is 
the key to this teleology of the modern and in particular the 
emergence of a specific prohibition that seems to aim among 
other things at content in general. 

A prophetic clue to the deeper sources of this kind of 
modernist prohibition is to be found in Lukacs's Theory of the 
Novel, which turns on the form-problems generated by the 
different kinds of social content that the novel must process as 
an open or problematic narrative; and in particular by those 
parts of an individual life that are somehow not "meaningful" 
in themselves and can thus not be assimilated to the formal 
patterns the novel is capable of achieving: never mind whether 
the diagnosis is circular, and meaningful here simply designating 
what cannot be made to fold into the novel as a form. What 
Lukacs's discussion leads us to is a conception of "content" as 
the brute fact of contingency itself: content is somehow every- 
thing that remains contingent in the individual life that a 
modernist aesthetics seeks to burn away, like slag, in order 
that some "pure" work or form can emerge from the process. 
Contingency is however here not yet the absurdity of the 
various existentialisms, the radically meaningless; rather it is 
closer to the reflex of Aristotelian self-sufficiency or substance, 



37 The Antinomies 



as the very terms of Flaubert's letter might have warned us 

what is meaningful in and of itself, in its own terms, what 
needs no external or extrinsic explanations — only that is the 
opposite of contingency for the new modernist aesthetic. 

Content is therefore precisely that chain of external expla- 
nations (including, but not limited to, causality itself) that is 
the aesthetic mark of contingency in the modernist context; to 
put it this way is to be able to grasp the modernist impulse as 
the symbolic anticipation of a unity of individual experience 
(completely comprehensible in its own terms) whose condition 
of possibility is the dissolution of the older traditional commu- 
nities or groups and the emergence of individualism and ano- 
mie. Only such isolated individuals, bereft of the older family 
or village structures in which they were once embedded, can 
offer the adequate raw material for the pure work, the novel 
form beyond contingency (and, as Jean Borie suggested in a 
classic work, such isolated subjectivity is bound to be a male 
and a bachelor one, since women are in that situation still 
profoundly context-bound). Later on, when the public is itself 
drawn into the analysis, this diagnosis is inflected (by Sartre, 
for example, or by Roland Barthes in Writing Deg ree Zero) in 
the direction of the signals and codes that make a work 
available and accessible to one particular group, thereby ex- 
cluding the others: content is thus here seen as the mark of 
belonging to a specific group or class, and the dream of a work 

without content is a Utopian one, in which the pure work 

now something like Barthes 's white or bleached writing can 

function classlessly and in a universal fashion. 

This is the context in which it seems suggestive and enlight- 
ening to replace the philosophical project — a postmodern 
rather than a specifically modern one, to be sure — of doing 
without foundations and essences. The equivalent of "content" 
in the aesthetic sense might be located, for philosophical dis- 
course, in those "absolute presuppositions" that R. G. Colling- 
wood identified as philosophy's task, in any era, to excavate 



Postmodernity 38 



and to foreground. The advantage of this particular way of 
defining the formal issue lies in the still relatively traditional 
(or modern) way Collingwood grasped his absolute presuppo- 
sitions: namely, that it could not or never be a question of 
doing away with them, that all thought and action were 
grounded on such deep ideologies, beliefs, or paradigms and 
epistemes, which it was the task of the philosopher to draw up 
into the light and to articulate, thereby in some sense offering 
their apologia and their ideological defense. But to put it in 
these terms is already to encourage a more vanguard philo- 
sophical attitude in which the obvious next step would be to 
get rid of such presuppositions altogether, very much in an 
Enlightenment spirit of doing away with the sheer superstition 
of inherited ideas and attitudes. 

This is then a move that can be seen gradually to emerge in 
philosophical modernism as such (if we can identify it as that), 
for which it comes gradually to be felt — from Nietzsche to 
phenomenology, from Wittgenstein to the pragmatists — that 
something would be achieved if one could travel light, leave 
those suitcases behind, do without the cumbersome foreign 
bodies of our inherited or unconscious presuppositions: the 
dregs or lees in the wine, the stuff in your pockets, the 
houses you own, and the bills you still have to pay. Rorty's 
antifoundationalism is postmodern above all in the way in 
which it formalizes these tendencies and concentrates them 
(with an emblematic identification of Wittgenstein and Hei- 
degger, Dewey and Derrida, as specific forebears) in the 
coherent twin program of doing away with the analysis of 
subjectivity as such and also with the related conception of the 
philosophical system. His work, however, still implies that, as 
Collingwood thought, you could write a history of the emer- 
gence of such "presuppositions" as the way in which, with 
Kant, the conception of the subject retroactively makes the 
"history of philosophy" (for Rorty, an error and an ideology 
that presupposes essential continuities in philosophical discus- 



39 The Antinomies 



sion down through the ages) possible; but he is oddly evasive 
about the way one would write this kind of philosophical 
history — a synchronic history of the conditions of possibility 
of illusions, rather than Kant's diachronic one — and in this he 
is as ambiguous as Collingwood himself, about whom it is 
difficult to decide whether the philosopher who knows about 
absolute presuppositions does not suddenly in all lucidity mu- 
tate into a historian rather than yet another mere mouthpiece 
for the absolute presuppositions of his own age (but perhaps 
those were historicist in the first place). 

The development from a modern to a postmodern philo- 
sophical position, from pragmatists like Dewey, who still have 
a kind of system or method, even if it is only called that of 
"problem-solving," to Rorty's attempt to distance himself from 
the philosophical institution altogether, offers a trajectory that 
can be read in social terms as a movement toward the ever 
greater individuations of a new decentered individual subject 
in postmodernity. 

For in an older period — Victorian or Third Republic — such 
efforts at freeing thought from its "content" — Yeats 's "balloon 
of the mind" straining for release and to cut its moorings with 
what grounds it— has to do with the elimination of the vesti- 
gial content of an older prebourgeois life mode, and is at one 
with the "modernizations" of the Enlightenment program to 
dismantle the priests' schools in the countryside and retrain 
the stubborn mentalities of the peasants. And this, very much 
in the Enlightenment spirit: for in a situation in which, as 
Arno Mayer has taught us, modernization and the bourgeoisie 
are very far from being hegemonic socially, religion remains 
the symbol of the imprisonment of consciousness in its own 
past and "the spiritual" is still seen as something like the matter 
in which modern consciousness remains entangled. 

The existential moment is in all of its forms a later version 
of this program, but in a new social situation in which an even 
more advanced vision of industrial organization and of 



Postmodernity 40 



working-class democracy has appeared, for which even mid- 
dle-class enlightenment has come to be felt as a set of >esup- 
positions and prejudices themselves to be demystified and 
extirpated. In this period (as Sartre's own trajectory from 
existentialism to Marxism demonstrates), the dialectic is iden- 
tified as a kind of form that is at one with its content and that 
can achieve a kind of universality on the basis of its elimination 
of the "content" of classes and groups. 

The "end of history" thesis, which has been advanced to 
explain why this is no longer our own historical situation, 
seems to me a symptom of a development in which the 
dialectic has suffered the fate of all other philosophical or 
ideological concepts in the postmodern period, about which 
the related "end of ideology" holds to the degree to which all 
those conceptual presuppositions and that mental ballast often 
identified as "ideology" no longer seem to be the principal way 
in which the social order reproduces itself or polices and 
legitimates its operative structures. If, as Adorno came to 
think current society reproduces itself by way of practices and 
habits and technocracy and consumerism not only no longer 
require ideational grounding but aim precisely to eliminate the 
last vestiges of distance implicit in ideas and concepts as 
such— if in other words some thoroughgoing postmodern pos- 
itivism (that no longer looks very much like its Third -Republic 
grandfather) has taken the place of philosophical and ideologi- 
cal legitimation today— then ideological critique loses its mis- 
sion and the tracking down and correction of intellectual 
error is a less urgent ideological and political activity than the 
elimination of philosophical activity altogether. 

As in Tafuri's suspicious reading of the modernist moment 
of demystificaticn and ideology critique, of the "hermeneutic 
of suspicion" itself, as the "ruse of reason" of a corporate 
capitalism that needs to abolish the residues of an intellectual 
as well as a social past, so here too we may venture a reading 
of postmodern antifoundationalism as a strategy that replicates 



41 The Antinomies 



the dynamic of late positivist capitalism, however much it may 
wish to subvert it in other ways. It then becomes tempting to 
return to our spatial and urban analogies and to see in a certain 
desire called antifoundationalism a dynamic not unlike that of 
so-called post-Fordism in economic production and marketing, 
and in particular in the drive to liquidate inventories as such. 

Theories of post-Fordism in effect try to come at the 
modifications of industrial production wrought today by cyber- 
netics and computerization by way of an account of the new 
flexibility of the product that these technologies enable. Ford 
supplied a universal product, to be sure, but it was inflexible 
and the masses Fordism admitted to consumption were obliged 
to consume the self-same identical black automobile, just as 
later on in a more international career, the Fordist moment of 
capitalism imposed the selfsame Western goods on all kinds 
of foreign markets not necessarily culturally attuned to that 
particular consumption. In post-Fordism, however, as well as 
in what has widely come to be called postmodern marketing, 
cybernetic and information techniques allow the product mini- 
mally to be tailored to its consumers' cultural needs and 
specifications; at the same time the same communications 
technologies allow a system of supply that can liquidate the 
physical stock that not only takes up valuable real estate space 
but also threatens to become outmoded in a rapidly changing 
fashion situation. These new developments have also been 
helpful ideologically, for they allow the emphasis to be shifted 
from production as such (and it would be worth exploring the 
argument that productivity can now be seen as being at one 
with an older, essentially modern form of industrial produc- 
tion that is now outmoded); they also blur the distinction 
between the two other categories of the triad, distribution and 
consumption, in such a way that new modes of distribution 
(the fundamental defining trait of post-Fordism as a concept) 
can be parlayed into a rhetoric of consumption and of the 
market as an ideological value. 



Postmodernity 4 2 



In any case, the post-Fordist vision of plurality and distribu- 
tion — particularly insofar as it rises above the antiquated and 
expensive spaces of warehouses and those older storage build- 
ings and display outlets that slow down land speculation and 
betray the residues of the site and grounding of a more 
traditional city — seems peculiarly consonant with the more 
intellectual mobility and strategic erasure of an antifounda- 
tional ideal, in its vision of a mind unfurnished with first 
principles that can grapple with the business at hand directly, 
in an unmediated and technocratic way, without prejudice or 
mental inventory or cumbersome ideological stock. 

This is not to suggest that post-Fordism is any more work- 
able or ultimately noncontradictory in the intellectual realm 
than it is in late capitalism as such; for the question of content 
does not go away and indeed poses itself with renewed poi- 
gnancy for a liberalism or a social democracy historically 
obliged once again to confront something it can only identify 
as a type of fascism. It is a philosophical issue that goes at least 
as far back as Sartrean existentialism, which, having eliminated 
essences and human nature, and, although still a philosophical 
system, having achieved something of the status of an antifoun- 
dationalism avant la lettre, then urgently needed to show why 
the free choice of heroic fascism as a form of commitment (or 
engagement) would not be as philosophically tenable as anything 
else. 

Most of the classic existential "solutions" were, of course, 
modified Kantian ones: the idea of the categorical imperative 
indeed gives us the supreme example of a formalism that 
attempts to endow itself with content by taking its own form 
as the very allegory of the ethical stance to be preferred. Thus, 
in Kant, the conception of a moral law is construed to imply 
universality and thus the requirement to treat the other as I 
would myself; in Sartre (or at least in the first attempt at a 
Sartrean ethic) the fact of freedom is construed as entailing 
some fundamental recognition of the other's freedom, which 



43 The Antinomi 



in turn excludes a whole range of conducts (such as fascism or 
domination); in Habermas the primacy of the communicational 
circuit is construed as implying some first fundamental ac- 
knowledgement of the necessity of communication as such and 
thereby that of the attempt to understand my interlocutor in a 
mode of equality; in Laclau and Mouffe the mobility of possi- 
ble intergroup signifiers is construed as implying the repudia- 
tion of any specific content associated with a single group and 
thereby as constituting a kind of acknowledgement of the very 
dynamic of political democracy. In all these cases, however, it 
is a profoundly formalist stance that determines the strategy of 
the solution itself, which cannot lie in the area of concrete 
content — of the historical situation, of the values of concrete 
groups, of specific choices — and is thereby necessarily trans- 
ferred to the more logical operation of deducing something 
that looks like content (a substantive ethics or politics) from 
specifically formal features of the philosophical concept itself. 

A wholly different strategy can be observed, by contrast, in 
Lukacs's History and Class Consciousness, where the philosophical 
and conceptual definition — the opposition between commodi- 
fication in the subject (bourgeois knowledge) and the com- 
modification of the object — is socially identified, and the con- 
crete form of a self-consciousness of commodification is 
matched up with a specific social class, namely the industrial 
proletariat. In J.-F. Lyotard's Economie libidinale, on the con- 
trary, the opposite strategy is blurted out, and not without a 
certain deliberate provocation it is scandalously affirmed that 
all desires and political positions are "libidinally equal." In 
other systems a structural difference between left and right is 
proposed, whereby (as in Deleuze and Guattari, for example) 
right-wing desire is characterized as paranoid, while revolu- 
tionary desire is characterized as schizophrenic; but most of 
these differential solutions will run the risk of seeming rigged 
in advance. My own "solution," often taken to be as scandalous 
as that of Lyotard, affirms the Utopian character of all collec- 



Postmodernity 44 



tive experience (including those of fascism and the various 
racisms) but stresses the requirement of an existential choice 
of solidarity with a specific concrete group: on this nonformal- 
ist view, therefore, the social solidarity must precede the 
ethicopolitical choice and cannot be deduced from it. 

Of these various solutions, Lukacs's — particularly if one 
stresses the kinship with the view of the novel described 
above — comes closest to a dialectical nonformalism, in which 
a certain harmony is posited between a specific social content 
and the fullest development of group or collective structures: 
a harmony that cannot however simply be chosen in the 
abstract but that must emerge from concrete historical devel- 
opment. What is important in the present context, however, 
is not particularly this solution but rather the relationship 
between the formalist impulse — the formalist temptation, so 
to speak — and antifoundationalism itself, which is in many 
ways its supreme form, even though most consequently it 
achieves its formal purity by abandoning the problem alto- 
gether (not unlike Lyotard). 

For surely the only logical way for a genuine neopragma- 
tism to deal with the problem of qualitative theoretical tests 
for group ethics or politics is to abandon this particular longing 
as an abstract and a false problem, and to deal with each issue 
on its merits and in its context (if such a thing is conceivable); 
yet Rorty has also frequently tried to suggest some deeper 
ideological kinship between his own philosophical views and a 
kind of liberalism or social democracy in politics. He can 
perhaps demonstrate the kinship between this or that "founda- 
tionalism" and this or that non- or antiliberal politics; but it is 
hard to see how he could achieve the inverse, positive affirma- 
tion without recourse to the kind of formalist strategy I have 
been describing. 

As for antiessentialism, it has also known an analogous 
alternation between form and content, particularly in the vari- 
ous feminist positions, as they alternate between a feminist 



45 The Antinomies 



essentialism (whether "strategic" or not) — women as radically 
different from men in their subjectivity and their ecriture, 
in their modes of feeling and capacities for action — and an 
antiessentialist egalitarianism that aims at destroying what is 
prejudicially affirmed as being unique to women in order to 
achieve a gender-blind and democratic social equality. But as 
Paul Smith has argued, feminism presents the philosophical 
interest of an ideological field in which this opposition cannot 
be solved and in which neither of these positions can ever be 
abandoned without political and social loss: women do have 
unique experience that cannot be suppressed without a general 
loss of historical content for everyone, while just as clearly the 
demand for equality cannot be abandoned either. Diana Fuss 
has therefore argued that an alternation between these posi- 
tions is as desirable as it is inevitable; while Paul Smith has 
more judiciously suggested that both must be maintained si- 
multaneously (for some reason, neither of these writers has 
recourse to the dialectic). It would therefore be wrong to 
imagine that feminism can ever be an exclusively antiessential- 
ist movement; meanwhile, it is tempting to wonder whether 
some such asymmetrical coexistence as the one Smith suggests, 
some rigorous impurity and contamination by the external and 
by content at the heart of a seemingly absolute formalist 
enterprise, might not also be invented for antifoundationalism 
itself. 

If such a configuration were possible, however, it would 
only be conceivable on the basis of the antinomy associated 
with antifoundationalism, which it was the task of this section 
to outline, but whose other term we have not yet reached 
until now. We have however been preparing for its emergence 
by insisting on the systematic obliteration of the "natural" from 
postmodernity generally: not merely the reorganization of 
traditional agriculture into industrial production but also the 
keen awareness of the age that identities and traditions, far 
from being natural, are "constructed." Indeed, informational 



Postmodernity 46 



technology has shown a subtle and far-reaching sensitivity for 
the nonnatural and arbitrary structure of signs and symbols, 
messages, thoughts, values, cultural expressions, emotions, 
and feelings — in short, for everything that makes up a human 
world behind which the material passivities and resistances of 
an older natural one have mostly been effaced. Nature is 
thus surely the great enemy of any antifoundationalism or 
antiessentialism: the strong final term and content of whatever 
essence or axiomatic, whatever ultimate presupposition or 
metaphysic, whatever limit or fate may be posited. To do 
away with the last remnants of nature and with the natural as 
such is surely the secret dream and longing of all contemporary 
or postcontemporary, postmodern, thought — even though it 
is a dream the latter dreams with the secret proviso that 
"nature" never really existed in the first place anyhow. 

This is then the moment at which it becomes obligatory to 
observe that postmodernity is also the moment of a host of 
remarkable and dramatic "revivals" of nature, which are any- 
thing but returns of the repressed in coded or symptomatic 
senses. I omit feminism and religious fundamentalism from 
this account, since both can be shown to be postmodern in 
more complicated ways, and any reaffirmation of nature or of 
metaphysics and tradition either may occasionally make is 
always completed with a paradoxically postmodern lucidity as 
to the utterly constructed character of both those things. 
But surely ecology is another matter entirely; and while its 
rediscovery and reaffirmation of the limits of nature is post- 
modern to the degree to which it repudiates the modernism of 
modernization and of the productivist ethos that accompanied 
an earlier moment of capitalism, it must also equally refuse 
the implied Prometheanism of any conception of Nature itself, 
the Other of human history, as somehow humanly con- 
structed. How antifoundationalism can thus coexist with the 
passionate ecological revival of a sense of Nature is the essen- 
tial mystery at the heart of what I take to be a fundamental 



47 The Antinomies 



antinomy of the postmodern; that it does so I have no doubt, 
and one can observe this active coexistence everywhere around 
us. But it is not necessarily an innocent coexistence, as I will 
try to show, without at all wishing to place in jeopardy the 
truths ecology has rediscovered or to minimize the therapeutic 
anxieties that our catastrophic relations with the planet have 
finally awakened. 

What we need to know first of all is whether this particular 
Nature, whose violent modifications has finally made us grasp 
the aggressivity of industrial capitalism and modernization gen- 
erally, is in any way to be thought of as somehow the same as 
that older "nature" at whose domestication if not liquidation all 
Enlightenment and post-Enlightenment thought so diligently 
worked. The Adorno/Horkheimer Dialectic of Enlightenment 
seems to affirm this, in a well-nigh ecological and postmodern 
way, but not without jettisoning science in general in its 
wake, and leaving the status of social revolution and systemic 
change — still intermittently celebrated in that work — in some 
doubt. What can lie beyond what Marx called naturwiichsige 
modes of production, if not simply more capitalism albeit of a 
more technologically sophisticated and globalized variety? 
Then too there is a second question about the word nature, 
namely, the degree to which (as has already been suggested 
above) it somehow necessarily also entails a conception of a 
human nature, which may not be enunciated as such but is 
bound to be implicit in that inevitable and concomitant con- 
ception of limits that is difficult to separate from an ecological 
ethos. Notions of a new kind of post-AIDS self-restraint, of a 
discipline necessarily directed toward the self and its desires 
and impulses; the learning of new habits of smallness, frugal- 
ity, modesty, and the like; a kind of respect for otherness that 
sets a barrier to gratification — these are some of the ethical 
ideas and figures in terms of which new attitudes toward the 
individual and the collective self are proposed by a (postmod- 
ern) ecology. They need to be historically compared to the 



Postmodernity 48 



kind of Prometheanism and productionism of the modern 
period, as well as to the rhetoric of desire and absolute 
gratification that was particularly strongly expressed at its end 
in the 1960s and early 1970s, in order to appreciate the degree 
to which the new ethos can also be interpreted in terms of a 
necessary repression of desire, a self-policing attitude toward 
drives and instinctual gratification, a new style of restraint and 
ironic modesty and skepticism about the collective ambitions 
that had hitherto expressed themselves in Promethean Utopi- 
anism and across a very wide span of different kinds of revolu- 
tionary politics. 

It is important to identify this repressive dimension of 
the contemporary ecological ethic, about which it does not 
particularly matter whether it is voluntary and self-adminis- 
tered or not (or perhaps one should suggest that it is far worse 
if it is voluntary and self-administered), in order to grasp the 
kinship between a politics most of us feel to be positive and 
ideologically desirable and one we may feel rather differently 
about, namely contemporary authoritarianism. 

For we evidently needed to wait for the collapse of what 
Jeane Kirkpatrick quaintly called the "totalitarian" regimes to 
be able to measure the degree to which virtually all the 
others, very specifically including most of the parliamentary 
democracies, fall into her category of the merely "authoritar- 
ian." A general pessimism, political apathy, the failure of the 
welfare state or of the various social democracies — all can be 
enlisted as causes in a general consent to the necessity for 
law-and-order regimes everywhere, about which it is widely 
supposed that it is the universal rise in social violence that 
largely justifies them (even though this "criminality" is itself a 
response to the failures of the same state for whose rearma- 
ment it offers the basic pretext). What distinguishes democra- 
cies from nondemocracies in the current, well-nigh universal 
regime of the authoritarian state is precisely the passive acqui- 
escence offered by the apathy of the citizens of the former: the 



49 The Antinomies 



whole standing as a kind of textbook illustration of Samuel 
Huntington's dictum that it is impossible for the state to 
function in circumstances of excessive democracy and popular 
participation. 

I want to suggest that these purely political and social 
developments are also accompanied by a recrudescence of 
naturalism and in particular of older ideologies of human 
nature as such: so that it is historically fitting — as incongruous 
as that may otherwise seem — that they should chronologically 
accompany the awakening of an ecological politics equally 
committed to a revival of the concept Nature. For the authori- 
tarian regimes today are based on at least a grudging consent, 
a deep instinctive feeling that law and order must be the first 
priority, along with "fiscal restraint," and that a certain firm- 
ness is necessary — rthat it is worth buying a prosperity insepa- 
rable from order at the price of political freedoms of more 
participatory and also anarcho-libidinal kinds; that, while we 
have lost all belief in charismatic leaders, we are also willing 
to shed our earlier anti-authoritarianism and to learn to be 
obedient to the most unprepossessing and improbable political 
officials. Such regimes, which it may not be inappropriate to 
characterize as neo-Confucian, not merely for their respect for 
order and their practices of obedience but also for their will- 
ingness to rethink the relationship between family and morality 
and political conditions as such, finally prove to be based on a 
renewed conception of human nature as something sinful and 
aggressive that demands to be held in check for its own good 
(and for that of those who govern it); power here coming to 
be justified in the name of a doctrine of the secret will to 
power of all ameliorative social movements. Even the left — 
certainly the liberal center — has largely capitulated to the 
resignation of this disabused view of the human animal, of 
which then the 1960s and their aftermath become retroactively 
the exemplification and the cause, the proof and the horrible 
object lesson: permissiveness, sexual fungibility, drugs, the 



Postmodernitj 50 



repudiation of the family and authority, the purest anarchist 
enthusiasm for a boundless freedom and for the limitless possi- 
bilities of the Utopian condition to which human beings might 
raise themselves if given half a chance — all that is now read as 
the fundamental root cause of the disorder, revolt, violence, 
hatred, social disintegration, and even budgetary excess we 
now experience and from which the new neo-Confucian natu- 
ralism promises to extricate us. 

But it is surely the other way round! For it was precisely 
the failure of the sixties movements that resulted in the return 
of these older beliefs about the limits and the sinfulness of a 
mortal human nature. This is not to suggest that any of the 
political movements that emerged in the 1960s were unflawed: 
most were excessive, ideological ill-conceived, and poorly 
executed, with insufficient leadership, dogmatic attitudes, mis- 
placed hopes, characterological deficiencies, let alone the im- 
perfections of the terrain and the overwhelming power of the 
enemy's productive infrastructure. But the enthusiasm raised 
by such movements individually and suffusing the period gen- 
erally was in itself a powerful and objective force whose 
absolute disappointment could not but have objective conse- 
quences in its own right: the ossification of the new states 
that emerged from the great wars of national liberation, the 
capitulation of most Western social democratic governments 
to business as usual, the sinking of the communist regimes of 
the Brezhnev period into the "era of stagnation" — all this, 
followed by the reemergence of a new high-tech multinational 
capital, could not but document the feeling that human beings 
are incapable of collective achievement or individual change 
and underwrite a conviction that some essential human nature, 
of a limited and ungrateful sort, is necessarily to blame for 
these irreversible setbacks. 

So it is that the end of modernism is accompanied not 
merely by postmodernism but also by a return of the aware- 
ness of nature in both senses: ecologically, in the deplorable 



c| The Antinomies 



3 



conditions in which the technological search for profits has left 
the planet, and humanly, in the disillusionment with people's » 
capacity to change, to act, or to achieve anything substantive j$ 
in the way of collective praxis. ^ 

But it may be self-defeating to insist on the demonic side of 
this belief in human nature, which knows a more benign and 
familiar version that may not so often be identified with the 
more religious form, but that no less posits the human animal 
as a creature of immeasurable violence that demands domesti- 
cation and control, and institutions of restraint that offer carrot 
and stick in equal measure. Indeed, it was not until the 
reconquest of Eastern Europe revived many of these same 
arguments and figures, the burden of a rhetoric now some 
three hundred years old, that we heard again such language 
about the peaceful effects of trade and commerce, and the role 
of the market in reducing the great precapitalist passions to 
manageable needs and demands and in instituting the stabilities 
of a "civil society" (which is itself little better than a mediated 
translation of "burgerliche Gesellschaft") . We must confront 
these old arguments, as A. O. Hirschman has systematically 
done, in order to grasp the degree to which market rhetoric 
generally is also based on a conception of the sinfulness and 
aggressivity of human nature that can alone be balanced and 
tamed by an equally natural propensity of human beings to do 
business and to make money. The market and its arguments 
are thus something like the final form of this postmodern 
naturalism: both an essentialism and a foundationalism, the 
market offers the spectacle of a whole postmodern metaphysic, 
which contrasts oddly with the desacralization commerce and 
nascent capitalism were so often thought to have brought to 
the older feudal society. 

But this is surely a foundation like any other, and Rorty is 
very clear that Kant's attempt to ground epistemology on the 
limits of the human mind was no less foundational than the 
Promethean spirit with which his predecessor Descartes 



Postmodernity 52 



launched the whole enterprise. We must therefore remain 
surprised by the coexistence of these two seemingly incompat- 
ible movements of the age: the one implacably hostile to 
natural remnants and the survival of any forms of naturality, 
the other only too receptive to a renewed sense of nature and 
limit, however grounded that may be in defeat and disillusion. 
My argument will not mean much unless we agree that we 
postmodern people are capable of entertaining both these 
attitudes, both these forms of doxa, simultaneously, with no 
sense of their incongruity, let alone their logical incompatibil- 
ity. To be sure, it will also carry no conviction if relations of 
implication (of whatever kind) are made between these posi- 
tions, which might, for example, be seen as complementing 
each other— so that antifoundationalism comes into being in 
specific opposition to the resurgence of the various natural- 
isms. Or a deeper symptomal link might be argued, in which 
antifoundationalism is itself an expression of the same disillu- 
sionment as the naturalisms have been argued to be. But both 
these readings seem to me ways of somehow "solving" the 
antinomy and reducing it to manageable and nonscandalous 
proportions. Perhaps, at the end of nature, we would do 
better to intensify it for another moment and to inspect it for 
signs of paralyzed energies, and as an emblem of enforced 
stasis, of contraries unable to enter into antagonistic contact 
and thereby to develop themselves. At any rate, in a final 
moment antinomies will be detected at the very heart of that 
stasis itself, in the general repudiation of the political with 
which postmodernity has so often been reproached (or glori- 
fied). V 6 



4 

Utopia was always an ambiguous ideal, urging some on to 
desperate and impossible realizations about which it reassured 
the others that they could never come into being in the first 



53 The Antinomies 



place: so it whipped the passionate and the dogmatic into a 
frenzy while plunging the liberal lukewarm into an immobiliz- 
ing intellectual comfort. The result is that those who desire 
action are able to repudiate the Utopian with the same deci- 
siveness as those who desire no action; the converse obviously 
also being true. 

It would seem that the times are propitious for anti-Utopi- 
anism; and, particularly in Eastern Europe, but washing all the 
way back over the reactionary revisions of the French Revolu- 
tion that have momentarily gained currency in Western Eu- 
rope, the critique and diagnosis of the evils of the Utopian 
impulse has become a boom industry. It is a critique com- 
pounded of Edmund Burke and of the nineteenth-century 
additions (which we have wrongly come to think of as 
Nietzschean, whereas they represent only the most derivative 
side of his thought, soaked up from standard counterrevolu- 
tionary doxa), in which Jacobinism is seen as a form of ressenti- 
ment (and most frequently the ressentiment of intellectuals) that 
expresses itself in a rage to destroy. As for Utopia, it is not so 
secretly supposed to manifest a will to power over all those 
individuals for whom you are plotting an ironclad collective 
happiness, and the diagnosis thereby, in most recent times, 
acquires a bad aesthetic dimension, as most dramatically in 
Boris Groys's remarkable Gesamtkunstwerk Stalin, where the 
dictator is identified as the greatest of modern Utopians and 
more specifically as a modernist in state-craft, whose monu- 
mental "Soviet Union" is as grand a conception as Finnegans 
Wake or A la recherche du temps perdu. 

At this point, then, anti-Utopianism meets postmodernism, 
or at least the implacable postmodern critique of high modern- 
ism itself as repressive, totalizing, phallocentric, authoritarian, 
and redolent of an even more sublime and inhuman hubris 
than anything Burke could have attributed to his Jacobin con- 
temporaries. This inevitable but genial next step, then, coordi- 
nates current political doxa with postcontemporary aesthetic 



Postmodernitj 54 



attitudes that have coexisted with the former without ever 
being completely integrated into a new ideological system. 
Thus, we find expressed a very old (but hitherto Western) 
Cold- War and, as we have just seen, market rhetoric about 
hubris and human sinfulness (our old friend human nature 
again) rehearsed with a view toward the dangers involved in 
trying to create anything like a new society from scratch, and 
vividly warning of the Burkean Jacobinism and the Stalinism 
implicit and inevitable in any Utopian effort to create a new 
society, or even in any fantasy of doing so. Socialism takes too 
many evenings, as Oscar Wilde put it; people cannot stand the 
sustained demands of the political absolute, their human frailty 
then calling forth the violence of the Jacobin- Stalinist state as it 
tried to bully them into sustaining this impossible momentum. 
Artistic modernism is then the expression of this same will to 
power in the imaginary, in the absence of state power or of 
the deed: and Le Corbusier will bully his clients into a healthy 
and strenuous high-modern life style with much the same ob- 
sessive single-mindedness, while, with more subtle Nietz- 
schean dissimulations and indirections, Joyce or Mallarme will 
try imperiously to appropriate their readers' existential time 
by way of a commitment to interminable exegesis and a quasi- 
religious adulation. Perhaps it is too soon to add that diagnoses 
like these are most often mirror images, denunciations of 
ressentiment most often flung down by people themselves genu- 
inely eaten away by resentments; all the more is this the case 
with images of political commitment such as those vehiculated 
by revolutionary and Utopian sympathies, which seem to have 
a remarkable power of stimulating guilt feelings in the non- or 
no longer political people who contemplate them. 

On the other hand, I want to go further than this here and 
to argue — as the fourth of my antinomies — that the most 
powerful arguments against Utopia are in reality Utopian ones, 
expressions of a Utopian impulse qui s 'ignore. If indeed one 
believes that the Utopian desire is everywhere, and that some 



55 The Antinomies 



individual or pre -individual Freudian libido is enlarged and 
completed by a realm of social desire, in which the longing for 
transfigured collective relationships is no less powerful and 
omnipresent, then it can scarcely be surprising that this partic- 
ular political unconscious is to be identified even there where 
it is the most passionately decried and denounced. But that is 
not exactly the argument I want to make here, since what is 
everywhere is just about as good as what is nowhere (the inner 
name, by the way, of our curious topic). 

I also want to caution about the facile deployment of the 
opposition between Utopia and dystopia: these formal or ge- 
neric concepts, which have become current since science fic- 
tion seem to lend themselves to a relatively simple play ol 
oppositions in which the enemies of Utopia can easily be 
sorted out from its friends-Orwell being sent over to that 
corner Morris to this one, while some of them (Wells him- 
self for example) spend their whole lives vacillating between 
the' poles like tender and tough, or hawks and doves. The 
more dramatic intervention comes then when a Deleuze, ex- 
amining a similar time-honored opposition, in that case called 
sadism and masochism, unexpectedly concludes that they are 
not opposites and in reality have nothing to do with each 
other (the sadist, Deleuze concludes, is not really the one the 
masochist seeks and would not participate in the latter s game 
in any very satisfying way; the reverse also being true in the 
present instance). I should like to disjoin the pair Utopia/ 
dystopia in much the same definitive way (although it is proba- 
bly a more complicated operation): it is not merely that the 
pleasures of the nightmare-evil monks, gulags, police 
states-have little enough to do with the butterfly tempera- 
ment of great Utopians like Fourier, who are probably not 
intent on pleasures at all but rather on some other form ot 
gratification. 

A little more to the point is the secondary formal observa- 
tion that the dystopia is generally a narrative, which happens 



of Postmodernity 56 



to a specific subject or character, whereas the Utopian text is 
mostly nonnarrative and, I would like to say, somehow with- 
out a subject-position, although to be sure a tourist-observer 
flickers through its pages and more than a few anecdotes are 
disengaged. On my view (but in this form it is a mere opin- 
ion), the dystopia is always and essentially what in the language 
of science -fiction criticism is called a "near-future" novel: it 
tells the story of an imminent disaster — ecology, overpopula- 
tion, plague, drought, the stray comet or nuclear accident — 
waiting to come to pass in our own near future, which is fast- 
forwarded in the time of the novel (even if that be then 
subsequently disguised as some repressive society galactic ages 
away from us). But the Utopian text does not tell a story at 
all; it describes a mechanism or even a kind of machine, it 
furnishes a blueprint rather than lingering upon the kinds of 
human relations that might be found in a Utopian condition or 
imagining the kinds of living we wish were available in some 
stable well-nigh permanent availability; although the great 
Utopians did that too, notoriously (again, like Fourier above 
all, who is by way of being the compleat Utopist, the Platonic 
idea of the Utopian imaginer) reaping the occasional pastoral 
reward of this or that scene, this or that innocent or not-so- 
innocent pleasure. Mostly, however, they carefully noted 
down the precise mechanisms whose construction alone would 
render those relations and pleasures, those scenes, possible. 
For the ideals of Utopian living involve the imagination in a 
contradictory project, since they all presumably aim at illus- 
trating and exercizing that much-abused concept of freedom 
that, virtually by definition and in its very structure, cannot be 
defined in advance, let alone exemplified: if you know already 
what your longed-for exercise in a not-yet-existent freedom 
looks like, then the suspicion arises that it may not really 
express freedom after all but only repetition; while the 
fear of projection, of sullying an open future with our own 
deformed and repressed social habits in the present, is a 



The Antinomies 



perpetual threat to the indulgence of fantasies of the future 
collectivity. 

All authentic Utopias have obscurely felt this deeper ngural 
difficulty and structural contradiction, however much their 
various authors, like Fourier himself, longed to give us a 
picture of what they thought life really ought to be like (and 
to watch our sympathetic astonishment and admiration); they 
have for the most part rigorously restricted their textual pro- 
duction to a very different kind of operation, namely the 
construction of material mechanisms that would alone enable 
freedom to come into existence all around them. The mecha- 
nism itself has nothing to do with freedom, except to release 
it; it exists to neutralize what blocks freedom, such as matter, 
labor, and the requirements of their accompanying human 
social machinery (such as power, training and discipline, en- 
forcement, habits of obedience, respect, and so forth). 

Indeed, qua mechanism, the Utopian machine may be ex- 
pected to absorb all that unfreedom into itself, to concent-ate 
it where it can best be worked over and controlled: mecha- 
nism and the machine always functioning in classical philosoph- 
ical ideology as somehow the opposite of spirit and freedom, 
which then equally classically and ideologically becomes char- 
acterized in idealistic or spiritualistic terms, so that its rhetoric 
inevitably tends toward a kind of angelism. Thus the Utopian 
mechanism by embodying the necessary— labor, constraint, 
matter— in absolute and concentrated form, by way of its very 
existence, allows a whole range of freedoms to flourish outside 
of itself. 

It is a process that can be emblematized allegorically by the 
treatment of the elevator and the city grid in Rem Koolhaas' 
Delirious New York, which poses among other things the prob- 
lem of Necessity in terms of the component of engineering 
technology, what has to be included in the building but can 
neither be made symbolic nor can it be sublimated (as in the 
sentimentalism of the Hyatt gondola elevators that weightlessly 



of Postmodernity 5* 



rise and fall in perpetual motion). For Koolhaas, however that 
enormous bulk of pi pes and wiring that takes up 40 percent 
of the modern building (and that can only exceptionally be 
ornamentalized as in the Pompidou Center's exoskeleton) 
stands as a foreign body unassailable to praxis or poesis one 
that must be dealt with in new ways yet to be invented (what 
is necessary in the work of art, said Valery, is what can never 
be redeemed in value). Delirious New York stages one kind of 
solution on the urban level by designating the invention of the 
elevator ( m mid-nineteenth century) and that of the Manhattan 
city gnd (in the plan of 181 1) as mechanisms that concentrate 
this necessity into a single structure and condense it, like some 
consolidation of a variety of debts that leaves you only a single 
bill to pay. These twin vertical and horizontal mechanisms 
then release all the delirious freedom of New York to develop 
around themselves: they stand as the price to be paid for- 
matter and materiality (if not mortality itself), the minimum 
work time, as Marx said, beyond which the "realm of freedom- 
comes into view. The Utopian text, then, takes such mecha- 
nisms as its object of representation, and in that sense counter- 
texts about terrifying machines— Kafka's infernal machine in 
The Penal Colony, or Platonov's Foundation Pit-are structural 
inversions of Utopia in the strict sense and are formally quite 
different from the dystopian narrative as such. (The latter 
may well, however, include the contradiction between its 
own logic and that of inverted Utopias: as in 1984 where 
the premise— that no science or real thinking is possible— is 
contradicted by the sheerly scientific perfection of the anti- 
Utopian machinery of state surveillance that is then pressed 
into service as a causal explanation for just that dystopian state 
ot affairs in which no science is possible.) 

These mechanisms can reach states of extreme elaboration 
as in Fourier's complex series and the astronomical combina- 
tions he lays down for them; but they all in one way or another 
conform to Marx's political program in Capital, namely to 



59 The Antinomies 



demonstrate that socialism is not an imagined figment but 
obeys the laws of nature and is a reality, like mass or energy, 
like gravity or the table of the elements. What is misleading 
(and thereby seems anti- Utopian) is Marx's manner of demon- 
strating this, which involves showing that socialism is already 
coming into being in the interstices of capitalism itself, as 
increased cooperative or collective labor, larger and larger 
impersonal combinations and work or production units, post- 
individual forms of ownership, and so on (all of which is even 
truer in our own time than in his); but his objection that the 
Utopians themselves were not sufficiently concerned with the 
implementation and realization of their projects is only true 
politically and not socially or ontologically. Fourier never 
thought in terms of political revolution, he was indeed pro- 
foundly anti-Jacobin in his opinions and could only imagine the 
intervention of the famous Benefactor in the implementation 
of the phalanx; yet everything in Fourier is marshalled to 
demonstrate that Utopianism is in nature, so to speak, and 
that the various forms of human collectivity from the smallest 
to the largest imaginable tend by way of their own inner 
momentum toward an "association" that is somehow the onto- 
logical law of the universe. This is therefore at least one sense 
in which Fourier understood that his representations had to be 
realistic, had to appeal to Being rather than to imagination, 
and had to be based on empirically existing phenomena that it 
only required a new kind of poetic vision to see in the world 
around us. Marx himself is meanwhile Utopian in precisely the 
separation of the realms of Necessity and Freedom which has 
already been referred to, and which sketches out a classic 
mechanism whereby labor can be reduced drastically and the 
law of Value (at best, in Marx, an idealistic, fetishistic, spiritu- 
alistic principle of "objective appearance or illusion") replaced 
by more material calculations. 

To evoke such Utopian mechanisms, however, where the 
part of Necessity is invested in whatever ingenious machinery 



Postmodernity 60 



m order to liberate the space that has been emptied and 
punned of it, is suddenly to recognize another familiar con- 
temporary ideologeme, namely the market itself, the central 
exhibit in the anti-Utopian arsenal. For the exchange mecha- 
nisms of the market very precisely constitute an organization 
of necessity, a sum of purely mechanical requirements, which 
at least according to the theory, is called upon to release 
freedoms a good deal more delirious than anything Koolhaas's 
quasi-surrealist manifesto felt able to attribute to New York 
^ namely the fulfillment of private life along with the 
stabiht.es of representative or parliamentary democracy law 
and order a taming of the human beast, and the lineaments of 
justice itself. However base the uses of market rhetoric today 
and however baleful its effect in places like Eastern Europe it 
may be the best policy rather to acknowledge these Utopian 
dimensxons forthrightly, to class market fanlies along wiX 
the other glorious Utopian thought-experiments, and thereby 

stoTf V CnSe t ° i enSUre ** rCmainS ' and is -de/ 

stood to be merely a not-place and a nowhere. That the 
celebration of late capitalism is obliged to pass by way of the 
fixation of its opposite number, Utopian discourse,^ to 
use the weapons of its arch adversary in order to glorify itself 
and spread its very different message, is a first conference of 
the antinomy I had it in mind to outline here 

But that antinomy can also be approached by way of the 
critique of Utopias and it is perhaps^orthwhil/now^o tl 
Ais path on the other side of things, in order to see whethe 
it does not Jo lead us back to some central place To be 
sure, it is difficult to separate the intellectual repudiation of 
Utopia which itself knows an exoteric as well as'an esoter* 
form, from a fear of Utopia, which is a thoroughgoing anxiety 
m the face of everything we stand to lose in the^ouL of ll 
momentous a transformation that-even in imagination ^ 
can be thought to leave little intact of current passfons, habit 
practices, and values. Indeed, such anxieties, which are ba s d 



6l The Antinomies 



on the difficulties and paradoxes involved in leaping from one 
system to a radically different one (even in imagination) go 
some way toward justifying the charge of ressentiment that we 
have seen leveled against Utopians by the counterrevolutionary 
tradition: for in fact there is little within our system to moti- 
vate so absolute a change, and it is inevitable that the motiva- 
tions that can be thus isolated, and that link the values present 
in the old system with the changes presented by the new one, 
are bound to appear as a wilful lust for destruction and change 
at any price. In this respect, it is revealing to transfer to the 
collective level Sartre's luminous outline of the structural 
difficulties faced by an individual in willing a change from one 
absolute or originary choice of being to another, and to medi- 
tate Sartre's conclusion that, in this situation, the concept of 
willpower is meaningless. Thus the imagination of Utopia is 
bound to be a stereoptic affair, which places the Utopian 
fantasist in two distinct worlds at the same time and generates 
a unique kind of discomfort by the seemingly irreconcilable 
demands it makes to disengage absolutely from what is at the 
same time that one cleaves absolutely to the being of the world 
as some ultimate limit. 

There is, I think, no more pressing task for progressive 
people in the First World than tirelessly to analyze and diag- 
nose the fear and anxiety before Utopia itself: this relatively 
introspective and self-critical process need not wait on the 
emergence of new visions of the future, such as are bound to 
appear when the outlines of the new global order and its 
postnational class system have become stabilized. There is a 
collective therapy to be performed on the victims of depolitici- 
zation themselves, a rigorous look at everything we fantasize 
as mutilating, as privative, as oppressive, as mournful and 
depressing, about all the available visions of a radical transfor- 
mation in the social order. My sense is that such feelings, 
which in their ensemble make up that amorphous yet real and 
active fact that is anti-Utopianism, do not really spring from 



Postmbdernity 62 



profound personal happiness and gratification or fulfillment in 
the present but serve merely to block the experience of 
present dissatisfaction in such a way that logically "satisfaction" 
is the only judgment that can be drawn by a puzzled observer 
from whom the deeper unconscious evidence has been with- 
held. 

Yet, apart from the political fatigue and demoralization of 
people today around the world, it is not easy to see what 
positive values are available to fuel an anti-Utopian market 
rhetoric: the space into which a postpolitical collectivity is 
supposed to withdraw — nowadays anachronistically celebrated 
under the rubric of a civil society that has long since ceased to 
exist in the advanced capitalist countries — is vacuous and ut- 
terly colonized by consumption and its codes and languages. It 
is a negative result of the fulfillment of Marx's prophecy about 
increasing collectivization that this process has displaced the 
last remnants of existential experience in what used to be the 
private sphere, translating formerly private initiatives into so 
many allusions to corporate products and so many simulated 
conducts and desires suggested by advertising images. Tradi- 
tional images of the family (as of other forms of traditional 
life) scarcely hold any attraction for the subjects of a postmo- 
dernity, who are able to fantasize private life only collectively, 
as new kinds of tribal networks and organized hobbies, which 
must, however, in order to distinguish them from other, 
similar social structures, be marked as nonofficial and non- 
public. 

But this precisely sets us on the track of the most powerful 
drive in contemporary ideology, for which anything labeled as 
public has become irredeemably tainted, everything that 
smacks of the institution arouses distaste and repels in a sub- 
liminal, well-nigh Pavlovian fashion, anything construed as 
representing the state and the satellite institutions that sur- 
round it is at once marked negatively and vigorously repudi- 
ated: something state power itself attempts to recuperate by 



63 The Antinomies 



associating it with American frontier cultural traditions and 
individualism (with which, given the absolute breaks in con- 
temporary historical experience, it cannot possibly have any^ 
thing to do save by virtue of images and suggestivity) and 
thereby endowing it with a national ethos that can be mobi- 
lized against other national traditions. But this anti-institu- 
tionalism can only secondarily be identified as antisociahst or 
anti-Stalinist, since the more fundamental object at which it is 
directed is corporate capitalism itself, with its sterile language 
and made-up structures, its invented hierarchies and simulated 
psychologies. This is the only experience people in the West 
have had of omnipotent and impersonal power structures, and 
it is an experience over which late capitalism works, far more 
subtly and shrewdly than any left or populist movements, 
systematically redirecting such energies against fantasies of big 
government'' and "bureaucracy," as though the corporations 
were not themselves the fundamental site of everything bu- 
reaucratic in First World capitalist countries. Meanwhile, the 
positive features of older class bureaucracies— the ethics of 
service in the great feudal bureaucracies; those of enlighten- 
ment in the bourgeois era, such as for the teachers of the 
Third Republic; those of social service in contemporary 
America-are systematically vilified and obscured in current 
propaganda, so that anyone happening upon Max Weber s 
observation that bureaucracy is the most modern form of 
social organization can only be stunned and puzzled by so 
bizarre and perverse a reflection (which comes in any case out 
of a distant and foreign past). But this is the way in which the 
hatred of genuinely antisocial and alienated structures such as 
those of the great corporations today-a revulsion that might 
ordinarily be expected to fuel the production of properly 
Utopian meditations and fantasies-is redirected against Uto- 
pia itself, where it is accompanied by all the properly Utopian 
fantasies of gratification and consumption that market society 
is capable of generating (fantasies about which I have tried to 



Postmodernity 64 



show in Postmodernism; or, The Cultural Logic of Late Capitalism 
that they are themselves anything but materialist in the bodily 
sense, turning essentially and formally, on reined images of 
capitalist distribution proper). 

As for the more esoteric form taken by the resistance to 
Utopia, and in particular its more highly intellectualized ver- 
sions, in which what is at stake are misconceptions of "totaliza- 
tion" and reifications of the theme of power and domination, 
it is important to reintroduce here the dynamics of the various 
groups, since unlike corporate or hegemonic propaganda, left 
or radical theory by definition legitimates itself by the claim to 
"represent" this or that collectivity (or at least to speak in 
fellow-traveling sympathy as it were alongside it). This funda- 
mentally collective identification and grounding of the anti- 
Utopian position already suggests deeper contradictions in such 
arguments where they are not finally mere echoes of liberal, 
individualist, antipolitical positions. 

An essential seriality of small group politics must also be 
invoked here, and a serial effect whereby each group, wielding 
all the while its own specific form of influence and prestigeful 
intimidation, simultaneously imagines itself to be a minority 
oppressed by another group (which feels the same way). Thus, 
to take the most grotesquely illustrative example, the white 
male majority develops its self-consciousness as a group by 
way of the feeling that it is an embattled minority tyrannized 
over by marginals who impose their own cultural values on it. 
Such plays of mirror reflections and projections clearly call 
out, not for further analyses of power and domination but 
rather for a psychopathology of the illusions of power and of 
the ways in which the media entertain and develop such 
illusions and projections in a kind of infinite regress (it is a 
phenomenon Sartre began to describe under the term seriality 
used above). 

My own sense is that group politics only begin to evolve in 
a radical direction when the various groups all arrive at the 



65 The Antinomies 



common problem and necessity of their strategic interrelation- 
ships, something for which any number of historic terms are 
available from Gramsci's "historic bloc" through alliance poli- 
tics to the "popular front" of "marginalities" currently proposed 
by "queer theory." Only caricatural memories of specific mo- 
ments of Stalinism encourage the belief that the concept of 
totalization means repressing all these group differences and 
reorganizing their former adherents into some ironclad mili- 
tary or party formation for which the time-honored stereotypi- 
cal adjective always turns out to be "monolithic"; on the 
contrary, on any meaningful usage-that is to say, one for 
which totalization is a project rather than the word for an 
already existent institution-the project necessarily means the 
complex negotiation of all these individual differences and has 
perhaps best been described, for our generation, by Laclau and 
Mouffe in their book, Hegemony and Socialist Strategy, which its 
authors, however, believe to be directed against totalization 
as such. In any case, nowhere have such dilemmas of in- 
tergroup relations and of the agonizing adjustments that blocs 
or popular fronts impose been more insistently represented 
and reflected upon than in the Utopian tradition, whose high 
point in Fourier unfolds a panoply of complex intergroup 
articulations of a mathematical density that leaves Laclau and 
Mouffe's shorter articulated chains far behind. Fourier j ; is 
then totalization at its most inspired, and on a grand scale (but 
see also Kim Stanley Robinson's Mars trilogy, which will 
surely be the great political novel of the 1 99 os and the place in 
which the interrelations of the various radical or revolutionary 
groups have been most vividly rehearsed for our own time). 

More needs to be said, however, about the structural ? ecu- 
harities of a politics of difference that is also frequently called 
the politics of identity: more is at stake here than some 
mere definition by negation and the inevitable production of 
difference by way of multiple group identities Rather 1 think 
it can be affirmed that a politics of difference does not become 



Postmodernity 66 



possible until a considerable degree of social standardization 
comes into being, that is to say, until universal identity is 
largely secured. The genuine, radical difference that holds 
between Columbus and the peoples he encountered can never 
be articulated into a politics: at best an enslavement, at worst 
a genocide, and occasionally something like a compassionate 
attempt at an impossible tolerance (which is itself a form of 
patronizing condescension). The social revolution of our time, 
Marx affirmed, is predicated on the universalization of the 
feeling of equivalence and the irrepressible demands for equal- 
ity that such juridical equivalence ends up producing; in this 
he was joined by all the counterrevolutionary thinkers, who 
saw one thing clearly, namely that "democracy" in this sense — 
the radical demand for equality — was the most damaging of all 
threats to social order as it has been able to be maintained in 
modern societies. It is on the basis of that Identity alone that 
Difference can be productively transformed into a political 
program; whether that program can coordinate the demand 
for equality with the affirmation of a separatist cultural identity 
(= difference) remains to be seen. But the reversible dynamics 
of these binary abstractions are surely not a very promising 
starting point for such a program. 

Now we need to take yet another step further back, and 
look into the Utopian vocation of the individual small group 
movements themselves, as they attempt to define themselves 
against the larger hegemonic structures by identifying what is 
often imperfectly called a group or collective "identity" in a 
specific tradition of oppression and in a (necessarily con- 
structed) historical past. It is an identity that must be based 
fully as much on solidarity as on alienation or oppression, and 
it necessarily feeds on those images of primitive or tribal 
cohesion which were however always the spiritual property of 
the Utopian tradition proper: what was once called "primitive 
communism," what is refracted out culturally in pictures of 
the horde or the clan, the gens, the village, even the manorial 



6j The Antinomies 



familY _whatever collective structures seem to resist the ano- 
S of the modern industrial state and to offer some neg£v 
Za critical power over against the larger and more Effuse 
demographies in which the group's current oppression is pac- 

^ But this insistence on the value of the small group itself- 
J2 found its first theorist in Rousseau-is me libidina 
Tountinhead of all Utopian imagination, ^ *^ 
problems it raises for a reconceptuahzation of Utopia under 
contemporary circumstances (including the critique of Rous- 
eTu himself) For it would be illogical to insist on the Utopian 
relent of other kinds of political passions-^ appropna- 
„f * rhetoric of collectivity by fascism or the other 
"ht-wing t^ents, the identification of those collective 
mpulses that inform the various mystiques of modern profe - 
Xna sm from male bonding all the way to English depart- 
without ma*ng an equal place for the ^ us or 
unconscious role of a deeper Utopmnism in the dynamics 

^ofdl^ke much sense to redefine mis particular 
anti Utopianism in terms of the historic opposition of anar- 
ch m to either "the desire called Marx" or the jacobin trad, 
tVth^as known political embodiment 
all the way down to the Soviet revolution), since this very 
^pudiatJ of centralism and statism is if 
expression of the Utopianism it imagines itself to be denounc 
AtTnv rate enough has been said to justify the conclusion 
Tatl aC'or operative political anti-Utopianism (those 
wlh are not mere liberalism in disguise) must sooner or later 
^veal itself as a vibrant form of Utopianism m !ts own nghti 
This is the final form of the antinomy that it has been the ann 
of this section to argue. 

A first conclusion to be drawn from these 
whole range of current doxa about contemporary thought 



of Postmodernity 68 



political opinion is not merely feeble but utterly ill-conceived. 
We are not at all today beyond the old oppositions of left and 
right, nor is this a period in which all the old alliances and 
affiliations have been abandoned for new and perhaps more 
mobile ones; nor is this particular "end of ideology" any more 
durable than its short-lived avatar in the Eisenhower era, 
which was followed by the most politicized era in modern 
American social history. What such characterizations are trying 
to deal with — where they are not simply and basely manipu- 
lated by the intent to neutralize future political possibilities at 
the source— is rather the paralysis of postmodern thinking by 
the structure of the antinomy as that has been outlined here, 
which confronts thought with a static reversal and repetition 
in which identity turns into difference, and difference back 
into identity in an unproductive way that can understandably 
lead some people to abandon theoretical work altogether (and 
it is equally certain that the present situation has seen a 
movement of backlash and traditionalism against all the theo- 
retical investigations released by that transition to postmoder- 
nity that required such traditional formulations to be reconcep- 
tualized in the first place). 

I warned at the outset of this exploration that the antinomy 
is by definition more capable of figuration and representation 
than the contradiction: which is to say that it is easier to lay 
out the pattern effects we have offered as our exhibits here 
qua effects than it is to offer any satisfying account of the 
causes they must be thought to imply. Everyone surely feels 
instinctively that these new types of thinking, these new and 
urgent anomalies in which we are gripped, as in a riptide or 
galactic time warp, are at one with what we call the postmod- 
ern, and that their historic originality has something to do with 
the mechanisms of late capitalism as such. But this feeling is by 
way of a preliminary working hypothesis, rather than any 
substantive conclusion: the way in which the connection might 
be dramatized— homology, mediation, participation, symp- 



69 The Antinomies 



to m is very far from being evident; it leads one naturally 

enough to some preliminary consideration of the problem 
itself, as an indirect way of solving something that cannot be 
mastered head-on. 

The analogy with the modern sciences, however, offers a 
loose way of grasping the representational problem as it were 
from the outside, in the absence of its resolution: we are 
told that Newton's laws still hold, after Einstein's conceptual 
revolution, but that their application has been found to be 
structurally diminished and to apply to but a small corner, a 
small room, of the totality that Einstein found the universe to 
be. Newtonian law would then govern the realm of appearance 
of our own historical world and lived experience — an objec- 
tive appearance to be sure, and very far from being mere 
error or superstition — while Einstein's hypotheses designate 
something beyond our reach that we can reconstruct only by 
allowing for the palpable distortion of our own coordinates. 
This is a lesson in the philosophically correct use of the 
concept of totality, as something that by definition we cannot 
know rather than as some privileged form of epistemological 
authority some people are trying to keep for themselves, 
with a view toward enslaving others (the old Enlightenment 
conception of religion). It may be presumed that the prodi- 
gious expansion of late capitalism around the globe promotes 
it to this omnipresent yet unknowable status, as' the capital- 
logicians argued twenty years ago: unless, as a totalizing force 
that always had its ultimate horizon in the world market 
(Marx), it always occupied this supreme position we were 
hitherto simply not capable of grasping as such. How then to 
coordinate our very limited positions, as individuals or indeed 
as historical subjects and classes, within a History whose dy- 
namics representationally escape us? The lesson was given as 
far back as Spinoza, surely the most dramatic of all the thinkers 
of totality, when he recommended a kind of stoic adjustment, 
as a part or component, to that immense whole of being or 



Postmodernity JO 



nature of which we are the merest partial reflexes; it was then 
reinvented by the practical side of Freudian psychoanalysis, not 
as a cure, but as an adjustment of our self-knowledge in the 
light of the impossibility of the cure itself— the passionate 
choice of and cleaving to what Zizek has called the Symptom. 
Nor is Tolstoy far from this kind of political wisdom when he 
sardonically shows the greatest of world-historical leaders in 
the process of running to stay in the same place and affirming 
the inevitable and the inescapable as though it were precisely 
their own strategies. Yet none of these visions constitutes a 
resignation to necessity exactly; each one posits a certain 
wisdom in this process of epistemological adjustment, from 
which alone whatever praxis it is given us to exercise may 
eventually come. 

So one may suppose that the acknowledgement of the 
antinomies of the postmodern is not a self-defeating exercise 
in futility or nihilism but is bound to have unconscious results, 
of which we can now guess little. I have already suggested that 
the thinking of totality itself— the urgent feeling of the pres- 
ence all around us of some overarching system that we can at 
least name— has the palpable benefit of forcing us to conceive 
of at least the possibility of other alternate systems, something 
we can now identify as our old friend Utopian thinking. Of 
the antinomies, perhaps we can conclude a bit more, namely 
that their ceaseless alternation between Identity and Difference 
is to be attributed to a blocked mechanism, whereby in our 
episteme these categories fail to develop, fail to transform 
themselves by way of their own interaction, as they have 
seemed able to do in other moments of the past (and not only 
in the Hegelian dialectic). If so, that blockage can only have 
something to do with the absence of any sense of an immediate 
future and of imaginable change (using this expression in the 
marked signification Raymond Williams gave to the words 
knowable community): for us time consists in an eternal present 
and, much further away, an inevitable catastrophe, these two 



jl The Antinomies 



moments showing up distinctly on the registering apparatus 
without overlapping or transitional stages. It is the next instant 
of time that falls out; we are like people only able to remem- 
ber their distant pasts, who have lost the whole dimension of 
the recent and the most familiar. As much as a cause, indeed, 
this incapacity to imagine change (which itself must be imag- 
ined as the paralysis of one lobe of the collective brain) also 
stands as the very allegory of the dilemmas we have outlined 
here: the Identity of a present confronting the immense un- 
thinkable Difference of an impossible future, these two coex- 
isting like eyeballs that each register a different kind of spec- 
trum. It is a situation that endows the waiting with a kind of 
breathlessness, as we listen for the missing next tick of the 
clock, the absent first step of renewed praxis. 



Utopia, Modernism, and Death 



H 

I— 

<C 



That there is a Third World literature or cul- 
ture has frequently, and probably abusively, 
been said or implied; that the existence of a 
First World culture follows from this has often 
been admitted; but that anything like a Second 
World culture could possibly be conceived of 
has been ignored, if not passionately repudi- 
ated. It seems likely to me, however, that the 
existence of something like a genuine socialist 
culture, a socialist literature based on a socialist 



d Death J4 



characterological and pedagogical formation, will increasingly 
have to be acknowledged, now that socialist institutions and 
property systems (of which a pseudosocialist culture was sup- 
posed to be the merest ideological cover or police directive) 
have everywhere in the Soviet east been rolled back. We will 
begin to discover, indeed we are already doing so, that people 
formed in a nonmarket non-consumer-consumptive society do 
not think like we do. Indeed, if we resist the temptation (now 
everywhere resurgent) to attribute such differences to the old 
stereotypes of nationalism and ethnic peculiarity — here the 
differences in some properly Slavic Weltanschauung — we may 
well even discover the rudiments and the nascent forms of a 
new form of socialist culture that is utterly unlike "socialist 
realism" and intimates some far future of human history the 
rest of us are not in a position to anticipate. 

What human relations might be without commodification, 
what a life world without advertising might look like, what 
narratives would model the lives of people empty of the 
foreign bodies of business and profit— such speculations have 
been entertained from time immemorial by Utopian fantasists 
and lend themselves to at least an a priori, external, and 
purely formalistic characterization. We can, in other words, 
say what a properly Utopian literature might look like even if 
we are utterly incapable of writing one ourselves. But the 
Utopian literature of the past was largely positive, or even 
affirmative (in a bad Frankfurt- School sense); its "dreams of 
rest" (Morris) bore all the earmarks of compensation and 
denial, repressing what its fantasy mechanisms were unable to 
process, leaving out the negative and the body, suffering and 
death, as well as everything that cannot be solved in interper- 
sonal relations. But the truth value of fantasy, the epistemolog- 
ical ban usage or proper use of daydreaming as an instrument 
of philosophical speculation, lies precisely in a confrontation 
with the reality principle itself. The daydream can succeed as 
a narrative, not by successfully eluding or outwitting the 



75 Utopia, Modernism, 

3 
a. 

reality principle but rather by grappling with it, like Jacob s g 
angel, and by triumphantly wresting from it what can precisely £. 
in our or its own time be dreamt and fantasied as such. 

This is perhaps to admit that the deeper truth of the 
daydream lies i n whaUt reveals of the ^reality ^^]nciple_as such 
rather than in whatit tells us about our wish fulfillments: since 
the~whoTe "drama' "of thelatter — as Freud and his hysterics 
taught us — lies in trying to figure out what we really want in 
the first place. In that case, what we are unable to wish or to 
bring to the narrative figuration of the daydream or Utopian 
fantasy is far more significant and symptomatic than the impov- 
erished actually-existing three wishes themselves ("I wish I had 
some nice sausages for lunch!" "Imbecile: I wish they were 
hanging from your nose!" and so on). Historically then, this is 
the sense in which thevoration_of Utopia lies^ in^Mhrre^in 
which its epistem ological value lies in Se waflsit allows us to 
feelaround our nnnds^ the invisible limits it gives us to detect 
byih7eTelTin7uction, the miring of our imaginations in the 
mode of production itself, the mud of the present age in which 
the winged Utopian shoes stick, imagining that to be the force 
of gravity itself. As Louis Marin taught us in his Utopiques, the 
Utopian text really does hold out for us the vivid lesson of 
what we cannot imagine: only it does so not by imagining it 
concretely but rather by way of the holes in the text that are 
our own incapacity to see beyond the epoch and its ideological 
closures. This is the correlative, the obverse and the negative 
side, of Marx's great dictum, which informed his theory and 
his practice for the rest of his life; namely that "the world has 
long since dreamed of something of which it needs only to 
become conscious for it to possess it in reality" (Letter to 
Ruge, September, 1843). Becoming conscious of it, however, 
is also an objective possibility, a property of reality and of the 
current situation, and not something to be achieved by will or 
fiat or by the merest taking of a thought. This is the sense in 
which the very advances in our own system, late capitalism, 



d Death j6 



interpose themselves between ourselves and the future; but for 
an addictive culture such as ours it may be more convenient to 
phrase this in another language and to suggest that it is no easy 
matter to fantasize ourselves as free of our present addictions, 
or to imagine a world without the stimulations that make this 
one livable for us. The attempt at a radically different system 
releases the imagination and the Utopian fantasy in a radically 
different way from our own, one that includes different kinds 
of narrative possibilities. I follow Wallerstein in believing that 
actually existing socialism was not and could never have been 
an alternative system, since at any given moment only one 
world system can hold sway; the various socialisms, rather, 
were antisystemic movements within the force field of a capi- 
talist world system itself; geared for one form of capitalism, 
they were largely undone by its unexpected mutation into a 
different moment, what we now call late capitalism, whose 
new laws and intensities peremptorily disrupted structures 
built only to withstand the more primitive pressures of the 
older moment. What thus obtains was at best the cultural 
anticipation of new superstructural or formal tendencies, in a 
situation in which only the provisional sketch of a new base or 
economic situation can be sustained for a time. 

That culture can thus run on ahead and anticipate the forms 
of future modes of production not yet in existence is a very 
fundamental implication of the old notion of the uneven inter- 
action of base and superstructure that was not generally drawn 
until Jacques Attali's book Noise (Bruits), which asserted not 
merely the elective affinities between music and economics 
but also the capacity of music (in the West) to project stages 
of the socioeconomic not yet concretely developed. But this 
principle demands two restrictions: first, the mediations are 
never given in advance, which accounts for the capacity of a 
form to anticipate future developments in this way (in the 
example of Attali, such a mediation is at least suggested in the 
mathematical kinship of economics and music) . 



77 Utopia, Modernism, 



Second, the Utopian content of a given text in the present 
should never be understood as somehow foreclosing or exclud- 
ing its simultaneous ideological content and function in that 
same present: science and ideology are in other words not 
incompatible, but a scientific proposition can at one and the 
same time be used for ideological purposes, as famously in 
Kepler or Galileo. Indeed, I want to stress an even more 
extreme form of this proposition, namely that in a fallen or 
class society, science, the Utopian, and indeed everything else 
of value, must also and always simultaneously function as an 
ideology There can be no escape from ideology, that is to say 
from our rationalization of the blood guilt of our own position- 
ing and class situation in this society; the moment of truth is 
rare enough and fleeting-moments of personal anxiety and ot 
social crisis about which it must also be affirmed that they 
cannot be retained or built on for any secure and durable kind 
of truth, although they can of course inflect our practice as 
such. In this society, therefore, in this history, all truths are 
also at one and the same time ideological, and should be 
celebrated with the greatest suspicion and vigilance. 

This is also true of those truths formerly called metaphysi- 
cal- in my opinion, they are to be tracked down and unmasked 
today (if any survive), not because of some metaphysical vice 
but rather because they immediately begin to function ideolog- 
ically as well, and because, in the realm of what is sometimes 
called spirituality, it is even harder to disentangle truth from 
ideology than it is on other levels of culture. This is then the 
sense in which I will want to argue that a philosophy like that 
of Heidegger is in our time false and ideological, antipo htica 
when it is not fascist and decisionist, distracting from political 
commitment when it does not encourage a kind of intoxication 
of the petty bourgeois ego with its own spurious grandeur, 
narcissistically obsessed with the self as the vehicle of anxiety 
rather than with the free acts that generate anxiety as such, 
inaccessible to other social classes even where it adopts their 



d Death J8 



motifs (as with the peasantry or Ernst Jiinger's stance on 
industrial labor). 

But I will also want to argue that Heidegger is true, meta- 
physically and in some absolute sense, in our relationship to 
the earth and to our own individual death. Yet that truth is 
not for us, in this society; here it is "merely" metaphysical, 
which is to say ideological; it can become true only in a society 
of the future, in a Utopia in which the function of ideology 
will have been abolished along with the class divisions from 
which it springs. We must therefore be very clever in the way 
in which, today, in this society, we use such anticipatory and 
Utopian materials as those of Heideggerian metaphysics; we 
can neither celebrate their truth as such nor can we leave them 
in the oblivion of metaphysics, which it was their deepest 
mission to detect and point out. We will return to this 
exegetical problem in a moment, after making a connection 
with the previous discussion of Second World literature. 

For even if you grant my speculation that anticipatory 
forms were to have been expected in the literary and cultural 
production of the Second World, even if you can see how 
that might be demonstrated a priori and some empty formal 
descriptions of such Utopian texts worked up in the void and 
offered at least on the mode of logical possibility, it would 
obviously be more satisfying to point to a real book and a 
concrete example. This is unexpectedly what we can now do, 
as though from out of a time capsule in which works whose 
existence was largely unexpected, works that express the 
Utopian energies of the great Soviet cultural revolution of the 
1920s and the ferment and excitement, the well-nigh illimit- 
able formal possibilities, of that period, have suddenly in the 
last fifteen years emerged in the light of day as though only 
just written down. 

This is the great peasant Utopia, Chevengur, composed by 
Andrei Platonov in the years 1927 and 1928, on the eve of 
forced collectivization (in fall 1929), and never published. Bits 
of the novel began to appear in the sixties, a full English 



79 Utopia, Moderni. 



translation appeared in 1978, an incomplete Russian version in 
1972, and a more complete one only in 1988. Platonov is thus 
even for Russian readers a new classic, of whom only a few 
short stories were known in the twenties and thirties. Yet if I 
understand the situation correctly, he has come in the last ten 
years to be endowed with extraordinary aesthetic and moral 
authority— comparable only to the status of Kafka in the West 
(even though there is otherwise virtually no similarity at all 
between Kafka and Platonov)— that is to say as a prophetic 
figure, whose experience is precious and whose forms are 
historically and psychically symptomatic, a writer whose texts 
are the object of a well-nigh religious exegesis from a whole 
range of points of view and interests, whose most minimal 
jottings and notes are of infinite value, and whose form pro- 
duction, although perhaps less aesthetically realized than the 
canonical masterpieces of Proust, Joyce, and Mann, or Bely, 
Mayakovsky, and Blok or Pasternak— and perhaps even consti- 
tutively incomplete and fragmentary— offers the occasion for 
a kind of metaphysical speculation that mere aesthetic objects 
would scarcely encourage. 

Platonov is a great modernist writer, and this characteriza- 
tion now itself effectively complicates our task; since in the 
West modernism is over and our approach to the older classics 
of modernism must necessarily be a mediated and a historicist 
one for which we have as yet worked out few enough historio- 
graphic protocols. It does not seem superfluous to add that in 
the former Soviet Union (although not necessarily in the for- 
mer Soviet east as a whole) modernism is still alive and 
continues to coexist with forms of postmodernism as fresh and 
sassy as anything current in the West. Such "nonsynchronicity 
of the synchronous" (Bloch) is characteristic of the world 
system today as a whole, and I would not want it to be 
understood according to a crude model of stages of develop- 
ment—although it is obvious enough that the presence or 
absence of a postmodern computerized or media infrastructure 
plays some part here in the supercession of an older modernist 



d Death 80 



culture or the simulations of a new and postmodern one. One 
must however also reckon in the intimate relationship between 
Soviet communism itself and older kinds of cultural and aes- 
thetic values which from our vantage point (and despite the 
emblematic status of nineteenth-century ballet) may be largely 
reckoned as modernist in their practice, in ways that have 
vanished from the habits and the memories of most Western 
intellectuals. There may thus be advantages to this peculiarly 
dual situation of Platonov, therefore, as a modernist classic 
that has never been canonized and reified like all the others, 
owing to its miraculous publishing history, and to its status as 
a text first read by the last surviving modernists in world 
culture, over whose shoulders we postmoderns are still in a 
position to peer. 

But as a matter of fact, the added and unexpected complica- 
tion of Platonov 's modernism is not unrelated to the matter of 
metaphysics I have mentioned in connection with Heidegger 
and perhaps complicitous with it in ways that still need to be 
worked out. For one of the fundamental features of modern- 
ism with which it is hard for us to come to terms in a 
postmodern age is very precisely its trans- or even anti-aes- 
thetic vocation — the will of the great modernist works to be 
something more than mere art and to transcend a merely 
decorative and culinary aesthetic, to reach the sphere of what 
is variously identified as the prophetic or the metaphysical, the 
visionary or the cosmic, that realm in which aesthetics and 
ethics, politics and philosophy, religion and pedagogy, all fold 
together into some supreme vocation. This mission of the 
modernist form-production, which might today be described, 
by Luhmann and Habermas, as a kind of de-differentiation, the 
abolition of the increasing levels of differentiation of a complex 
modern industrial society, is to be sure in full postmodernism 
subject to the gravest suspicions and critiques (which I will not 
outline here, but which seem to me as cogent and pertinent as 
the modernist project is itself glorious and admirable). 



81 Utopia, Moderni: 



I think we must remain ambivalent about it but ^ver 
attitude we choose, the historiographs or mdeed rustoncist 
"oblematic of a Gadamer or even a Benjamm — J 
dilemma, which is that of Verstehen or of contact, t^t of the 
mo de of access to an era whose structure of feeling is * leas 
Istantively different from our own. This historic- dikmm 
DO ses itself to be sure, for all the objects of the past, yet 
P p Idolliy it is less evident for many that 
modes of production than our own. It is perhaps because 
Tode—responds to an earlier stage of 
of production, the second or monopoly or imperialist stage ot 
whose third or multinational informal stage 
we C now reached-it is perhaps because we have here 
Thus to be with two distinct moments of the same system- 
h" our problem with the past is sharpened and made to seem 
more paradoxical and even scandalous. That we have such 
problem with the modern seems to me however beyond aU 
doubt (in other contexts it is also referred to as the prob km 
o^the canon); and I am tempted to adapt Heidegger s reflex 
L oo metaphysics itself and to speak of some fundamental 
epression o/f or getting, oblivion, of the question of mod^ 
ism But the paradox that Heidegger is himself a modernist 
nnLopher if I may put it that way, suggests or hmts at a 
fifflL: sinUas a modernist Heidegger themati.es 
Zt forgetfulness of being that is itself forgotten, even as 
problem in the forgetfulness of his modernist philosophy as a 
Ihl It may therefore be possibk mat the 
themselves somehow included, in ways we are as yet unable 
o detect a reflection on the very historicist problem that now 
confronts' us, namely the possibility of their own cultural and 
existential disappearance. 

If Platonov survives therefore, in some new and special as 
yet untheorized way, in the virtually universal deback o^e 
modernist repertoire elsewhere, this survival must tselt be 
rmeTproblem and a solution all at once. It seems hkely, for 



d Death 82 



example, that the very regressive or archaic nature of this 
Utopia, associated with peasants rather than with the advanced 
industrial technology of so many of the now utterly old- 
fashioned futurist urban Utopias of the modern age, has some- 
thing to do with its actuality for us today, in a virtually 
completely urban environment from which nature, precapital- 
ist modes of agriculture, and the peasantries themselves have 
utterly vanished. 

This feature would seem to have to do with the more 
general question of the preconditions, or the conditions of 
possibility, of the production of a text such as Chevengur, which 
we must now confront more directly. The peasant relationship 
to the land and the earth is in this text overdetermined or 
redoubled by the very destruction of the peasant mode of 
production itself. The dates of its composition (1927-192 8) 
make it clear that Chevengm has little enough to do with the 
enormities of Stalin's forced collectivization, let alone with the 
terror and the gulag system, which only came into being after 
this book was completed. It is in fact a historical novel, which 
begins at what one assumes to be a point slightly prior to the 
19 1 7 revolutions themselves, and ends at a point after the 
implementation of the New Economic Policy in 1923, in a 
belated Armageddon in which, as in the Norse myths, the 
Utopian village of Chevengur is utterly destroyed by counter- 
revolutionary bandits and its entire population slaughtered. 
This is, one feels, the right but unexpected solution to the 
difficult problem of how to end the Utopian text; and it 
underscores the constitutive relationship between this particu- 
lar Utopia and the violence and suffering that are its precondi- 
tions, differing in that from so many traditional Utopian texts 
that purport somehow to resolve or eliminate the negative as 
such. 

Indeed, the opening of the novel also presupposes suffering 
as its most fundamental datum: impoverishment is indeed the 
operation whereby appearance is stripped away from the world 



83 Utopia, Modernism, 

and things, and "the enormous, collapsed natural world" (34/ 
9 *) slowly comes into view as the true ground of Being itself 
a devastated landscape, covered with dying vegetation, fa 1 of 
chasms and holes, across which human organisms painfully 
crawl or creep, or else sit dazed by the experience of existence 
itself This is then a first hermeneutic moment— the laying 
clear' of the surface, the therapy of destruction, the surgica 
removal of the unreal; it is here achieved, not merely by civil 
war but above all by the great famines of the war and the ens. 
of tsarism, which destroy everything stable and traditional in 
an older village life and leave those people who were once its 
consents W in the terrible sense of the Western enclo- 
ure movement (what Marx describes as the "liberation of 
feasants from the land itself), but also ready to be reassembled 
nto ntw forms of collective life, which will find their ultimate 
deal type in the peasant Utopia of Chevengur The landscape 
n JL this can happen is then that peculiar, separated 
transitional disposition of the elements as they hover between 
two worlds: 

Long was Dvanov's homeward path. He walked among the 
^ey sorrow of the cloudy day, and looked into the fall 
farth The sun bared itself occasionally in the heavens, 
applying its light to the grass, the sand, the dead clay, 
exchanging sensations with them, without the slightest con- 
sciousness Dvanov liked this silent friendship of the sun, 
and the way it encouraged the earth. with its light. 

The detached cosmological elements here (whose ™^™> 
distracted help for one another is nonetheless oddly character 
td as a kind" of "silent friendship") anticipate and imitate as 

* Pag e references within the text are Erst to A^^££^ 
(Ann AAor: Ardis, .978), and then to the Russ.an ong,nal, Andre! 
brannoe (Minsk: Minsk Universitetskoe, .989). 



nd Death 84 



over a great distance the relations of the humans themselves, 
atomized and decollectivized, painfully individuated by disaster 
and catastrophe, yet turning about each other uncertainly and 
essaying fitful, as yet undeveloped types of contact. 

We have chosen, on the occasion of this unusual text, to 
associate the questions of modernism, Second World litera- 
ture, and Utopia; and it is therefore worth recalling the analo- 
gies and differences with the moment of emergent modernism 
in the West and with the catastrophe of modernity, which in 
truest Weberian fashion dashes traditional structures and life- 
ways to pieces, sweeps away the sacred, undermines immemo- 
rial habits and inherited languages, and leaves the world as a 
set of raw materials to be reconstructed rationally and in the 
service of profit and commerce, and to be manipulated and 
exploited in the form of industrial capitalism. What happens in 
the West to the existential— the deeper reference of Weberian 
Entzauberung or desacralization— can most instructively be ob- 
served in the realm of time, which on the one hand is seized 
upon in its measurability (the working day, that struggle within 
the factory for possession of the chronometer or timepiece 
itself, which Edward Thompson has so vividly described), and 
on the other becomes the deep bottomless vegetative time of 
Being itself, no longer draped and covered with myth or 
inherited religion. It is this new and unadorned experience of 
time that will generate the first expressions of the modern in 
the West— in the crucial year 18^, the year of the poems of 
Baudelaire and of Flaubert's first published novel. Moderniza- 
tion, by stripping away the traditional representations with 
which human temporality was disguised and domesticated 
revealed for one long stark moment the rift in existence 
through which the unjustifiability of the passing of time could 
not but be glimpsed, by Baudelaire, who called it ennui the 
ticking away of the meter still running, the look downward 
into the meaninglessness of the organic, which does not set 



8$ Utopia, Moderni; 



you any tasks but only condemns you to go on existing like a 

^This is the historical situation in which, in modern times, 
Being could again for a brief instant be deconcealed: it had as 
its historical condition of possibility the problematization of 
the older alibis and rationalizations of existence (most y ot a 
religious type) by the new artificial violence of the industrial 
age and of money in the form of wage labor. Heidegger does 
not tell us, I believe, and perhaps he is not interested in such 
speculations, how one is to imagine the historical conditions of 
possibility of the "original" metaphysical experiences desig- 
nated as such by him-I mean the expressions and formula- 
tions of the so-called Presocratic philosophers, which nonethe- 
less seem to have emerged from just such a secular break in 
life experience with the impact of nascent commerce on the 
elder cultures of Asia Minor. 

What one wants to add, however, to the notion of the 
forgetfulness of being and of the metaphysical question ( why 
is there something, rather than nothing at all?") is that meta- 
physics must always be forgotten and that it would be intolera- 
ble to have to dwell, for any considerable period, within 4» 
space of Being in which we have nothing to do but to live the 
unjustifiability of our existence. Ennui-the organic feeling of 
our inner vegetal time-wishes to be repressed, denied, ig- 
nored, concealed, and finally rationalized out of existence^ 
That great break with nature constituted by the coming ot 
industrial capitalism or Weberian rationalization then at once 
brings its own myths and palliatives, its own alibis and objec- 
tive irrealities along with it, to cover over the rift it momen- 
tarily opened up. These new and historically ongmal dnnen- 
slo J o'concealent, of layers of appearance utterly distinc 
from existence itself, are of course the profit motive and the 
new and artificial role of money and abstraction m our socie- 
ties as well as the fetishization of commodities, the coming 



d Death 



86 



into being of a wall or fold of manufactured objects within 

the pulse of this new kind of time is the time n f4, u 7 ' 

done survivor in an abandoned village): 

After tolling the hours, the watchman still stood at the 
parvjs, admn-ing the progress of summe r. His alarm lock 
had £ itself its long counting of tl me so thatThi s d 

Zulu*: "I, b6gUn t0 fed *°* - sharp,, and 
accurately as gnef and happiness. No matter what he did 
even w he m ^ ^ ^ he £ 

sleep-* IS Vlg] lant and a matter of the individual minuted 
•gain «,!„, „„:; ' " d ,he ° ^ ™" U ™S ,„<, 

( 9 /l I) 

the ^ I^c^S^ ; n 3 ° f — like 

by the other characters" b 7^™£ th 

diversity and their bizarre characto, T g ^ Ut ° Pian 
say something in a momen " f ^ ^ We ^ 

g oment. So, for example, the hermit, who 



8j Utopia, Modemi 



"had been startled at birth and lived so on into old age, blue 
eyes on his youthful face" (4/5), perpetually astonished at 
everything other human beings do. So also the aged Zakhar 
Pavlovich himself, "his piercing face exhausted to the point of 
melancholy" (3/3), wandering idly through the world like so 
many of Platonov's characters; in this case "not unduly inter- 
ested in anything, not in people or in nature, except for 
mechanical things of all sorts. Because of this he regarded 
people and fields with indifferent tenderness, not infringing 
upon the interests of either" (3/3)- Or finally there is the 
temporal inscription of the protagonist Sasha Dvanov himself, 
who as a child digs out a hollow by his father's grave to rest: 
"Papa, they chased me out to beg. Now I'll die soon and come 
to you. It looks like it's boring for you there alone, and I'm 

bored" (19/22). 

But oddly, it is in things themselves that this human bore- 
dom is ultimately the most strikingly invested, as though to 
substitute for the breakdown of the clocks some new physical 
medium in which the experiential thing can be measured and 
perceived. So the heaps of broken and abandoned objects at 
the very opening of the novel: "There are fringes of decay 
around old provincial towns. People come here to live straight 
out of nature" (3/3)- But in the great droughts and famines, 
when the villages are themselves abandoned, the reversal of 
artificial, man-made, if not industrial objects, to a state of 
nature is a stark inverted figure of the end of natural existence: 
a dystopia now not of machines or robots running wild— as 
the city dweller might fantasize this— but of the peasant horror 
of the return of the forest itself; here the sudden flowering is 
not a miracle but a curse, new life means the opposite of the 
human: 



The wattle fences had also blossomed because of desertion. 
They were wound through with hops and bindweeds, and 
some stakes and switches had taken, promising to become 



nd Death 88 



groves if the people didn't return. The wells had dried up 
and lizards crawled into them freely across the wooden 
frames, there to rest from the heat and reproduce. Zakhar 
Pavlovich was also greatly amazed by the senseless event, 
that the grain in the fields had long since died, while rye, 
oats, and flax slowly greened on the thatch roofs of the 
huts, where the goose-foot whispered. They had sprouted 
from seeds in the thatch. Yellow-green field birds had also 
moved into the village, living directly in the cleaner parts 
of the huts, while the sparrows fell from the eaves in 
clouds, speaking with the wind of their wings their domes- 
tic, businesslike songs. 

As he passed through the village, Zakhar Pavlovich saw a 
bast shoe which had also revived without people and found 
its own fate. It had put out a shoot of red willow, while the 
rest of its body rotted in the dust and preserved the shade 
over the rootlets of the future shrub. There was probably a 
little moister dirt under the shoe, because a number of pale 
grass blades were struggling to crawl through it. Of all the 
village things, Zakhar Pavlovich particularly loved bast shoes 
and horseshoes, and of structures, wells. (9/10) 

This remarkable passage gives testimony of the unique 
nature of Platonov's text, which like all deeply modernist 
works tends toward a kind of sacred or scriptural status. I will 
not gloss the bast shoe, with its intimations of the resurrection 
of the flesh, save to point out the way in which this early 
passage trains us in a kind of primitive reading of allegorical 
signs. I will speak in a moment of the impersonality of Plato- 
nov's language (not yet, for us, a personal style), of which 
however it seems important to add the testimony of Russian 
speakers on its skewed peculiarities, its simple sentences delib- 
erately deformed by peasantlike ungrammaticalities that 
ground this speech in the earth and in the slow conceptualities 
of the agricultural classes — and that then in turn warn more 



89 Utopia, Modernism, ^ 

a. 

rf 
S" 



sophisticated readers to 

before the eyes ~ e *» itself, — *** 

has in its very nature to lon| ^ ^ mere 

aesthetic trans^ or is to give decorative 

individual work of art whose or 
pleasure and to be consume , ather ^ ^ ^ ^ 

sacred status in asocial world m ^ 
exists-. So it is that one must read ^ ^ 

that on his deathbed m J, The great 

believe in me! They didn t have Ja t 
mo dern text in general ^ands^such be ^ ^ ^ ^ 
always meriting it), and it directi on of the somewhat 

^ ^e^: — of the Heideggenan 

Second World realities, we find someth g ^ 
ei ther the static contention art but indeed 

longing of a work of art tobcm ^ ^ 

the World itself. For in Platonov ^ ^ 

reduction, of the destruction of the idol ^ 
awa y of an old world in ^J^L e l se . A first 
precondition for the reconstruct. slate of 
Lment of absolute ^^^Z before new and 
absolute peasant immanence or g ^ 
undreamed-of sensations and feelings 

nrds called the ones that can't be under- 
"Whataremose word caUe tol or some - 

stood?" Kopenkin asked modesuy. 

^ ■ , av «Dvanov answered briefly. In his soul he 
"Terminology, Dvanov for ign0 rance is a bare 

loV ed ignorance more than over with 

field, while culture is a field already gr ^ 
plan,, so that nothing else can pa* ^ * 
reason that Dvanov was happy that in Russ 



and 



Death 90 



had weeded absolutely clean the few spots where there had 
been sprouts of culture, while people remained what they 
had always been, fertile space. And Dvanov was in no hurry 
to have anything sown in it. He felt that good soil cannot 
contain itself for long, and would of its own accord push 
forth something absolutely new and valuable, if only the 
winds of war did not carry from Western Europe the seeds 
and spores of capitalistic weeds. (108—109/ 121) 

This is an ignorance before language, an immanence in which 
consciousness has not yet found any distance from itself or 
formed any concepts: 

Even the most simple concept — for what happiness they 
were living — even that didn't enter into the poor folks' 
heads. Not a single alms-giver knew what faith, hope, or 
love gave strength to their legs on the sandy roads. 

(31/36) 

This first moment of destruction and sweeping away, then — 
what 1 have elsewhere called the moment of "world reduction" 
in Utopian discourse — will then be followed by a process that 
it would be too simple and misleading to call reconstruction 
or Utopian construction, since in effect it involves the very 
effort to find a way to begin imagining Utopia to begin with. 
Perhaps in a more Western kind of psychoanalytic language — 
with specific reference to the origins of Freudianism in hyste- 
ria — we might think of the new onset of the Utopian process 
as a kind of desiring to desire, a learning to desire, the 
invention of the desire called Utopia in the first place, along 
with new rules for the fantasizing or daydreaming of such a 
thing — a set of narrative protocols with no precedent in our 
previous literary institutions (even if they will have to come to 
terms somehow with our previous literary or narrative habits) . 



9J Utopia, Modernism, 



now to follow this process through its various 

B tha, h ; 4 r e S e„io» itself illicit in 

\ g T "f wil firTnLtion Ldunery itseif. since in *e 
each stage. I will nrst j^j, ,„ the 

opening of this novel r ^ „ ere 

mac hi„es" that >'^^ MmiA] « rewarded." 

deprived and with which he ^ socia li sm or 

Then we will see the way m whA * search 
communism is modeled on the fairy a ^ ^ ^ a . 
the characters of this Utopia are B"*™^™* J 0 pian im- 

pulse, which is over and over g 
Lddhng 

next into view. And at that P ^ tQ 

tion , the fantasy log* of the Utop ^ ^ 

^^rs^p--- * at happen 

achievements o th n-a ^ ^ 

disparately and m relatively cont radiction within 

ance of something like or marginals (here in 

this Utopia in the form of the lumpen »"JJ> miscdh _ 
Platonov's parodic-bureaucratic language called 

TLnd undermining or internal V^^^JZ 

^^T^^^^- These 

in the interesting M ^ Utopian imagination 

two narrative self-critiaues ^ ^ 

challenges its own ^ZZZ or accredit the old 

rial that makes it impossible fully o r rf 

-ages and the 

marg inality and sexual^ - £ c J rf a neW le ft to an 

:t r^s^ a idernist revolutionary 



d Death 92 



politics has found itself challenged and its paradigms under- 
mined in a postmodern period. 

The final heading, however, under which such internal 
narrative self-critiques can be discussed, is a very old and 
classical modernist one; indeed, it can be said to recapitulate 
those very values and principles we postmoderns find most 
unacceptable and intolerable in high modernism itself, namely 
Irony, and the quite different challenge an ironic perspective 
holds out for the very project of a narrative Utopia in the first 
place. Like all forms of irony, Platonov's in Chevengur is 
undecidable: that is to say, nothing is less certain and more 
ironic than the question of whether Chevengur is to be consid- 
ered ironic in the first place. But as not merely the Utopian, 
but also the Modern, stands or falls with this question of irony, 
it becomes the unavoidable climactic topic in this discussion 
and obviously is bound in no small measure to determine the 
fate and status of Second World literature in general today, at 
a time when this category may itself have come to strike many 
people as an ironic one. Can socialism only today be described 
or discussed ironically? Such is then the final issue raised by 
Chevengur, an issue that can of course also be raised in the 
rather different form of the question of whether irony is itself 
possible in the postmodern. 

Returning now to machinery as such, it seems superfluous 
to observe that not merely modernism but also the modern 
Utopian narrative in the West were essentially urban forms 
and experiences, associated with the industrial city and its new 
secular social classes; in Russia, as we have seen, it is within a 
peasant landscape that it must make its way, and by way of 
violent dislocations that are industrial only in a mediated way, 
in a semiperipheral country with small but highly concentrated 
proletarian core areas, within the forcefield of an imperialist 
world system (the grain markets), and finally under the impact 
of the most modern, indeed the most futurist, forms of indus- 
trial warfare after 19 14. 



93 Utopia, Modernism, 

This does not mean that the ****** 

Piatonov's vision. *~ 

and visionary perspective, from* P ^ oyer _ 

which, indeed, as - many of the J ^ ^ & 

lea ps of the "^r^J^ Astern experience of indus- 
sharpness not vouchsafed to the J & no ^ 

try (save in less mdustnal sta es * ^ 
dent that the futurist celebration of tte 
in Ita ly rather than in England or GermanyV ^ 

vi-ion "of «^-^^^gl- of obsession, 
stylized and magnified as ™ ^ ^ re natur e, but 

-The proletariat," ^^J* ™ me anwhile the char- 
rather destroys it, with labor (, ^ )> ^ ^ ^ 

acter who will in ^ nOVe \f a e kl S of obsessed handyman 
industrial passion itself begms a W ^ ^ 

and inventor: thinking that a long as y ^ ^ 

aoes untouched by human hands, people 
goes uniuu ; 7akhar Pavlovich 

invented everything (3/4)- ^ aKna 

tViinci but himself 

W as able to fix or equip any — ftofr ^ 
live d life unequipp ed ^ of ^ 

dock had failed in its time o P- th J ^ ^ 

ma n. Nor had he ever refused to eso d 

country bazaars. But he to ^ inter _ 

neither family nor dwelling^ • ^ for 

ested in anything, not - P o P ^ ^ 

meChani 1 tui: 1 wBch the novel open, in order 
famine and drought wi ^ ^ ^ 

to forget his hunger, ^J^^ everything he had 
He taught himself how to make in ^ ^ 

ever made in metal. 



y.khar Pavlovich's wooden frying pan—later, 
Indee \T S e Z ^ ;ery emblem of the village of Chevengur 
as we shall see, the veiy 



and Death 94 



$J itself — that principally (and justifiably) startled the old hermit 
"o I have already mentioned: "Zakhar Pavlovich, though, poured 



^ water into the wooden frying pan and succeeded in bringing 

.2 the water to boil over a slow fire without burning the pan. 

o The hermit was frozen in amazement" (4/^). 

b This is the character, then, who will discover the futurist 

excitement of machinery, classically in the form of the rail- 
road: his "body itched happily from the turning of the train's 
wheels and its rapid breathing, while his eyes grew damp with 
light tears of sympathy for the engine" ( 1 1 / 1 3): 

He could sit for hours before the little door of the firebox, 
where the flame burned. This replaced for him the enor- 
mous pleasure of friendship and conversation with people. 
As he watched the living flame, Zakhar Pavlovich lived 
himself — within him his head thought, his heart felt, and 
his entire body quietly enjoyed. Zakhar Pavlovich respected 
coal, angle iron, all slumbering raw materials and rough- 
formed pieces, but he really loved and felt only for the 
finished item, that into which a thing had been made by 
human labor and as which it would continue to live its 
independent life . (27/31) 

The story of Zakhar Pavlovich 's passion for machinery is then 
as it were the prologue to this novel, its antechamber, which 
we leave behind when he becomes disillusioned as to the 
"general radical improvement" (41/47) to be afforded by ma- 
chinery or technology proper. It is as though he here abandons 
his futurist stage, and the void this disappearing passion leaves 
in him will now be filled by the passion for socialism itself and 
by the principal narrative line, whose protagonist is Zakhar 
Pavlovich's foster son, Sasha Dvanov. 

It is a fairy-tale narrative in which Sasha and other charac- 
ters set forth to find that mysterious thing they lack, like 
the blue flower, which bears the name of "socialism." They 



95 Utopia, Moderni 



dream of reaching it, without being able to achieve ft. fig- 
uration much as in the Utopian discourse itseli it 

of representation in its very content an ds^ucture 
L problem of achieving that representation » ^ 
the narrative becoming the very narrative process to be real 
t d ; Zs is Sasha daydreaming in the night, with wide-open 
eyes: 

Dvanov imagined the darkness above the tundra, where 
people fronfthe warm places of the earth came to li£ 
Those people made a little railroad to bring m wood for 
le onstruction of dwellings, to replace their lost summery 
climate Dvanov imagined himself as an engineer on that 
uTber-hauhng line mat carried logs to build new towns, 
anT he made" believe he was doing all the work of an 
nleer-he passed the desolate stages between stations, 
ol on water! blew the whistle in the blizzards braced 
talked with his assistant and, finally, fell asleep at hisdesti- 
Jon the shore of the Arctic Ocean. In his deep he saw 
We trees growing from the pale soil, and there was an 
If barelytoJering space around them, and an empty 
old departed patiently into the distance. Dvanov envied 
all of thl He wanted to gather u P the trees, air, and oa^ 
and fit them to himself, so as to have no time to die 
beneath their defense. Dvanov wanted also to remember 
something else, but this effort was greater than memory, 
rt tLught disappeared as his. con— turned in 
slee p, as a bird flies from a wheel as it begins to, ^ 

Nothing is indeed more fascinating and original in PlatoWs 
^l tL this inner psychology of ^^l^Z 
, „*U, subjective movements are nere u & 

on I ST 24 ™ ks pur t private , 

delHu^ot Dvanov's fever dre,™ is *e to** obverse of 



d Death 96 



this: "how boring it had been in the murk of sleep. There 
hadn't been any people anywhere, and he saw now that there 
were not many of them in the world" ($9/68). 

The ultimate Utopian drive, however, whether it be ex- 
pressed in religious or salvational terms, or in a symbol like 
the Grail, or here under the magic word socialism, seems to 
have something to do with this recovery of other people; but 
its difficulty of conception, of formulation and representation, 
then at once itself comes to be represented by a forgetting— 
as though the Utopian also were anamnesis, the deep recov- 
ery of what is both forgotten and known since before birth. 
This peculiar impulse then drives people to wake up out 
of their sound sleep, to make them leave their families and 
loved ones without warning, setting forth on unplanned 
journeys (thus Dvanov walking "still farther into the depths 
of the province . . . [he] did not know where to stop. He 
thought of the time when water would begin to glisten in the 
dry uplands. That would be socialism." [6j/ 74 ]). Indeed, 
Dvanov's sudden parting from Sonya, early in the novel 
and after their equally unexpected reunion, is precisely the 
kind of peculiar and unmotivated action that (along with other, 
similar events in Platonov's other texts, as we shall see 
below) will seem to solicit a certain psychoanalytic interpreta- 
tion. 

For the moment, however, it is this remarkable post- 
Wagnerian account of the Utopian impulse that we will want 
to trace, from Dvanov's again feverish reawakening: 

He began to toss restlessly. He had frightened himself in a 
dream, thinking that his heart was stopping, and he sat on 
the floor as he woke up. "But where then is socialism?" 
Dvanov remembered and peered into the murk of the 
room, searching for his thing. It seemed to him that he had 
already found it, but then had wasted it in sleep among 
these strangers. Dvanov went outside in fear of the punish- 
ment to come, hatless and in his socks, saw the dangerous 



97 Utopia, Moderni 



unanswering night, and dashed off through the village into 
his own distance. (79/ 8 9) 

It is a wandering from which he will never return but during 
which, a few nights later, he will make another, even more 
peculiar discovery: 

The rare sound of someone's sleeping life rang out, and 
Dvanov came to. He remembered the case in which he had 
been carrying rolls for Sonya. In the case there was a mass 
of fat rolls. Now the case was not to be seen on the stove. 
Dvanov crawled carefully to the floor and went to look for 
the case down below. All his spiritual forces were trans- 
formed into anguish about the case. He trembled all over 
in fear of losing it. Dvanov got on all fours and began to 
frisk the sleeping people, assuming that they hid the case 
beneath themselves. The sleepers rolled over and only the 
bare floor lay beneath them. The case didn't turn up any- 
where. Dvanov was horrified at his loss and burst into 
offended tears. (82/93) 

This extraordinary passage is the psychopathology of the Uto- 
pian impulse, which demands a Freud of its own and in its 
own right! The mass of sweet rolls are also socialism; in the 
deepest unconscious mind the lost object, "petit a," is multi- 
form, the heart's desire is both something so material and 
domestic as a source of oral gratification and a gift for the 
beloved and something so complex it stands as the abstraction 
of everything people have been able to conceive as their ideal 
of collective life and of the world itself — and all this, fever- 
ishly, on the mode of having lost or displaced it, frantically 
scrabbling among the uncomprehending others, who grunt and 
curse half asleep at a person seemingly deranged. 

This quest will then, over the longer term of the narrative, 
become formalized into the fairy tale or Proppian string of 
adventures: Sasha acquires his Sancho Panza in the form of the 



d Death 9* 

bolshevik Kopenkin, with his horse Proletarian Strength and 
his Dulcinea in the shape of a fantasy image of Rosa Luxem- 
burg. Meanwhile, the thing itself will at length take on physical 
and geographic substance: 

"Where do you come from, looking like that?" Gopner 
asked. 

"From communism. Ever hear of the place?" the visiting 
man answered. 

"What's that, a village named in memory of the future?" 
The man was cheered that he had a story to tell. 

"What do you mean village? You not a Party man or 
something? There's a place called that, an entire county 
center. Old style it used to be called Chevengur . . . 
We've got the end of everything in our town." 

"The end of what, for God's sake?" Gopner asked dis- 
trustfully. 

"All of world history, that's what! What do we need it 
for?" (145—46/160—161) 

But here the fairy tale and the cartoon or animated film 
converge, and the Utopian and the grotesque begin to merge 
together. In the coda, for example, when the bureaucrat 
from Moscow arrives to judge the village (about which he 
significantly observes that "there was no executive committee 
in Chevengur, but there were many happy, if useless, people" 
[310/ 342, italics mine]), his first glimpse is as follows: 

That morning Serbinov saw a frying pan made of fir wood 
on a table, and up on a roof there was an iron flag attached 
to a pole, a flag which could not submit to the wind. 

(308/340) 

These are Zakhar Pavlovich's inventions triumphant: in no 
little consistency with the aesthetic of this ultimate village, 



99 Utopia, Modernism, 



that knows no art but that finally ends up erecting monuments 
to, and statues of, its own citizens, so that you or I, ^ h™£ 
would be likely to confront crude clay idols of ourselves at the 
turning of a lane. But this vision of art in Utopia (about which 
Robert C. Elliott warned us long ago that it was always to be 
considered one of the deepest and surest indices of achieved 
vision within the Utopian text) is itself a s lg n of the transfor- 
mation of human life in Chevengur. 

2 loss here a fundamental notion of Adorno's, namely, that 
whafwe think of as individuality in the West, and what seems 
I us somehow to trace the outlines of an essenUa human 
nature, is little more than the marks and scars , * J^nt 
compressions, resulting from the intenorvzation b 0 c ed 
civilized human beings of that instinct for self-preservation 
without which, in this fallen society or history, we would^ll 
be destroyed as surely as those unfortunates who are bom 
without /tactile waring sense of hot and co d o^pinand 
pleasure, in their secondary nervous systems. ™ 
the consequences of just such a general removal of the need 
o survival instinct (such a removal being then in gener 
what we call Utopia itself) leads us well beyond the bound of 
Adorno's social life world and class style (or our own), and 
fntoTu topia of misfits and oddballs, in which the constants 
CuniforLzation and conformity have been removed and 
human beings grow wild like plants in a state c ^ nature, not 
the beings of Thomas More, in whom sociality has been 
tplald by way of the miracle - of the Utopian text, but 
rJL thos/of L opening of Altman's ftp* 
Dick's Clans of the Alphane Moon), who, no longer fettered by. 
Tc— of a n P ow oppressive sociality, U ^ 
neurotics, compulsives, obsessives, paranoids and sckzophren 
ics whom our society considers sick but who, m a world of 
: u 'e freedom, may ike up the flora and fauna of human 

"ms Tnow, with unexpected retrospectivity, the very 



nd Death 100 



world of Chevengur, whose peasant Utopian figures are all as 
unique as their individual obsessions, like the man "who con- 
sidered himself God and knew everything. Following his con- 
viction, he quit plowing and fed himself directly from soil. He 
always said that since grain comes from the soil, then soil must 
have its own independent repletion, and all it takes is getting 
your belly used to it" (66/ 75). These characters in general, 
as Platonov tells us more specifically about the party mem- 
bers, do 

not resemble one another. Each face had about it some 
home-made quality, as though the man had extracted him- 
self from someplace with his own solitary strengths. It is 
possible to distinguish that kind of face among a thousand 
faces; a frank face darkened by constant tension, and some- 
what distrustful. If these unusual home-made people had 
been suspected in their time, they would have been de- 
stroyed with that same fevered frenzy with which normal 
children beat monsters and animals, with fear and passion- 
ate pleasure. (142/147) 

Like all the great modern novelists, Platonov' s work includes 
an implicit reflection on the very category of the character as 
such — and thus by secondary implication of the psychic sub- 
ject: which in all the great moderns in their diverse ways is 
liberated from the common-sense stereotype of the daily other 
with characterological properties and features (or "qualities," 
as Musil's word Eigenschaften is translated) and released into 
the evolution toward that "fou; monstre incomparable, preferable a 
tout, que tout etre est pour soi-meme, et qu'il choie dans son 
coeur" (Malraux, La condition humaine). In Platonov, this true 
individual identity, to be reached after the end of individual- 
ism, has to do as well with the end of hierarchy ("in those days 
there was no definite cadre of famous people, so every man 
felt his own name and meaning" [144/1^9]) but also with 



101 Utopia, Modernism, 



conceptualities, and with uses or the opposite of use (remem- 
ber that the people of Chevengur were described as useless, it 
happy people). So it is that the delegate from Moscow ex- 
plains to Sasha, about his long-lost sweetheart: "She remem- 
bers you. I've noticed that for you here in Chevengur people 
are like an idea for one another, and you are an idea for her 

(, 20 /u3) To be unk i ue or F otesc i ue > a cartoon figure ; T 

obsessive., is also, in other words, not to fit into any of the 
stereotypes of human nature, not to be usable in efficient or 
instrumental ways; and in this Utopia, in which no one works 
but the sun, there are no uses to which people can any longer 
be put ("these adjacent, unknown people, who lived by their 
solLy laws" [ 5 i/6o]). These are people "on vacation from 
imperialism" (179A99), people every one of which has one 
profession, and that is their soul. Instead of trade we ve set up 

life" (261/287). ■ • f 

But now we need to look more closely into the origins of 
this "epoch of rest" in the catastrophic situations and experi- 
ences we have mentioned, which here come to include the 
violence and the barbarism of the civil war. For these two 
things are at one with each other: "In the morning Shumihn 
had a hunch that the masses in the province had probably even 
thought something up, and perhaps even socialism had popped 
up somewhere unawares, because people had nowhere else to 
Jo once they banded together in fear of poverty and the effort 
of want" (6i/6 9 ). A page or two later, here is the same idea 
namely that "poverty had probably already bunched togethe 
on its own accord and set itself up according to socialism (6 3 / 
72 ) Utopia is then here reactive rather than contemplative and 
metaphysical in some static and absolute sense: it is the col ec- 
tive expression of need in the most immediate ^ 
than some idle conception of the perfect that can be added on 
to what is tolerable or even what is not so bad, in order 
compulsively to take advantage of that to go on to reach some 
ultimately completed state for its own sake. But this goes a 



d Death 102 



long ways toward explaining anti-Utopianism as well, for the 
true Utopias of need, of this kind, are thereby marked in their 
very essence and structure by misery and suffering — they bring 
it to mind, as it were, at once, they are indistinguishable from 
the Utopian vision, in an interpenetration greater than any 
merely punctual association of ideas. Therefore, if one wishes 
to avoid thinking about suffering and misery, one must also 
avoid thinking about the Utopian text, which necessarily car- 
ries their expression within itself in order to constitute the 
wish fulfillment of their abolition. 

This system of reactions can indeed be generalized into a 
whole methodological principle whereby the symbolic value of 
the past and of traumata strongly associated with specific 
periods forms a system in its own right and generates meaning- 
effects not always obvious or transparent to outsiders. So it is 
that a population suffering from the excesses of individualism 
and an anomie of which they are not always themselves aware 
will be susceptible to the influence of articulated visions of 
solidarity and collective life. The converse, however, also 
clearly holds, so that people who have been "huddling to- 
gether" for indeterminate periods, such as the various popula- 
tions of the former Soviet Union, owing to a whole chain of 
catastrophic situations in which they found themselves, are just 
as likely to develop a horror of togetherness in everyday 
situations and a longing for individual privacy and "bourgeois" 
private life, as they are to acquire categories and habits of 
collective experience unfamiliar and incomprehensible for the 
West. Whatever the other complex determinations of anti- 
Utopianism — and some of them have been touched on in 
preceding pages — the symbolic effects of such historical and 
generational experience need to be reckoned in a specifically 
interpretative fashion, in order to forestall the return of the 
kind of naturalizing ideology for which collective effort works 
against the grain of human nature, people are naturally prone 
to a regression into private life, consumption and the market 



1 03 Utopia, Modernism, 



are more normal and attractive to human beings than the 

P °^Ttn^n of cyclical expiations of poison 
and epohtizatL is equally ahistorical, and in particular 
eaves out the historical content of the specific traumas tha 
determine a given social investment: so it is that today the 
m m" Lion by the sheer fact of so-called religious funda- 
ment ism in thl Other of the West obscures the origins of 
^p^ular collective investment in the various 

the Left and indeed of modernization as a universal vision The 
the Lett and from actmsm 

7^ ^ZTZ^ when the specific content of 

h sE hope and failure is restored to a given naUona 
historical p . t ^ be sald that 

' wdun s to§ether " * e f desperat d 

Is r Phe that for Americans corresponded to the famine and 
wa P r evoked in the pages of C^ur, was the Great 
Sepre-n itself. S^.^t^i 

Snd o Ufe n the face of this disaster are somehow reunited in 
My different way in the great collective «P««-*^ 
World War II, in many ways the lost Utopia of recent £en- 
can history and a source of a perpetual nostalgia that can 
W be harnessed to other political projects, given its 
l^Ln" military and L "war effort." As for that 
expe^nce of radical impoverishment, and the stripping away 

for spare parts are to y^ determines 
products can begin to be marketed. 

I different H„d of generational ^ ated 
the depression: deprivation comes to be strong y 



d Death 104 



with precisely those collective formations that came into being 
against it, and all become the object of a psychic compensation 
by way of universal consumption and the surrounding of indi- 
vidual subjects by an immense security blanket of commodi- 
ties. It is a therapy that obliterates both the crisis and the 
collective politics that sprang into being to address it, drown- 
ing both in the affluence of what is often thought of as sheer 
private life. 

This is the sense in which it is crucial to distinguish the 
private sphere as that has been theorized by the various bour- 
geois notions of civil society, and the pathologies of consump- 
tion in the United States, and following it, in the advanced 
countries generally: pathologies that are neither eternal prop- 
erties of human nature nor inevitable accompaniments of mid- 
dle-class representative or parliamentary democracies, but 
rather the results of a specifically unique, historical, North- 
american experience, that can only be understood in the light 
of recent U.S. collective history, which is then reified by its 
apologists and projected out into the rest of the world as a 
"way of life" and a value, a specific social option in its own 
right. But this option has as little to do with human nature as 
does the reaction against it in the post-Eisenhower generation 
of the 1960s, whose repudiation of this specific reaction against 
the collective takes the form of the dreaming and acting out of 
new kinds of social solidarity, against which the present gener- 
ation has in its turn seemed in full historical reaction. It is, 
however, in precisely the same way that the current Eastern 
European anti-Utopianism is to be understood. 

It is then particularly remarkable that Platonov should have 
been capable of inserting, into his Utopian text, precisely such 
traumas that will later on be appealed to as motives for 
repudiating it and Utopianism altogether: for it is precisely 
these two kinds of traumas that make up the arsenal of argu- 
ments against social revolution, namely violence itself, and 
also the repression of the nonclass "identities" of marginality 



105 Utopia, Modernism 



an d gender, both of which find unparalleled expression in 
ChevLur and thus have seemed to stamp this particular text as 
uniquely undecideable and as a narrative to which Utopians 
and anti-Utopians can appeal alike (we will return to this 
interpretative problem in conclusion). Both kinds of revota- 
tionary excess are, however, determined by the logic of the 
separatism of small groups (for separatism is fully as much an 
issue in the massacre of the middle classes as it is in the 
emergence of the unclassifiable marginal groups). Separatism, 
in a formal sense the very precondition for any group reunifi- 
cation, poses the most vivid and tragic dilemmas for any 
politics that wishes to affirm the primacy of the collective 
over against the mass-cultural standardizations of a universal 
privatized Americanization on the one hand, and against the 
endless tribal and clan warfare of the various nationalisms on 

the other. . . 

It is this tragic ambiguity that is underscored in Chevengur 
by the ominous silence of the massacre of the so-called op- 
pressive elements" (in other words the middle-class townspeo- 
ple and the kulaks), who are "ushered into posthumous life in 
an organized and healthy fashion" (182/203). We will return 
later on to this grisly episode; suffice it for 4e n^to 
observe the way in which, as everywhere else m Platonov 
such atrocities are set down on paper ruthlessly and without 
comment or pity, indeed in what one is tempted to character 
ize as a kind of pathological absence or neutralization of human 
feeling generally. One can imagine political arguments in sup- 
port o'f L massacre of the kulaks, and indeed they have bee 
made in the context both of the civil war and of Stai n s 
forced collectivization (which, as has been said, postdates this 
particular text), but that is not Platonov intent or perspec^e 
here. Nor can one speak, either, of an geological blind spo 
in the text, as has been evoked for the indifference of Thomas 
More to the persistence of slavery in his Utopian construction, 
for Platonov scarcely omits the details of the grim complacen- 



d Death 106 



cies of this virtual execution or class genocide; and there is 
surely at least an unconscious acknowledgement of blood guilt 
in the way in which the Utopian group is itself ultimately 
massacred in just such grisly and thorough fashion — even 
though that happens in the heat of battle and not, here, as a 
calculated political decision. The massacre thus comes before 
us as something like the necessary price to be exacted, not so 
much for the construction of Utopia as rather for the sheer 
imagining of it: something transcending in the complexity of 
its fantasy dynamics that "pistol shot at a concert" as which 
Stendhal characterized the novel that included politics — closer 
perhaps to Wyndham Lewis' self-knowledge when he spoke of 
"paper guns that kill real people": it is the reality principle that 
all genuine fantasy must awaken if it is to be daydreamed in 
the first place. 

Alongside this, which can no doubt be designated as an antag- 
onistic social contradiction, there are the well-known nonantag- 
onistic ones, which make their appearance with the arrival of a 
subproletariat, of people who are neither peasants nor industrial 
workers but what we would today call lumpens, marginals, per- 
manently unemployed, and who in a caricature of the bureau- 
cratic language and categorization of the nascent Soviet Republic 
are designated simply as "miscellaneous" (prochie): 

"Who did you bring us?" Chepurny asked Prokofy. "If 
that's the proletariat sitting on the mound over there, then 
how come they won't claim their town, I ask you now?" 

"That's proletarians and miscellaneous," Prokofy said. 

Chepurny was disturbed. 

"What miscellaneous? Again the layer of residual swine?" 

"What do you think I am, a reptile or a Party member?" 
Prokofy was already offended. "The miscellaneous are the 
miscellaneous. Nobody. They're even worse than the pro- 
letariat." 

"Well, who are they? They had a class father, didn't 



10j Utopia, Modernism, 



they? I ask you now! You didn't pick them up out in the 
weeds, did you? A social place, wasn't it?" 

"They are your basic disinherited," Prokofy explained. 
"They weren't living anywhere, they were wandering." 

(226/250-51) 

The arrival of the "miscellaneous" (with their ominously "non- 
Russian faces" [231/256]) triggers what may with a certain 
exaggeration be called class conflict or at least tension within 
the classless society, the reemergence of social dynamics and 
struggles within Utopia itself. They are compared to "seeds 
from some nameless weedpatch" that "fall onto bare clay or by 
the empty lands of the earth, and are able to find nourishment 
in bare minerals" (231/255). It is worth quoting at some 
length Platonov's remarkable evocation of these faceless and 
anonymous people: 

Other people had an entire armament to strengthen and 
develop their own valued lives, while the miscellaneous had 
only one weapon with which to cling to this earth, and that 
was the last traces of a mother's warmth within the baby's 
body. This alone however was enough to make the child 
survive, struggle, and arrive in his own future alive. That 
sort of past life had exhausted the strength of those who had 
come to Chevengur, and thus to Chepurny they seemed 
powerless and nonproletarian elements, as though they had 
spent their entire lives basking beneath not the sun, but 
the moon. However, after exhausting their strength in 
preserving the first parental warmth within, fighting against 
the headwind which wished to uproot them, fighting against 
inimical life, and after even multiplying that warmth on 
earnings gleaned from the real people, the people with 
names, the miscellaneous had made of themselves exercises 
in endurance, and within the inner substance of the bodies 
of the miscellaneous had formed minds full of curiosity and 



and Death 108 

S 

C 



j. doubt, quick feelings capable of exchanging eternal bliss for 

"5 a brother comrade who also had no father and no property, 

^ but who could make one forget both the one and the other. 

.2 The miscellaneous still carried hopes within themselves, 

©* hopes that were sure, successful, and melancholy as loss 

£> itself. The precision of this hope was that if one were to 

succeed at the main task of remaining live and whole, then 
all the rest and everything which one might desire would 
succeed as well, even if that required leading the entire 
world to its final grave. If however this main task were 
fulfilled and survived and the prime necessity, which is not 
happiness but indispensability, was not encountered, then 
there would not be time enough to find it in the rest of life 
unlived. After all, there is not enough time to catch that 
which is lost, or perhaps that which is wasted disappears 
from the earth entirely. Many of the miscellaneous had 
walked all of the open, ever-changing roads and had found 
nothing. (23 l/2 «- 6 ) 

Yet this more fundamental anonymity — this rock-bottom of 
the individual subject that can alone, like the most radical of 
all chains enable the coming into being of a collective of 
genuine equality — can also become a source of strength for 
the Utopia of Chevengur, if it is celebrated with the proper 
Bakhtinian spirit and in anticipation of contemporary or post- 
modern celebrations of difference; if in other words Chepurny 
is right to sense "that the Chevengur proletariat desired the 
international, which is to say distant, foreign and outlandish 
people, in order to unite with them so that the entire motley 
life of earth could grow together in one tree" (274/ 301). 

There is something more ineradicably tragic, however, 
about the arrival of the women in Chevengur, which offers the 
Soviet or socialist-realist analogue to the obligatory scene in 
the American Western when finally the wagon loads of whores 
are driven into the new settlement with its mud streets and 



;09 Utopia, Modernism, 



plank sidewalks. Revolutionary puritanism is carefully marked 
and set in place in Chepurny' s fear of sexuality and his insis- 
tence that the women not be beautiful. Despite that, the new 
recruits have their own (justifiable) doubts about the new 
social order: 



The women were immediately frightened. The former men 
had always begun their business with them right at the end, 
while these held out and waited, giving speeches first. So 
the women pulled the overcoats and greatcoats in which 
Klavdyusha had dressed them right up to their noses, cov- 
ering the openings of their mouths. They were not afraid 
of love, for they did not love, but they did fear torment, 
the near destruction of their bodies by these dry, patient 
men in soldiers' greatcoats, their faces etched by the trials 
of their lives. These women possessed no youth or other 
obvious age. They had exchanged their bodies, their places 
of age and blossoming, for food, and since the procurement 
of food was always unprofitable for them, their bodies were 
expended before their death. Long before it. For that 
reason they resembled both young girls and old women, 
both mothers and younger, undernourished sisters. 

(314/346-47) 

This specific form of pity in Platonov, whose accents here and 
elsewhere are unique, can to be sure be interpreted in a 
variety of different ways, whose very variety leads us to what 
is most problematical and contradictory in Chevengur itself. The 
first interpretive option is clearly enough the metaphysical 
one, that even in Utopia, organic beings will still suffer: 

"But have you got misery here or sadness here in Chev- 
engur?" Serbinov asked. 

Dvanov told him there was. Misery and sorrow are also the 
body of the human being. (3 °8 / 3 3 9) 



and Death 110 



c 

£ From this perspective Utopia is merely the political and social 
"o solution of collective life: it does not do away with the ten- 
^ sions and unresolvable contradictions inherent both in inter- 
.2 personal relations and in bodily existence itself (among them 
o" those of sexuality), but rather exacerbates those and allows 
£3 them free rein, by removing the artificial miseries of money 
and self-preservation. The Heideggerian perspective — which 
grants the achievement of the social Utopia the privilege of 
deconcealing Being itself — also opens up the experience of 
death that is at the heart of Being; it is thus no accident that 
the fundamental moment of doubt the militants have about 
socialism itself comes after a grotesque scene in which the 
Chevengurians are unable to bring a sick child back . to life 
(247/ 272—3). But, of course, it is not the function of Utopia 
to bring the dead back to life nor to abolish death in the first 
place; death is so deeply inscribed in this Utopia that it begins 
and ends with an exemplary suicide: 

Zakhar Pavlovich had known one man, a fisherman from 
Lake Mutevo, who had questioned many people about 
death, and was tormented by his curiosity. This fisherman 
loved fish most of all not as food, but as special beings that 
definitely knew the secret of death. He would show Zakhar 
Pavlovich the eyes of a dead fish and say, "Look — there's 
wisdom! A fish stands between life and death, so that he's 
dumb and expressionless. I mean even a calf thinks, but a 
fish, no. It already knows everything." Contemplating the 
lake through the years, the fisherman thought always about 
the same thing, about the interest of death. Zakhar Pavlov- 
ich tried to talk him out of it, saying, "There's nothing 
special there, just something tight." After a year the fish- 
erman couldn't stand it any more and threw himself into 
the lake from his boat, after tying his feet with a rope so 
that he wouldn't accidentally float. In secret he didn't even 
believe in death. The important thing was that he wanted 



111 Utopia, Modernism, 



to look at what was there — perhaps it was much more 
interesting than living in a village or on the shores of a lake. 
He saw death as another province, located under the heav- 
ens as if at the bottom of cool water, and it attracted him. 
Some of the muzhiks that the fisherman talked with about 
his intention to live awhile with death and return tried to 
talk him out of it, but others agreed with him. 

"What the hell, Mitry Ivanich, nothing ventured, nothing 
gained. Try it, then come back and tell us." Dmitry Ivanich 
tried — they dragged him from the lake after three days and 
buried him near the fence of the village graveyard. (6/7) 

The protagonist Dvanov, who drowns himself in this lake after 
the genocide of Chevengur, is the son of this same muzhik, 
whose morbid curiosity we will want to return to in a different 
connection in a moment. Yet there is no great inconsistency 
between Utopia and death, the former being what you do to 
distract yourself from the organic boredom of the latter. 

On a second reading, however, the passages I have quoted, 
and not only those about the women of Chevengur, are to be 
read in a fundamentally psychoanalytic way, as a deep and 
morbid fear of life and of sexuality in Platonov — an interpreta- 
tion obviously a good deal more difficult to universalize than 
the preceding one, and yet an interpretive temptation that is 
very difficult to avoid without the risk of rationalization or 
repression. The argument about the status of psychoanalytic 
interpretation and psychoanalytic criticism remains urgent and 
crucial at the present time, even though its basic terms have 
been almost completely modified. In the past, it was always 
necessary to argue for the relevance, not just of one but of 
many distinct forms of the psychoanalytic — even though suc- 
cess in such an argument then meant the necessity of opening 
up new connections and relations between the psychoanalytic 
interpretations thus acquired and all the others, which did 
not thereby lose any of their own validity. Today, however, 



and Death 112 



£ psychoanalysis is so widely accepted as to have been emptied 
o of its capacity to scandalize and therapeutically to shock or to 



defamiliarize, while in the postmodern the very existence of 
2 an Unconscious as such has come widely into doubt. Finally 
o" the psychoanalytic, as a grounding and a metaphysic that seems 
2 unmetaphysical, seems to have begun to function as everyone's 
fall-back interpretive code in a situation in which we have all 
pretended to give up "ultimately determining instances" of all 
the other kinds. Platonov may not afford the best textual 
situation to argue out these new problems posed by an institu- 
tional or canonized psychoanalysis, but they had to be at least 
mentioned on the occasion of a text in which the horror of 
sexuality seems to play a scarcely veiled role whose field of 
influence, however, seems hard enough to determine. The 
step into the sexual, for example, is isolated from the rest of 
life in a charged and peculiar manner calculated to produce 
meaning rather than to be itself interpretable in any simple 
causal fashion. Thus the inauguration of socialism is fantasized 
in a way that might be merely figural and decorative in an- 
other writer, but that in Platonov is ominous indeed: 

Chepurny sat in fear of the coming day, because that 
first day would be somehow clumsy and awful, as though 
something that had always been virginal proved now ripe 
for marriage, and on the morrow everyone must marry. 
Chepurny kneaded his face with his hands in his embar- 
rassment, then sat motionless for a long while, enduring his 
senseless shame. (205V228) 

But the relationship to sexuality is crucial because it offers 
an alternate reason for (and reading of) the quest itself and for 
the inexplicable departures: suddenly leaving wife or lover 
behind in the middle of the night (as we have seen), or 
wandering out into the steppe in a fever in order to discover 
"the people." Dvanov's departure is underscored by its replay 



113 Utopia, Modernism, 



in an even more enigmatic, yet mysteriously significant short 
story called "Homecoming," whose protagonist is discovered 
years later in a neighboring town, after just such another 
abrupt and unexplained departure from family and marriage, 
cleaning out latrines — as though abnegation of this kind had 
some distant connection with the most morbid images of 
sainthood and asceticism. But if it is a psychoanalytic account 
that is called for here, then both sainthood and socialism are 
little more than sick rationalizations, and the political or Uto- 
pian content of Chevengur is thereby fundamentally problema- 
tized, if not canceled out. 

Yet a third line of interpretation now opens up, which 
includes this one in some form, but is nonetheless a good deal 
more universal in its formalisms; this is irony itself, a topic 
that has significance in a number of contexts including that of 
modernism, of which it is canonically understood to be the 
supreme moral and aesthetic achievement and the dominant 
value. It would not, then, be surprising to be forced into the 
conclusion that a modernist writer of Platonov 's achievements 
would turn out to include, somewhere, and despite the fact 
that we are here East rather than West, the fundamental fact 
of irony; and indeed I think that we will not be able to avoid 
doing so. But here too the Second World may have something 
new to teach the First World about a modernist value that is 
no longer operative or functional within the latter' s postmod- 
ern stage. 

At least five kinds of irony seem to me attributable to 
Platonov' s text: the most superficial and stylistic would surely 
have to do with the incongruities of a peasant language and a 
peasant ignorance, from which the sophisticated Russian writer 
takes some unmeasurable distance here, incalculable not least 
because, in a well-nigh zero degree of personal style, Platonov 
has virtually disappeared behind his peasant characters and 
their language. But this irony — which we may designate as the 
irony of the intellectual — might itself slip over into a rather 



and Death 114 



© 



a. 

o 



different irony, that of the communist militant, contemplating 
the simple-minded Utopian vagaries of these peasant organiz- 
ers, who plan, for example, to release their surviving cattle in 
the name of socialist construction: 

"Pretty soon we're going to turn the livestock out into 
nature . . . after all, they're almost people. It's just that 
age-old oppression has made the livestock lag behind man. 
But the livestock wants to become people too, you 
know!" (157/ 174) 



With this not implausible reading Chevengur offers an exhaus- 
tive description of everything backward and not yet politically 
conscious in the peasant mentality, as well as something like a 
balance sheet or agenda of the cultural work socialist construc- 
tion has before it. 

But once achieved, this kind of political reading can easily 
give way to another, related, but inverted one: the irony of the 
committed and political anticommunist, for whom Chevengur is 
very precisely a denunciation of socialism and Utopia, and an 
anatomy of what is repressive about the latter; here the key 
text would surely be that of the massacre of the bourgeoisie to 
which I have already alluded, but any number of moments of 
an awkward or stupid repressive violence will trigger the 
familiar Sovietological anticommunist readings through which, 
for the most part, all the Soviet works of any literary quality 
have been filtered on their transmission to the West. 

Nor is it impossible to subsume the psychoanalytic reading 
I have just mentioned under the larger rubric of irony, as a 
way of similarly discrediting the political elements and im- 
pulses of Chevengur: that the quest for socialism should turn 
out to be a category-mistake and a form of sexual avoidance 
behavior is as effective a way of depoliticizing history as the 
Oedipal interpretations of the student revolts of May 1968 or 
Tiananmen Square. 



115 Utopia, Modernism, 



But in fact the ultimate form that an ironic reading of 
Chevengur can take lies in its interpretation in terms of irony 
itself, as some ultimate life stance and moral and political 
metaphysic. We have indeed not sufficiently commented on 
the glaciality of Platonov's tone, the ruthlessness with which 
this narrative sets the most gruesome things in place, without 
comment, in a dissociation of sensibility so absolute that it 
sometimes evades our attention altogether like a pane of glass. 
The massacre is only the most dramatic example of this narra- 
tion at great distance; we can also observe it happening in 
the narrative of the experience of individual characters when 
suddenly, from the outside, we learn that one has fallen ill of 
a high fever — indeed, has already had a high fever for some 
time without our knowing it, who have been witnessing events 
through that character's eyes. The reader is struck by an utter 
lack of writerly self-consciousness in such passages — quite 
unlike the contrived omissions of Hemingway or the strategic 
leaps and shocks in Forster — as though in this case the writer 
himself did not even notice the difference; as though the 
events were unfolding before some impersonal registration 
mechanism that passed no judgement on them and entertained 
no discernable reaction. 

Indeed, we can only become aware of everything that is 
peculiar about this procedure by a complicated reading opera- 
tion whereby we ourselves draw back from the data furnished 
us in order to reconstruct it in a different — and more stereo- 
typical and familiar — recognizable form. We marshall a certain 
number of gestures and exclamations, put them back together 
again according to the dictates of common sense, look more 
closely at the results, and then murmur to ourselves, with no 
little bemusement: But . . . this is a massacre, these people 
are being killed! And then, in a second moment, we return to 
the text to ask ourselves: But is the writer aware of this? does 
he know what is going on? If this question can be answered in 
the affirmative, then we have to do in such a passage with 



d Death ll6 



what is normally characterized as irony: logical implication is 
then enough to allow us in yet a third moment to reconstruct 
an authorial position and judgement that had seemed absent, 
and to "decide" what the peculiarly neutral passage is in re- 
ality supposed to mean. But one of the peculiarities of irony 
itself in its purest form is that this third step is undecide- 
able and depends on some prior decision of our own in the 
void; nothing in the text authorizes it, nothing can be ad- 
duced after the fact to falsify or verify the interpretation in 
question. 

Recall, for example, the fisherman whose death I have 
already quoted above. The text, in all its peasant simple- 
mindedness, tells the story in terms of a fable or a fairy-tale, 
on the order of the boy who wanted to know fear. Here the 
fisherman wants to know death, and as in fairy-tales, takes 
steps to do so; unlike the fairy-tale form, however, no magical 
or didactic surprises complete the narrative — the fisherman 
simply drowns, and is then buried. In his film version, Alex- 
ander Sokurov adds the fairy-tale structure back in, in a way 
that makes for an instructive comparison: here it is the son 
who wants to know death; the father rows him out in the 
boat, helps him tie up his legs, and later on calls down into 
the water, asking the boy to tell him what it's like. Here at 
least we have a kind of closure, which transforms the mere 
event into an anecdote with a narrative shape. In Platonov's 
text, the only result is to add the fisherman to the novel's 
portrait gallery of obsessed lunatics or mentally retarded cre- 
tins. 

On the other hand, the reader is also free to draw back 
from the text in the way I have described. Then the fisher- 
man's act slowly reforms into a more recognizable event, 
namely what we normally call "suicide," into which we reckon 
back all that mental distress, incurable depression, anguish, 
intolerable mental suffering that presumably accompany the 
taking of one's own life; in this textual context, we then 



llj Utopia, Modern 



selectively test it for plausible inner-worldly motives such as 
famine, family troubles, or mid-life crisis. 

But the realistic common-sense picture of the fisherman s 
suicide that we reconstruct from this perspective is absolutely 
incompatible, it seems to me, with the fable about the man 
who grew more and more curious about death. At this point 
the only irony that seems plausible is the first of those men- 
tioned, the irony of the sophisticate for the peasant who thinks 
he is curious about death when in reality he simply wants to 
commit suicide. Yet even that irony is too strongly positioned; 
it implies a judgement of Platonov that the eerie blankness 
and impersonality of this text would seem to exclude. One 
conjectures therefore a final moment of synthesis beyond 
irony, in which the two versions of this event are again 
reconciled, by way of some protoreligious belief in that other, 
underwater, otherworldly space that might itself somehow be 
the Utopia of this one: and indeed the text tells us many 
hundred pages later in passing that 

Communism tormented Chepurny the way the secret of 
life after death had tormented Dvanov's father. Chepurny 
could not bear the mystery of time, so he cut short the 
length of history by the rapid construction of communism 
in Chevengur, just as the fisherman Dvanov could not bear 
his own life and so had transformed it into death, in order 
to experience the beauty of that world. (259/ 2& s) 

Unfortunately, this late rationalization or motivation of the 
episode merely kicks the mechanisms of irony into play all 
over again, in an interminable vicious circle. 

Irony in the West — or in Western high modernism — meant 
two things, whose very coexistence is itself "ironic." As a 
literary procedure and a property of the emergent modern 
novel, it reflected a twofold demographic enlargement: the 
experience of great masses of people in the industrial city, and 



d Death 118 



the wider sense of a global population brought to the metropo- 
lis by way of the new imperialisms. This sudden awareness of 
the multiplicity of other people coexisting with me determines 
an existential crisis in the metropolis whose effect is that 
radical devaluation of individual experience we call irony; it is 
inscribed in the narrative texts as a multiplicity of narrative 
perspectives or points of view, which relativize each other's 
hitherto absolute values. This kind of irony is signed by any 
number of illustrious names, from Henry James and Conrad 
across Gide and Fernando Pessoa to Pirandello. 

This first, social irony is pressed into the service of a 
second, more political and ideological kind, which might be 
subscribed to by names like Thomas Mann but that finds its 
fullest development in the ideologues of modernism and in 
particular the Anglo-American literary critics all the way to 
New Criticism. This second kind of irony, which it might be 
more appropriate to call antipolitical, finds its vocation in a 
rather different kind of social and ideological crisis — namely 
that of the modernist artists and writers themselves, whose 
mission and talent, along with their very artistic programs, 
spring from their loathing of the bourgeoisie and their repudia- 
tion of a market society, but whose formation largely forbids 
any serious long-term alliance with the other social class. In 
this situation of Hegelian Unhappy Consciousness and Sartrean 
bad faith alike, the second form of irony comes as a solution; 
for it allows that devaluation of personal experience and values 
achieved in the first form of irony to be transferred to the 
political situation, where it can now secure the bracketing of 
any fundamental personal and political commitment, while 
enabling the contemplative and henceforth purely aesthetic 
persistence of an oppositional social stance. 

This is the way in which the power of the various aesthetic 
modernisms was, during the Cold War and in the period of 
their North American canonization, displaced and invested in 
essentially antipolitical forms of academic aestheticism. The 



119 Utopia, Moderni. 



arrival of postmodernism, which now allows us to rewrite the 
history of modernism itself, may thus also allow us to revise 
this now virtually universal stereotype of the great Western 
modernists as subjective and quietistic antipolitical figures (a 
stereotype that had in any case to be an Anglo-American one, 
although its more recent construction in a depoliticized France 
suggests that it will in future years have an attraction in other 
national traditions at the very moment in which it loses its 
credibility for our own). 

But this situation explains why irony and Utopia have so 
often been felt to be incompatible, and why irony's supreme 
mission has indeed often been formulated as that of a weapon 
against the Utopian imagination. Platonov forces us to raise 
this issue again in a new way, without necessarily having any 
new solutions for us. He himself seems to have tried to resolve 
it by way of that radical depersonalization and chilling off of 
affect that we have referred to several times, and that, in one 
of the most remarkable pages of Chevengm, becomes a veritable 
vision of the dissociation of the self (which is also susceptible 
to a rewriting in terms of the religious narratives of the 
guardian angel): 

But there is within man also a tiny spectator who takes part 
neither in action nor in suffering, and who is always cold- 
blooded and the same. It is his service to see and be a 
witness, but he is without franchise in the life of man and 
it is not known why he exists in solitude. This corner of 
man's consciousness is lit both day and night, like the 
doorman's room in a large building. This heart doorman 
sits entire days at the entrance into man and knows all the 
inhabitants of his building, but not a single resident asks the 
doorman's advice about his affairs. The residents come and 
go, while the spectator-doorman watches them with his 
eyes. His powerless knowledge of everything makes him 
sometimes seem sad, but he is always polite, distant, and 



and Death 120 



c 

£ he keeps an apartment in another building. In the event of 

"o fire the doorman telephones the firemen and watches fur- 

^ ther events from without. 

.2 While Dvanov walked and rode without memory, this 

o" spectator within him saw everything, but it never warned 

t> him and never helped him, not once. He lived parallel to 

Dvanov, but he wasn't Dvanov. 

He existed somewhat like a man's dead brother; every- 
thing human seemed to be at hand, but something tiny and 
vital was lacking. Man never remembers him, but always 
trusts him, just as when a tenant leaves his house and his 
wife within, he is never jealous of her and the doorman. 

This is the eunuch of man's soul. It was to this that he 
was a witness. (80/90) 



This enigmatic passage (compounded by other strange texts of 
Platonov that have only recent come to light, which deal even 
more explicitly with sexuality) leaves us with questions to 
which only psychoanalysis would seem to have answers (but 
see Valery Podoroga's remarkable reading of it). Yet it seems 
important, if not to refuse those particular clinical answers 
altogether, at least to defer them as long as possible, so that 
more formal problems have time to be raised if not settled. 

Even if this stark depersonalization is grasped as something 
like a zero-degree and a virtual suicide of modernist irony (as 
I myself would tend to do), the question of its formal necessity 
remains open. Indeed, much in Platonov's shorter writing 
suggests that he required the framework of the larger Utopian 
narrative to develop an essentially lyric and fragmented con- 
tent that is otherwise trivialized in shorter texts, when it is 
not altogether mediocre. Platonov is, to be sure, very far from 
being the only modern writer to suffer this disjunction of fancy 
and imagination, of the molecular and the molar, as a well- 
nigh unresolvable formal crisis that could also, on occasion, be 
transformed into a more productive form-problem (as Lukacs 



121 Utopia, Modern 



called it), without for all that being transcended. This particu- 
lar problem, in which the attention to the minutely lyrical is 
incompatible with plot progression or narrative, is indeed 
uniquely remotivated by the episodic nature of the Utopian 
text, which came as a rescue for just such individual lyric 
moments in Platonov that otherwise had nowhere else to go — 
unless they were simply to end up allegorically designating 
themselves as such. Indeed, his greatest single short story, 
"Homecoming," with the hero's seemingly pathological and 
unmotivated departure from home and family, his voluntary 
abandonment of ordinary happiness, may be said allegorically 
to constitute Platonov's recognition that the lyric present has 
no destination and no principle of duration; that it must be 
given up or sacrificed, in order to secure even an unmotivated 
larger narrative form. 

As for a sexual or psychoanalytic explanation of the "eunuch 
of the soul," it seems important to make this into a two-way 
street and to insist on the need to explore the ways in which a 
specific biographical pathology — itself necessarily a historical 
phenomenon and a social fact, by virtue of its very existence as 
an unconscious symptom — constitutes under certain circum- 
stances a recording apparatus for a unique historical content 
that it can alone disclose and bring to objective expression. 
The grotesque depersonalization demanded by this Utopia in 
order to come into being is then enabled, as in some ruse of 
history, by Platonov's own peculiar temperament, which can 
thus be seen as historically necessary, however much a bio- 
graphical accident it may also have been. 

But to put things this way is also necessarily to recall the 
peasant background of this Utopia, and the way in which it is 
determined by the equally contingent intersection between a 
peasant way of life and a peasant mentality everywhere in the 
process of liquidation today and an essentially modernist proj- 
ect of social revolution (along with an essentially modernist 
formal structure in this narrative). This structural peculiarity 



d Death 122 



demands to be juxtaposed with whatever psychoanalytic struc- 
tures are posited on the basis of Platonov's peculiar style and 
his narrative production. 

Our own relationship to this text can, to be sure, be 
rehearsed in many different ways, only a few of which have 
found expression in the preceding pages: the postmodernities 
have themselves much to learn from this archaic specimen of 
modernism, fresh as though out of a time capsule, owing to its 
recent discovery as well as to the historic omission of any 
specifically modernist moment from Soviet history, an anach- 
ronistic survival with its hair and fingernails still growing as 
it were. Postmodern and poststructural conceptions of the 
dissociation of the subject and the extinction of its cen- 
teredness are in particular challenged by the conception of the 
"eunuch of the soul," which somehow exhibits this familiar 
postmodern motif of the death of the subject from a starkly 
unfamiliar or defamiliarized and properly modernist stand- 
point. 

Meanwhile, the sacrality of the high modern text — if not 
its religious dimension then at least its more Heideggerian 
vocation to serve as the vehicle for the deconcealing of truth — 
here seems to reach an outer edge, where it suggests affinities 
with some of the great nontheological visions such as Bud- 
dhism. Here too, however, it seems best to defer such lessons 
for a more formal examination of the implications between 
the Utopian text and such metaphysical or postmetaphysical 
content. For the relationship between Utopia and death is an 
essential one, but not because of any mystical properties of 
death itself: rather, death is the aftereffect and the sign that 
the perspective of Utopia has been reached, which consists in 
a great and progressive distance from all individual and exis- 
tential experience, from individual people, from characters (to 
raise the related issue of Utopian discourse versus narrative or 
storytelling). The emergence of death is then at that point the 
signal that it has been possible to take the point of view of the 



123 Utopia, Moderni 



species upon human existence. Utopia necessarily takes the 
point of view of the species upon human history, thus empty- 
ing it of much that we consider not merely historical but 
irreplaceably significant in human life. For the urgent specific- 
ity of historical events is at one with their uniqueness and 
their contingency: the irrevocable moment when this special 
possibility had to be grasped or forever lost. History is the 
most intense experience of this unique fusion of time and the 
event, temporality and action; history is choice, freedom, and 
failure all at once, inevitable failure, but not death. Utopia is 
set at a height from which those changes are no longer visible: 
even if the Utopia in question is one of absolute change, 
change is nonetheless viewed from that well-nigh glacial and 
inhuman standpoint as absolute repetition, as a sameness of 
change as far as the eye can reach. A state of society that does 
not need history or historical struggle lies beyond much that is 
precious to us in individual as well as collective existence; its 
thought obliges us to confront the most terrifying dimension 
of our humanity, at least for the individualism of modern, 
bourgeois people, and that is our species being, our insertion 
in the great chain of the generations, which we know as death. 
Utopia is inseparable from death in that its serenity gazes 
calmly and implacably away from the accidents of individual 
existence and the inevitability of its giving way: in this sense it 
might even be said that Utopia solves the problem of death, 
by inventing a new way of looking at individual death, as a 
matter of limited concern, beyond all stoicism. 

Utopia is also many other things and brings other require- 
ments with it; but it is this as well, so that it may not be so 
great a paradox to find Utopian lessons, which is to say a hint 
and a beginning of Utopian representation, in Kafka's grim 
story Josephina the Singer; or, the Mice People. Not really a story 
exactly or a narrative (and in that very much like Utopian 
discourse), this text would seem to be a parable of the artist 
rather than a blueprint for communal living; even though 



d Death 124 



the alternate title underscores a Gestalt alternation whereby 
these pages — which have but two "characters" in any tradi- 
tional sense, Josephina and "the people," — can be read fully 
as much as a presentation of the latter as they are a dramatiza- 
tion of the former, who in that case becomes the representa- 
tional pretext that alone makes the collective subject fitfully 
visible. 

Kafka, the most logical of writers since the great alternating 
periodic sentences of the eighteenth century, not only shifts 
with monotonous regularity between the twin subjects of his 
double title, but also between the pour and the contre, between 
an affirmation and a negation equally predictable in their 
alternation, whose implacable rhythm — "but," "yet," "doch" — 
makes up the fateful neutrality of his style. In this tale, how- 
ever, the alternating rhythm is itself a philosophical concept or 
category, and expresses the unresolvable paradoxes of art and 
culture, in fully as analytic a fashion as Marcuse was to do a 
few years later in his great essay, "The Affirmative Character 
of Culture." For art is the faithful expression of society — and 
thus the same as it — at the same time that as a representation 
of society and its self-consciousness it must also be different 
from its object. Josephina is, then, one sustained extraordinary 
exercise in the passage back and forth between this identity 
and this difference. 

Thus: Josephina's music is great, but we are not a musical 
people. Yet perhaps Josephina's "music" is not musical either, 
but is rather constituted by "pfeifen," "piping," which in fact all 
of us do. Is she therefore supremely different from all of us, 
or exactly the same as all of us? The former, surely, because 
even in her very ordinary piping, she frames the performance 
and makes of it a ritual; thus, "we admire in her what we do 
not at all admire in ourselves" (195/130),* which is to say 

*Page references in the text are first to the German text, Samtliche Erzahlungen, 
ed. Paul Raabe (Frankfurt: Fischer, 1973), and then to the English translation by 
Willa and Edwin Muir, in The Basic Kafka, ed. Erich Heller (New York: Pocket 
Books, 1979). 



12$ Utopia, Modernism, 



that despite her deliberate performance, she is not different 
but the same. Yet we are silent and she sings. 

Meanwhile, her vocation is stimulated by the great crises 
(even though, for the people of the mice, every day is a crisis, 
fraught with extreme danger). But by assembling us she often 
puts us in crisis and in extreme danger, making us vulnerable 
to our mortal enemies (203/139). 

She taxes her own forces and her body to the utmost, 
imagining that in such crises she is protecting us (199/134); 
whereas in fact her hold over us is that we imagine ourselves 
to be protecting her, as pitiful and vulnerable as she seems to 
us (199/133)- Nor does this moment bear only on the role 
the charismatic artist plays for her public: one thinks also of 
guerrilla warfare, and of Frances FitzGerald's account of the 
anti-Confucianism of the Vietcong, whose astute strategy lay 
in assuring the people of the villages, We are not your father; 
you are our mother. At this point, then, the theme of the tale 
shifts from art (difference) to collectivity (identity), with this 
proviso that only the intervention of art and the theme of the 
great artist could make it possible to grasp the essential ano- 
nymity of the people, who have no feeling for art, no rever- 
ence for the artist, no place for the aesthetic: so that, as we 
shall see, these enabling representational pretexts must at a 
final limit again cancel themselves out. 

So it is that Josephina lets the people be what they already 
are: uniquely, she causes them to assemble in silence— would 
this be possible without her ("how can our gatherings take 
place in utter silence?" [209/145])? She constitutes the neces- 
sary element of exteriority that alone permits immanence to 
come into being: "we too are soon sunk in the feeling of the 
mass, that, warmly pressed body to body, listens with indrawn 
breath" (197 / 1 32); "as if the harried individual once in a while 
could relax and stretch himself at ease in the great, warm bed 
of the community" (203/138). Her performance is in reality 
"not so much a performance of songs as an assembly of the 
people" (200/13$); and Kafka's story thus ultimately derives 



and Death 126 



£ from the same mysteries from which political philosophy itself 
"2 emerges, from the riddle of Rousseau's general will, and of 
^ the paradoxes of collective representation. For Josephina's art 
.2 "comes almost like a message from the whole people to each 
o" individual; Josephina's thin piping amidst grave decisions is 
5 almost like our people's precarious existence amidst the tu- 
mult of a hostile world" (200/136). She is thus the vehicle for 
the collectivity's affirmation of itself: she reflects their collec- 
tive identity back to them. But at one and the same time, she 
then immediately demands special privileges (exemption from 
physical labor) as a compensation for her labor or indeed as a 
recognition of her unique distinction and her irreplaceable 
service to the community. 

It is perhaps the high point of Kafka's tale, and nowhere is 
the icy indifference of this Utopia of democracy more aston- 
ishingly revealed (but revealed by way of nothing and no 
reaction) than in the refusal of the people to grant her this 
form of individual difference: "the people listen to her argu- 
ments and pay no attention" (204/ 140). 

Suppose that instead of the people one had an individual to 
deal with: one might imagine that this man had been giving 
in to Josephina all the time while nursing a wild desire to 
put an end to his submissiveness one fine day; that he had 
made superhuman sacrifices for Josephina in the firm belief 
that there was a natural limit to his capacity for sacrifice; 
yes, that he had sacrificed more than was needful merely to 
hasten the process, merely to spoil Josephina and encourage 
her to ask for more and more until she did indeed reach 
the limit with this last petition of hers; and that he then cut 
her off with a final refusal which was curt because long held 
in reserve. (2oj-6/ 141-142) 



But the people is precisely not an individual or a character in 
this sense, nor are Kafka's logical alternatives of positive and 
negative sequential and diachronic, like a story of action and 



127 Utopia, Modernism, 



reaction, in which the one might be explained as a compensa- 
tion for the other. Rather they are synchronic and simultane- 
ous: the essence of the people lies in this absolute indifference 
to individuals. Insofar as Josephina causes the essence of the 
people to appear, she also causes this essential indifference 
of the anonymous and the radically democratic equally to 
emerge. Her difference, by revealing identity, is then canceled 
by the force of that absolute collective identity. 

It is thus no longer certain that she is a great artist in the 
first place (indeed, it is possible that "the mere fact of our 
listening to her is proof that she is no singer" [201/136]); she 
is in fact pathetic and ludicrous (although we never laugh at 
her [198/133]), and her pretensions are childish. But our 
children have no childhood; and the aesthetic of play Josephina 
represents (difference) can have no equivalent in our lives. 
Her art is thus supremely ambiguous: "something of our poor 
brief childhood is in it, something of lost happiness that can 
never be found again [difference, a reality of art utterly op- 
posed to the conditions of life] but also something of active 
daily life, of its small gaieties, unaccountable and yet springing 
up and not to be obliterated [identity, art reflecting the condi- 
tions of the social] (203/139)." 

The sounding of the theme of childhood is therefore at one 
with the sounding of the theme of death, and of generations: 
children have no childhood, but "the fertility of our race" 
causes "one generation to tread on the heels of another, the 
children have no time to be children"; children thus dramatize 
not merely the fleeting sequence of generations but somehow 
absolute difference as well, they are children who have no 
time to be children — they have a merely negative existence as 
what prevents the previous generation from knowing child- 
hood in the first place: 

And not the same children, as in those schools, no, always 
new children again and again, without end, without a 
break, hardly does a child appear than it is no more a child, 



d Death i28 



while behind it new childish faces are already crowding so 
fast and so thick they are indistinguishable. (201/ 137) 

But this means not merely death in general and collectively 
but also the death of Josephina in particular: what can remain 
of her if she is unique? And here the story turns against itself, 
and having made reflections of a general and nonnarrative 
nature, which are presumably always the case, now shifts gears 
into the temporal ("that happened a day or two ago"), at which 
point the very paradox of the historical existence of Josephina 
is underscored, as well as the absolute tension that obtains 
between the Utopia of the absolute community and the history 
of the unique and of the event. Josephina will presumably then 
become history, as they say — only we have no history and 
detest historians. Her unique historical glory will thus be to be 
forgotten: Josephina "will happily lose herself in the number- 
less throng of the heroes of our people, and soon, since we 
are no historians, will rise to the heights of redemption and be 
forgotten like all her brothers" (209/ 14^). Difference is ef- 
faced by the identity it was alone able to reveal for an instant. 
Utopia is precisely the elevation from which this species for- 
getfulness and oblivion — quite the opposite of what obtains 
for animals who have no individuation to begin with — takes 
place; it is anonymity as an intensely positive force, as the 
most fundamental fact of life of the democratic community; 
and it is this anonymity that in our non- or pre-Utopian world 
goes under the name and characterization of death. It seems 
appropriate to use Chevengur as a source for such Utopian 
reeducation, as we have here used Kafka. 



The Constraints of Postmodernism 



w 
w 
cc 
x 

E- 

I— 
cd 
<C 

q_ As I suggested in my introduction, the organiz- 

ing frame of this section is, if not structural, 
then at least typological: the very framework 
itself is an argument, and was designed to show 
that the rich plurality of styles that postmodern- 
ism often enough celebrates about itself can be 
sorted out into tendencies that form a system. 
A system in this sense is at one and the same 
time freedom and determination: it opens a set 
of creative possibilities (which are alone possi- 



of Postmodernism 130 



ble as responses to the situation it articulates) as well as 
tracing ultimate limits of praxis that are also the limits of 
thought and imaginative projection. So if it is true it lies, and 
we would have no way of knowing we were locked into it, no 
way of drawing the boundary lines in which we are ourselves 
contained. By the same token, such a scheme wants to be 
objective but can never be anything more than ideological: for 
it becomes very difficult indeed to think how we might distin- 
guish the real existence of the various kinds into which modern 
building falls from the patent invention of various systems of 
those kinds in our own heads. There is, in fact, something of a 
false problem here: the nagging worry, about whether we are 
in fact drawing our own eye, can be assuaged to a certain 
degree by the reminder that our eye is itself part of the very 
system of Being that is our object of speculation. Better to 
have drawn our eye — as a local fragment of that immense 
system of Being — than to find the last feeble light source in 
the cave extinguished altogether! In fact, then, the productive 
systems of the artists and architects come from the same place 
as the thinking about the features that might somehow define 
and describe them: it is all of a piece, all postmodern some- 
how, by virtue of that Zeitgeist whose existence is presup- 
posed here, if not conjectured. 

At that point of indistinction, then, when the diagnosis is 
also its own symptom, can one continue to speak of argument, 
let alone of proof (not to think of falsifiability)? A certain 
conviction that you are working in the right direction comes, 
I think, when the traits or semes of the semiotic square begin 
to accumulate interesting synonyms from different systems: 
thus "replication" begins to resonate with the vibrations of 
"intertextuality," while the kinship between formal innovation 
(in the high modern) and the theoretical vanguardism of a 
much later period is reinforced. These overlaps are in reality 
something like arguments in their own right, implied theories 
of local history waiting to be exfoliated. The moment in which 
a seme from one kind of movement begins to coincide with 



131 The Constraints 



o 



3 



that of another is a kind of discovery procedure, which, far 
from reconfirming what we know (or think we know) al- o 
ready— surely the basic fear about a thought suspected of 3 
being little more than a projection of itself onto the outside 
world — leads to new interpretations. 3 

By the same token, falsifiability is here simply the unfurling 
of a list of features, traits, and semes that can find no place at 
all in the current system, even though they exist and demand 
attention. It might be said that rather than disproving the 
scheme, this mode of objection simply renders it trivial. If, on 
the other hand, a different scheme— with its own simultaneous 
contraries and contradictories— is proposed, then what results 
is a quarrel of interpretations that far from putting an end to 
one of its starting points, is more likely to lead on into 
something similar, but unimaginably more complex: an out- 
come that, on my view, would tend to confirm the fruitfulness 
of the current hypothesis, in however perverse and backhanded 
a fashion. 

Contrary to what Hegel thought and tried to put into 
practice, with the semiotic square— owing to its synchronic 
nature— the story of the origins of this or that feature can do 
little to illuminate the dynamics of the thing itself: there is 
therefore always a difficulty in beginning in any nondogmatic 
way, and that problem will here be avoided by following the 
very logic of the term itself and proposing that it is clearly 
enough modernism that is the situation of postmodernism and 
the starting point for any number of the latter's developments. 
These then prove, on closer inspection, to be simple inver- 
sions, negations, and cancelations of features normally attrib- 
uted to modernism. The unintended consequence of this pro- 
cedure would be the conclusion that postmodernism is little 
more than modernism after all (or that it is parasitic or belated 
with respect to the latter's achievements). I am very far from 
wanting to endorse that kind of view, but it might be side- 
stepped by adopting the hypothesis that, at least at its begin- 
nings the negation, inversion, or cancellation of high modern- 



Postmodernism 132 



ism was what the first postmoderns thought they were up 
to, while in the process of generating something altogether 
different. 

This seems at least to be the case with the twin semes into 
which we begin by articulating high modernism here: both are 
scandals for current postmodern doxa, so that we may well be 
allowed to begin by positing the fundamental features or semes 
of high modernism in a kind of demiurgic impulse in which a 
desire called totality is somehow, impossibly, conjoined with a 
desire called innovation or simply the New. The question will 
inevitably arise, however, why these two things should be 
thought of as an opposition, as standing in a contradictory 
tension with one another. That is a very interesting question, 
which would lead on into the scholastics of the modern itself; 
I here assume that it is the constitution of an immense monadic 
style, that phenomenological world which is the form and 
appearance the category of totality takes in all the great mod- 
ern artists from the literature of Proust and Joyce to the 
architecture of Frank Lloyd Wright and Mies, from Wagner's 
Gesamtkunstwerk or Schoenberg's post-tonal system to the very 
different painterly totalities of Kandinsky's or Malevich's mys- 
tical systems and of Picasso's protean multiplicities. If so, it is 
precisely these immense monadic efforts — enormous, unthink- 
able synchronicities — that divert attention from the diachronic 
originalities of the artists in question as they, punctually tinker 
with this or that technique or feature of their immediate 
predecessor (in such a way that the tinkering, the minute local 
revision generates a whole illusion of new work, in a kind of 
vast aesthetic "motivation of the device" in the familiar expres- 
sion of the Russian Formalists). The two perspectives are 
perhaps merely optional ones: still, they open up lines of flight 
that put a rather different spin on the works in question, now 
immense, self-sufficient, timeless substances a la Spinoza, now 
moments in a patient diachronic chain, in the telos of the 
modern as it cancels what went before and patiently invents a 
new Novum for the new present. 




Postmodernism 134 



I 

At any rate this starting point now raises interesting questions 
about the status of both these categories, Totality and Innova- 
tion, in the era of the postmodern. As far as the first of these 
is concerned, at least, it seems appropriate to interrogate the 
category of Totality in the light of that contemporary (or 
postcontemporary) architect whose work most dramatically 
and unexpectedly returns to the project of larger form and of 
large buildings. Rem Koolhaas has indeed characterized his 
own initial (theoretical) interest in the United States (in his 
remarkable book Delirious New York) as a kind of intellectual 
sublimation of the vocation for large scale that he was unable 
to realize practically in the narrower confines of the European 
nation-states and in particular of his native Holland. Euro- 
pean integration then opened up this situation unexpectedly, 
and made the large project into a practical possibility. Kool- 
haas has himself enthusiastically embraced this possibility, 
above all in the grand designs for the Library of France ("la 
tres grande bibliotheque") in Paris and for the Sea Trade 
Center in Zeebrugge, Belgium, the entry point into Europe of 
the ferry lines that will henceforth have to compete with the 
"Chunnel." (One might also include, among such projects, 
the Art and Media Center in Karlsruhe and the Congrexpo 
in Lille, as well as the Convention Center in Agadir, but 
not, perhaps, the individual dwellings and apartment build- 
ings, which — no less formally interesting — would rather 
seem to embody the lyric side of what is otherwise an epic 
impulse.) 

The relevance of such projects for us is that both in their 
very different ways give body to a will to include an entire 
world within themselves: one of information and the various 
traditions of signs, in the library, the other the multitudinous 
consequences of the media in its other major acceptation, 
namely as transport and physical conveyance. Unlike the mod- 
ern project, these public ventures must underscore the exclu- 



13$ The Constraints 



O 



sion of private life, and they necessarily reincorporate the 
paradoxes of private property after the end of civil society (in o 
the one, by way of the dialectic of the property of information; £ 
in the other, by way of the more classic antinomy of a public 
space that is privately owned). 3 

What is of interest for us in the present context is the 
metamorphosis these new projects inflect upon the older mod- 
ernist categories of envelopment, incorporation, containership, 
and finally the duality of inside and outside that all the older 
forms implied in one way or another. The enormous box that 
houses the Library of France, for example, rebukes traditional 
conceptions of the shell or the shape by its very enormity, 
attempting, as I will argue in a moment, by the prosaic nature 
of the form to escape formal perception altogether. What this 
nonform specifically negates, I believe, is the grandest of 
modernist, Corbusean conceptions of the essentially expressive 
relationship between the interior and its outer plastic lines and 
walls, which were to shed their rigidity and simply follow 
their functions in such a way as to correspond aesthetically to 
the rather different realities within. This was then a kind of 
hermeneutic aesthetic, by virtue of which the existential and 
spatial properties of the various forms of activity within (the 
former rooms, here abolished by the free plan) were as it 
were transferred to the rather different materials of the outside 
surfaces, with their properties of visualization and photo- 
graphability. The expressive correspondence (one would want 
to strengthen this into a well-nigh Althusserian diagnostic 
concept on the order and with the rigor of his well-known 
"expressive causality") is virtually a preallegorical or symbolic 
one; it is a kind of one-to-one matching in which the problem 
of representation itself (or translation) seems to disappear, 
leaving us with the freshness of a kind of new nature in these 
non- and postnatural clean Corbusean forms, of which Venturi 
has said that they are to be assimilated to sculptures rather 
than to buildings (or perhaps to buildings so ashamed of 



Postmodernism 



136 





that condition that they long to disguise themselves as sculp- 
tures) . 

The new concept that Koolhaas' s large scale now produces 
may be formulated rather in terms of incommensurability. Here 
the functions, the rooms, the interior, the inner spaces, hang 
within their enormous container like so many floating organs. 
The model indeed shows them up as though endowed with a 
kind of X-ray existence within the immense, now virtually 
translucent cube. Koolhaas has himself indeed invented a re- 
markable figure in order to characterize this unusual, untradi- 
tional mode of being within: "In this block," he says, "the 
major public spaces are defined as absences of building, voids 
carved out from the information solid. Floating in memory, 
they are like multiple embryos, each with their own techno- 
logical placenta" (El Croquis, 68). Meanwhile, the contents of 
the various large-scale projects can also be seen as a selection 
of all the geometric forms and solids imaginable: an enormous 
random collection of solids, cones, cubes, pyramids, spheres, 




and so on, such that what they are housed or collected m (as 
it were the notorious "class of all classes") does not itself fall 
under any of those geometrical types or categories and must 
be dismissively referred to as a "block." Something about the 
essence of a model or maquette as such seems at stake here, 
and auto-referred, in distinction to "paper architecture," to the 
usual stereometric drawing, let alone the glossy photographic 
plate or colored image; it is as though these projects also 
somehow attempted to realize the Platonic ideal of the 
"model" as such. 

Formally, what the emergence of this new category of 
"floating organs" does is to problematize and ultimately to 
dispel any last illusion of the possibility of a Corbusean expres- 
sive correspondence. This does not, however, undermine 
the category of translation itself but rather, in the form of 
transcoding, intensifies it to a new conceptual luminscence. 
For just as the inner shapes and organs coexist, tranquilly 



Postmodernism 138 



missing each other in space or interpenetrating without 
touching each other — in the same way that the activities with 
which they are associated convey so many dimensions that 
overlap without coinciding — reading with eating, for example, 
or the consumption of images with the participation in confer- 
ences — so also in this very spatial simultaneity the notion of 
the incommensurable waxes, and along with it the urge and 
will to translate the givens of any single dimension into another 
one: an impulse which, impossible of realization, evolves all 
the more, battening on its very frustration, into the sheer 
concept of transcoding itself. This goes well beyond anything 
organic in the conventional ideological sense (of a complete 
body, of organic wholeness and harmony); it even presses the 
modernist notion of the organic beyond its limits (as when 
Joyce underscored the radical functional difference of each 
organ by assigning it to the radically different stylistic dynamics 
of each of his virtually autonomous chapters). Presupposed 
here is that ultimate rejoining and reidentification of the or- 
ganic with the mechanical that Deleuze and Donna Haraway, 
each in his or her very different ways, theorize and celebrate; 
but within a category — that of totality — alien to either of 
them. 

Meanwhile, the Zeebrugge Terminal, like the helmet of an 
immense cosmonaut, part plastic part metal, "a cross between 
a ball and a cone" (El Croquis, 80), includes, in the same 
nonspecifiable way, whole former structures, such as a hotel 
and an office building, along with the rose des sables of the on- 
and off-ramps, as delicately interlaced as the great Figueroa 
grade crossing in downtown Los Angeles: allegories, perhaps, 
of that other intestinal necessity of the modern building about 
which Koolhaas has frequently complained, that of the pipes 
and wiring, the "services" ("it is unbelievable how a component 
that amounts to one third of the section of a building and may 
represent 50 percent of the budget is in a way inaccessible to 
architectural thought" [13]), whose problematic he elsewhere 



J39 The Constraints 




dramatized, as an opportunity rather than a dilemma, in his 
"theory" of the elevator (discussed in Part One), where the 
existence of such a central mechanism seemed to offer a 
way of concentrating everything heterogeneous and external 
together in a governable fashion. 

Yet the necessary existence of internal multiplicity persists, 
a reality for which the word heterogeneity is too weak, at least 
in part precisely because multiplicity is here included and 
somehow contained and implies a whole new conception of 
the relationship between individual items, formerly always 
figures on a ground, or ensembles artfully and harmoniously 
combined and constructed. Here, however, floating means a 
radical absence of ground as such, let alone the end of even 
more traditional conceptions of perspective, imbrication, art- 
ful contrast, arrangement, and the like. But this now begins 
to produce a new category of its own, of which we must 
still imperfectly speak in terms of part or element or compo- 




Office for Metropolitan Architecture 



SEA TERMINAL 'ZEEBRUGGE' 




1 LOBBY HOTEL 2 RESTAURAHT 1 KEUKEN < BAR S TOILETTES 6 BOND GANG 7 KANTOREN 8 TOILETTEH 

9 EIP0S1T1E/PROH0TIEVLAK 10 CINEHA 11 F 1LK/VI DtO SCREEN 



141 The Constraints 



■a 



3 



nent, and that now in its turn begins to generate a semiotic 
position in its own right, something like the absolute contra- 
dictory of the category of totality, which, as we shall see <* 
shortly, defines a rather different situation and a rather differ- 2. 
ent set of formal problems for other postmodern or postcon- 3 
temporary architects. 

For the moment, however, we must turn our attention to a 
different angle of the semiotic square: for the Koolhaas we 
have so far evoked, if his work is characterized only in terms 
of the desire called totality, risks being assimilated back into 
the modernist paradigm itself (for which, to be sure, he 
himself admits some small nostalgia). To anticipate, we will 
call the other operative feature of his work — a resolutely 
non- or antimodern one — the engagement with the issue and 
problem of replication as such — that is to say, the obligation to 
come to terms with the city fabric and the cultural patterning 
into which the building, even that on so large a scale, is thrust. 
But for Koolhaas, as indeed for other consequent modern 
artists, this issue of the fabric is in reality at one with that of 
large scale, an expression that can designate both the individual 
building and also the urban in general. If modern architecture 
is in general characterized by the dilemma of a radical split 
between the architectural and the urban, the concept of repli- 
cation can be read as a novel way of addressing that gap, not 
by synthesis or reconstruction but by way of reduplication (or 
even of scaling, to use Peter Eisenman's concept). 

But this solution is what emerged from one of the classic 
texts of contemporary theory, Learning from Las Vegas, by 
Venturi, Scott- Brown, and Izenour (a work that it would be 
misguided to classify as an exclusively architectural study; it 
could also be read as a manifesto for the newly emerging 
"cultural studies"). Learning from Las Vegas starts from the 
premise that architectural high modernism viewed the modern 
industrial city as a pathology that it was the task of great 
architecture to overcome; the great modern building was to 



Postmodernism 14 2 



begin to do this by way of a radical act of separation and 
disjunction from that diseased city fabric: the insalubrious, 
reeking, airless, sodden alleys of a dead inherited medieval 
city, the industrial slums of a modern agglomeration — best to 
do away with those streets altogether, to open all that to sun 
and fresh air by an act of joyous destruction, and to erect, in 
places once weighed down by the most impenetrable Mietka- 
serne and cobblestones, exhilarating high-rises rearing off their 
ground on pilotis that stood as a symbol of defiance and refusal 
of, escape from, the old world, the old Europe, the nineteenth 
century. 

But looking back from the 1 960s in the United States, all this 
modernized excitement, akin to the thrill of the radio and the 
transatlantic ocean liner (lit up like a city at sea), palls into the 
sheerest upper-class elitism — repugnance for the illiteracy of 
immigrants, and for their enforced lack of hygiene, and lack of 
taste or respect. The aesthetic attitude thus seems to shed its 
skin and reveal the social and political face of an ivy-league aris- 
tocracy we no longer acknowledge. Learning from Las Vegas, in- 
deed, explicitly proposes the linguistic version of the matter. 
The "fallen" city fabric ("who would have thought death had un- 
done so many?") is in reality a vernacular, even more than a me- 
lange of accents and ungrammatical expressions of ignorance; 
it can be spoken and learned in its own right, and indeed 
the urban architect ought to speak that and not invent a high 
modern idiolect of his own choosing on the grounds that it is 
purer and less alienated (this kind of alienation theory now com- 
ing to seem the conservative cultural pathos of the old elites) . 

These excellent sentiments, which would seem to urge us 
in the direction of a vernacular architecture (where it is diffi- 
cult to separate out the national-American from the secular- 
modernized), then begin to raise new problems of their own. 
The city fabric is now to be endorsed, rather than reformed or 
replaced, but the status of the individual building within that 
fabric, even if it now "speaks the same language," is less clear: 



143 The Constraints 



who needs architects at all if it is simply to be a question of 
putting up more of the same (a process presumably not in any 
danger of being interrupted, at least not in the American city)? 
Venturi's answer retains one of the central categories of the 
high modern, namely Irony; it proposes that the new, archi- 
tect-designed building stand out ever so slightly from the 
vernacular surrounding it by way of a barely perceptible ironic 
distance, the merest thickening and distillation of a self-con- 
sciousness in the speaking, like the faintest quotation marks 
around a familiar colloquial outburst. One takes the point; but 
it does not quite seem to work, particularly since irony itself 
was traditionally a sign fully as much as a weapon of just those 
condescending upper classes from which we were supposed to 
escape. 

A rather different answer seems possible, which now re- 
turns us to that category of totality from which, as an emblem 
of the high-modernist enemy, we had thought we were emerg- 
ing, advancing from the "monumental duck," the modernist 
sculpture symbolic of a whole Rilkean "change of life," out 
into the miracle mile and the freeways of the vernacular 
developments as they devour ever more of the surrounding 
former countryside. For a moment (which now seems past), 
this new "fabric" was also described in terms of chaos theory: 
not a vernacular you learned to speak (like black English) but 
the outer edge of the way the neo-universe lawfully produces, 
not homogeneity and standardization but a genuine postmod- 
ern heterogeneity (consistent with the freedom of the market 
itself). Now the new individual building does not even have a 
fabric into which to "fit," like some well-chosen word; it no 
longer has the option of constituting some part of speech of a 
vernacular linguistic production, rather it must somehow 
merely replicate the chaos and the turbulences all around it. 
But under these circumstances the individual construction can 
once again discover a vocation to enact the totality, albeit in 
an inversion of the modernist gesture. As in Hegel's inverted 



Postmodernism 144 



world, Le Corbusier wanted to conjure into being a micro- 
cosm that was the opposite of the fallen real conditions and 
their Utopian transformation; what will shortly be referred to 
as "dirty realism" can now aspire to offering a microcosm that 
replicates those conditions and within its new type of closure 
simulates all the chaotic libidinal freedom of the now danger- 
ous world outside. It is the passage from the amusement park 
to the mall: now private police and concealed cameras sanitize 
the unruliness of the older collective experience and make it 
accessible to aesthetic and postmodern reception. Replication 
meanwhile also means the depoliticization of the former mod- 
ern, the consent to corporate power and its grants and con- 
tracts, the reduction of social conscience to manageable, prac- 
tical, pragmatic limits; the Utopian becomes unmentionable, 
along with socialism and unbalanced budgets. Clearly also, on 
any materialist view, the way the building forms fall out is of 
enormous significance; in particular the proportion of individ- 
ual houses to office buildings, the possibility or not of urban 
ensembles, the rate of commissions for public buildings such 
as opera houses or museums (often recontained within those 
reservation spaces of private or public universities, which are 
among the most signal sources of high-class contemporary 
patronage), and not least the chance to design apartment 
buildings or public housing. (I have argued elsewhere that the 
private home rebuilt by Frank Gehry, one of the most remark- 
able achievements of postcontemporary architecture, is fully as 
much to be considered an exemplification of such "dirty real- 
ism" as are the grandiose new totalities of Koolhaas with which 
we have been concerned.) 

We will see shortly how these works, which on our scheme 
preserve a certain, narrowly specifiable share of the modernist 
impulse as such, are to be distinguished from those other, 
more characteristic postmodernisms that more completely re- 
pudiate that impulse, while exploring the possibilities of repli- 
cation in rather different ways from this. 



14S The Constraints 



Before doing so, however, we must now retrace our steps, 
and in a long digression explain the peculiar title that has been 
selected for the quadrant just examined, and for the work of 
Rem Koolhaas in particular. 

Dirty realism is a suggestive term applied to architecture by 
Liane Lefaivre that deserves further meditation and specula- 
tion. She herself found the term in an essay by Bill Buford in 
Granta on recent U.S. writing, in particular on the new Ameri- 
can short story; it may be worth quoting Buford' s own re- 
marks about this new trend he feels himself able to identify 
and to distinguish from Mailer-type existentialism or new- 
novel-type poststructural fabulation or indeed other kinds of 
writing that make "the large historical statement." 

It is instead a fiction of a different scope — devoted to the 
local details, the nuances, the little disturbances in language 
and gesture — and it is entirely appropriate that its primary 
form is the short story and that it is so conspicuously part 
of the American short story revival. But these are strange 
stories: unadorned, unfurnished, low-rent tragedies about 
people who watch day-time television, read cheap ro- 
mances or listen to country and western music. They are 
waitresses in roadside cafes, cashiers in supermarkets, con- 
struction workers, secretaries and unemployed cowboys. 
They play bingo, eat cheeseburgers, hunt deer and stay in 
cheap hotels. They drink a lot and are often in trouble: for 
stealing a car, breaking a window, pickpocketing a wallet. 
They are from Kentucky or Alabama or Oregon, but, 
mainly, they could just about be from anywhere: drifters in 
a world cluttered with junk food and the oppressive details 
of modern consumerism. ("Introduction" 4) 

Lefaivre, however, tries out this interesting new slogan on 
Gehry and Koolhaas — which already opens up a breach in the 



Postmodernism 146 



concept, or so it seems to me. She refers — quite rightly in my 
opinion — to Blade Runner, whereby the breach is significantly 
enlarged; and if you added that new kind of science -fictional 
production called "cyberpunk," it would be enlarged even 
more dramatically, indeed, virtually beyond repair. But how 
can a term or slogan, about which we do not even yet know 
what its object is, stage itself as inappropriate and begin to 
modify its own meaning and to correct itself, as it were in the 
linguistic void, before the emergence of any reality with which 
it can be compared? 

This is, I think, because the slogan carries its breach within 
itself and is so far merely acting out the internal dynamic of its 
own structure, which is not merely twofold (the question of 
how "realism" could be or get "dirty") but tripartite insofar as 
the declared intent to apply a term such as realism to architec- 
ture in the first place raises problems of its own and incites to 
conjecture. If by realism we mean mimesis of some sort, then 
it is certainly not clear from the outset how any architecture 
could be considered realistic: Le Corbusier's white walls, the 
ascetic absence of ornament, the Bauhaus's functionalisms, can 
surely not be considered any more realistic in any of the 
possible senses than the Gothic revival or neoclassicism or 
the wildest fantasies of Gaudi. 

A mimesis derived from the Venturi-Rauch-Brown replica- 
tion, or "speaking the vernacular," seems to offer a more 
promising line on architectural "realism," dirty or not; but 
before we adopt it let's look again at the spatial features of 
Buford's description: "day-time television" is evoked, along 
with "roadside cafes," "supermarkets," and "cheap hotels" (why 
not motels, one wonders), there is petty crime and junk food 
and "modern consumerism." These are familiar features of 
daily life in the superstate from which, it should be noted, 
high modernism in the United States^in theory and in prac- 
tice alike, fifties aestheticism organized around Pound and 
Henry James and Wallace Stevens and the New Criticism— 



147 The Constraints 



was in desperate flight; of our great modern writers, only 
Nabokov handled this kind of material, in Lolita, which thereby 
at once became The Great American Novel, — but of course 
he was a foreigner to begin with. The transformation of these 
daily-life materials is I believe a dual process: on the one hand, 
it seems to have involved a prodigious enlargement of what 
we call culture, by way of the media and the informatization 
of daily life. Here narrative raw materials, which (in an earlier 
"realist" moment) could still look non- or precultural, now 
slowly seem to undergo the process of a transformation into 
images and simulacra. Meanwhile, in some other loop of this 
momentous historical shift, a high literature or a literary and 
cultural modernism, whose essential specificity and definition 
turned on its radical separation from the daily life and the 
kitsch cultural consumption of the great middle-class public, 
itself becomes slowly effaced (in what we now call the post- 
modern) . 

Here the distinction between high and low art begins to 
fade and the elegance of high technological media production 
to vie with older conceptions of artistic value; but this process 
coexists with another one, in which the older distinctions 
between city and country, metropolis and provinces, cease to 
be operative, and in which the United States becomes stan- 
dardized from one coast to the other and all along its new 
superhighway system, everything in American life thereby fall- 
ing into commodification. The imagification or culturalization 
of daily life thus accompanies and is virtually indistinguishable 
from the gradual identification of mass culture with Culture 
itself, the end of modernism or the canon, the arrival of pop, 
and later on of the postmodern, in short: the harnessing of 
modern elite cultural forms of all kinds to big business and 
corporate production for mass consumption. 

So the new literature Buford speaks of is one that follows 
and reflects this transformation of everyday life by the penetra- 
tion of a corporate mass culture into its utmost recesses and 



Postmodernism 148 



crannies, with the consequent colonization and elimination of 
any of the residual enclaves that had hitherto remained ex- 
empt; those were enclaves of farming life just as fully as spaces 
of high culture, they were ghetto or community spaces fully as 
much as traditional village or classical urban forms of collective 
living. 

The problem with Buford's description is then what orients 
it toward those particular short-story writers he wants to 
specify, to differentiate, and to celebrate as a new and distinc- 
tive cultural tendency in late capitalism. The characters of such 
stories, he tells us, as though in passing, "are from Kentucky 
or Alabama or Oregon, but, mainly, they could just about be 
from anywhere." But there's the rub, and this rub will turn 
out to be of the greatest interest for us: they cannot be from 
just about anywhere, Buford has here named nonurban areas. 
In fact, his writers are what have come to be called neoregion- 
alist writers, and it will be this that opens the rift between his 
slogan and the literary objects to which he wants to apply it. 
(Indeed, our own typological scheme reflects this objection 
strongly and deeply in the way in which it seeks sharply 
to distinguish between dirty realism and critical regionalism, 
whatever those two things may turn out to be.) 

Neoregionalism, like the neo-ethnic, is a specifically post- 
modern form of reterritorialization; it is a flight from the 
realities of late capitalism, a compensatory ideology, in a 
situation in which regions (like ethnic groups) have been fun- 
damentally wiped out — reduced, standardized, commodified, 
atomized, or rationalized. The ideology of regionalism is the 
sentimentalization, by the short-story writers in question, of 
the nature of the social life and the socioeconomic system in 
the superstate today. It seeks, by including the detritus of 
junk-food wrappers and the broken windows of vandalized 
cars, to validate its credentials as a realistic representation of 
North American life which can in the process reassure North 
Americans as to the persistence of a distinctive regional or 



149 The Constraints 



urban social life about which everything else in our experience 
testifies that it has already long since disappeared. Buford's 
neoregional writers then perform another crucial ideological 
move, duly registered in his own perceptive critical apparatus, 
and that is to certify the microscopic and the inconsequen- 
tial — or rather what the state and the dominant institutions 
pronounce to be trivial and insignificant — as the space of real 
life, or of what used to be authentic. Indeed, it is because 
hegemonic thought and institutional value is thus understood 
as valorizing what in the previous paragraph Buford character- 
izes as "the large historical statement" (what is "heroic or 
grand," and seems to involve "epic ambitions" that now "seem 
in contrast inflated, strange or even false" — he mentions 
Mailer and Bellow, Gaddis and Pynchon) — it is because such 
large or megastatements are thought to be institutionalized and 
hegemonic, and to wear the stamp of approval of the State 
that the new microfiction can be packaged as protest, revolt, 
subversion, and the like. 

On the other hand, anyone familiar with current ideological 
debates can recognize a somewhat different one, as it profiles 
itself behind this respectably anarchist position; and that is the 
well-known "war on totality" under whose banner a postmod- 
ern anti-Marxism pursues targets that it claims to identify with 
state power (if not with the economic system) but that are in 
reality the now disorganized forces of a repudiation of late 
capitalism and of a Utopian intent to continue to imagine 
radical alternatives. In terms of this polemic, then, what here 
gives itself off as the minute and the local is in reality the 
strategic new value of the fragment and the nontotalizable, 
the ephemeral constellation, the fuzzy set, the disposable, 
provisional, and fictive scale model. I think it is important to 
fight this particular battle out (a battle based, in my opinion, 
on a misunderstanding of what the concept of totality and the 
act of totalization really are), but I have raised the issue here 
mainly in order to show the entanglement, within Buford's 



Postmodernism ISO 



statement or program, of several distinct and only distantly 
related ideologemes, which, disentangled, give a rather differ- 
ent picture. The matter of the local and of totality will of 
course remain in our larger typology as obligatory semes or 
features; the pull of the regional is here clearly registered and 
will certainly be acknowledged in our final scheme; but I will 
now argue that a somewhat different conception of dirty 
realism must be advanced, which is in fact much closer to 
Liane Lefaivre's architectural version than to the Buford state- 
ment with which she herself began. 

For the fateful gesture in her description, which in my 
opinion necessarily displaces Buford's short-story writers to 
some very different (and more regional or neoregional) zone 
of modern reality and culture, is the mention of the film Blade 
Runner, which, with its literary analogy called "cyberpunk," has 
touched a nerve, struck a chord, sounded a note, of crucial 
symptomatic importance in the postcontemporary political un- 
conscious, in that ideological objective spirit in which we store 
up our social imaginary and accumulate various fantasy pictures 
(of no little active reality) of the global system we blindly 
inhabit. Cyberpunk indeed seems to me a more promising 
starting point than Buford's localist and suburban fiction for 
the pursuit of a definition of dirty realism, not least because it 
is urban, and also because its nightmares are also on the point 
of becoming celebrations of a new reality, a new reality- 
intensification, that cannot simply be dealt with by a reactiva- 
tion of the older cultural and class attitudes. 

I want to discuss cyberpunk under two headings — as a 
sequel to naturalism, and as a symptomal representation of 
the end of civil society — before returning to its architectural 
expression in the newer works of Rem Koolhaas. 

Naturalism offers a useful comparison here since it was if 
anything the original "dirty realism," what the French call a 
"miserabilisme" in which the lower depths, the forbidden spaces 
of the new industrial city, were disclosed to a horrified bour- 



1$1 The Constraints 



geois readership in the form of perilous journeys and accounts 
of the pathetic destinies of the various underclasses, which you 
could read about in your comfortable armchair, and that 
thereby offered the double bonus of sympathy and knowledge 
of the social totality on the one hand and of class reconfirma- 
tion and the satisfactions of the bourgeois order on the other. 
The deeper class impulse in naturalism, indeed, which stimu- 
lated both of these reflexes simultaneously, was the fundamen- 
tal petty-bourgeois terror of proletarianization, of slipping 
down the class ladder, of falling from a secure yet perpetually 
menaced middle-class "respectability" and "decency" back 
down into a proletarian space fantasized both in terms of filth 
and animality and also of insecure wage work. Its visions of 
misery were above all marked by the conviction that this 
condition was irrevocable, that once you lose your grip and 
drop down into this social space there is no climbing back and 
no return, no social salvation and no release or escape, no 
issue. There is of course a very real truth about this feeling in 
all the stages of capitalist society, where the old maxim about 
to him that has and from him that has not remains in force; 
but in the naturalist period, the late nineteenth century, the 
social fact was also a very powerful ideological fantasy, which 
could be appropriated and pressed into the service of a variety 
of other political uses and abuses. 

Cyberpunk entertains a family likeness with all this, but 
with enormous structural and ideological modifications, of 
which the most fundamental seems to be the evaporation of a 
certain Otherness from this picture. The naturalist under- 
classes were always irredeemably other from ourselves, the 
bourgeois readers: we had the thrill of seeing through their 
eyes and living life through in their skins for a provisional and 
fictional proxy period, only to wake up again in the reassur- 
ance of our own. I think it could be argued in a variety of 
ways that one of the basic structural features of postmodernity 
lies in the weakening if not the outright disappearance of just 



Postmodernism IS 2 



this category of otherness and terrifying specieslike difference. 
I've observed above, indeed, that the precondition for what is 
sometimes called the politics of difference (or in other words 
micro- or small group politics today) is very precisely this 
universal weakening and sapping of real and objective differ- 
ence on a global scale. It may also be suggested that this 
development — sometimes called democratization and that I 
prefer to call plebeianization (a good and more Brechtian word 
for it) — also has serious consequences for any philosophical 
arguments based on the opposition between Reason and unrea- 
son or the irrational (these last being categories of radical 
difference). It has above all welcome consequences for the 
age-old ethical and repressive categories of good and evil — 
where virtually in advance good is a category of the dominant 
group and evil a category of otherness — but which the new 
developments ought to go a certain way toward eradicating. 

The proletarian, the lumpen, and their cousins the urban 
criminal (male) and prostitute (female) — these secure charac- 
ters of the older bourgeois and naturalist imaginary representa- 
tion of society — have today, in postmodernity and cyberpunk, 
given way to a youth culture in which the urban punks are 
merely the opposite numbers to the business yuppies, and in 
which city space is no longer so profoundly marked by the 
radical otherness of the older moment. There is now a circula- 
tion and recirculation possible between- the underworld and 
the overworld of high-rent condos and lofts: falling from the 
latter into the former is no longer so absolute and irrevocable 
a disaster, above all since, offering a knowledge of what used 
to be called the streets, it can be useful for survival in the 
unimaginable spaces of corporate and bureaucratic decision (at 
least in the imagination of postmodern society and culture). 
But the crucial difference is that, in the postmodern view, you 
can return from the lower depths; a corporate comeback is 
possible and conceivable, something that would have been 
unthinkable and unrepresentable in the naturalist moment of 



153 The Constraints 



mature capital (although perhaps not in the early capitalist 
fairy tales of a Balzac). 

One would suppose then that with such a momentous 
transformation in social space and in the social imaginary as 
we witness with this enfeeblement if not extinction of the 
category of Otherness, the tasks of architecture (and of urban- 
ism) would necessarily also find themselves modified, perhaps 
in unforeseeable and unexpected ways. The types of problems 
posed by the dilemmas of the naturalist moment with its class 
nightmares presumably involved the construction of a kind of 
private bourgeois space secure for the Other (perhaps Frank 
Lloyd Wright can serve as an example of this ambition at its 
most intense); they also surely involved the sanitation of the 
city itself, the cleansing of those lower depths or spaces of 
radical otherness, of which Victor Hugo's com des miracles (in 
Notre Dame de Paris) and Dickens's Tom-all-alone 's (in Bleak 
House) remain the more memorable precursor figurations. That 
surgical excision and hygienic urban reconstruction can per- 
haps be schematically marked and pegged by some of the 
projects of Le Corbusier (although I should want to emphasize 
that since we have here to do with resolutions of contradic- 
tions, answers to questions, responses to situations, no single 
name is binding, and a whole range of modern artists can be 
seen to be reacting to this general situation in a variety of 
stylistically very diverse ways). 

But we cannot move on to the spatial consequences of a 
modification of all this in architectural "dirty realism" until we 
turn to the second of my two headings under this particular 
topic — one that now demands a more philosophical account of 
this social and spatial development in terms of the end, in late 
capitalism, of civil society itself. The term (which goes in 
German under the less euphemistic designation of biirgerliche 
Gesellschafi or bourgeois society) came into currency to de- 
scribe the new private spaces that capitalism opened up for its 
new dominant class; it was at one with the philosophical 



Postmodernism 1$4 



paradoxes, posed for virtually the first time in the history of 
human societies or modes of production, of an experience and 
a conception of a radically nonpublic and nonsocial space that 
was however produced socially and constituted an integral 
component in the functioning of this particular social forma- 
tion. Bourgeois privacy had nothing in common with the 
private spaces of antiquity or with those nonsocial areas into 
which the individual could withdraw, as a relief from the 
social and the public, in the great non-Western civilizations. It 
therefore tended to generate a whole range of dualistic antino- 
mies, mostly concerned with the defense and definition of the 
private and the nonsocial as such but also, more rarely, as in 
Hannah Arendt, turning on the contamination of public space 
and public life that the new historical dualism brought equally 
with it. Like all dualisms, that now classical one between 
public and private cannot be resolved, except by disappearing 
into the past. What a more recent and perhaps more modern- 
ist social experience has brought with it is at least its complexi- 
fication by two new kinds of space that did not compute in the 
older paradigm that opposed the public realm to the family 
and the home: these new spaces are the space of work (seem- 
ingly public, yet owned by private individuals); and the space 
of the street, henceforth called daily life or the everyday, the 
quotidian, which is fully as much a sign of the breakup of the 
private and the personal as it is of the emergence of consump- 
tion and commodification over against the public realm itself. 

It is interesting to note that in Eastern Europe — despite the 
evidence of a vigorous but small bourgeois culture in Tsarist 
Russia, not to speak of the Central European countries — 
political reflection seems today to turn on this very issue of 
civil society: the dominant forces in these countries, after the 
liquidation of the Stalinist apparatus, tend to formulate their 
problems in terms of the failure to constitute civil society in 
the first place, thereby foreseeing a program that might, after 
the end of the construction of socialism, be characterized as 



155 The Constraints 



the construction of civil society itself. I am not sure however, 
whether, in either Hegel's or Marx's sense, "civil society" is 
something that can be thus constructed. At any rate if in the 
mind of the Eastern reformers this project has something to 
do with catching up with the West, then unfortunately what 
needs to be pointed out is that the West is even more ad- 
vanced than that by now, and that after our own period of 
civil society, what we are now witnessing in the United States, 
if not yet in a united Europe or Japan, is its wholesale liquida- 
tion. But we do not yet have the terms and categories ready 
to describe what succeeds civil society as such, when the 
latter's collapse is not a regression but rather the accompani- 
ment of an even more advanced form of economic develop- 
ment. In my opinion, then, the visionary exploration of cyber- 
punk and so-called dirty realism provisionally occupies the 
place that may eventually be occupied by a full-dress theory of 
what follows civil society. This is also, however, why our own 
evocation of this new space will necessarily remained locked 
into the use of older words, such as public and private, which 
must be used against each other in a kind of self-problematiz- 
ing way. 

We must think of the space of dirty realism as a collective 
built space, in which the opposition between inside and outside 
is annulled. This accounts, among other things, or so it seems 
to me, for the Japanese allusions in films like Blade Runner 
(where Los Angeles seems to have migrated to the other side 
of the Pacific rim), or in Gibson's novels. Indeed, it seems 
plausible that as with Elizabethan visions of Spain, or the Soviet 
Union for us yesterday, the now obligatory Japanese reference 
also marks the obsession with the great Other, who is perhaps 
our own future rather than our past, the putative winner in the 
coming struggle — whom we therefore compulsively imitate, 
hoping that thereby the inner mind-set of the victorious other 
will be transferred to us along with the externals. It does not. 
seem superfluous to add that the now notorious readaptation 



Postmodernism 156 




of Hegel's end of history was passed on down to us by way of 
a fateful footenote in Kojeve, which explicitly glosses this idea 
with Japan. It is therefore Japan that is somehow the "end of 
history" in store for us — and Japanese space, now obscurely 
valorized by our own anxieties, would seem to share in the 
general fascination and to project messages much more elabo- 
rate than the merely architectural. 

The fantasy of dirty realism, indeed, draws strongly on the 
way in which, in parts of Tokyo, the street is somehow inside, 
so that the city as a whole, which has no profile, becomes one 
immense amorphous unrepresentable container that realizes 
the essence of the geodesic dome without the dome itself, and 
more conceptually than this distracting external figure ever 
could. Meanwhile, the echo of this macrophenomenon within, 
in the parts or microstructures, does not, I believe, take place 
in the hotels as with us: rather, in the department stores, 
which are open emporia in which one finds food markets, 



j 57 The Constraints 



theaters, bookstores, and all kinds of other specialized services, 
run together in a fashion that surely derives ultimately and 
historically from the great open-air markets or bazaars of the 
East and of precapitalist modes of production. Here they form 
a new spatial and cultural entity, of which, in the West, only 
the French hypermarches give any idea. Perhaps indeed such 
new forms — which cannot under any circumstances be grasped 
as regressions, or as some Spenglerian overwhelming of Eu- 
rope by Asia — represent an overleaping and a dialectic 
whereby the postmodern formal and spatial needs of late 
capitalism demand the infusion and the supplement of the 
precapitalist: not the tribal archaic, as in the early modern, 
nor the forms of antiquity, as in neoclassicism, nor the feudal, 
as in the Gothic revival, but now the great non-Western 
"civilizations" (otherwise known as the Asiatic mode, or so- 
called oriental despotism). 

At any rate the Blade Runner syndrome is just that: the 
interfusion of crowds of people among a high technological 
bazaar with its multitudinous nodal points, all of it sealed into 
an inside without an outside, which thereby intensifies the 
formerly urban to the point of becoming the unmappable 
system of late capitalism itself. Now it is the abstract system 
and its interrelations that are the outside: the former dome, 
the former city, beyond which no subject position is available, 
so that it cannot be inspected as a thing in its own right, 
although it is certainly a totality. 

In contrast, we have the Western notion of movable com- 
partments and rebuildable inner spaces, provisional rooms that 
are broken down and replaced by others at will; on the idea of 
the shed, into which you "put your stuff," as Gehry says, 
congregating your screens and furniture in one part of the 
warehouse space, and piling up boxes in the others — essen- 
tially individualistic visions and conceptions of some still inner 
space. It is only with the collectivization of that vision in 
cyberpunk and its deployment over an entire formerly urban 



Postmodernism 156 




of Hegel's end of history was passed on down to us by way of 
a fateful footenote in Kojeve, which explicitly glosses this idea 
with Japan. It is therefore Japan that is somehow the "end of 
history" in store for us — and Japanese space, now obscurely 
valorized by our own anxieties, would seem to share in the 
general fascination and to project messages much more elabo- 
rate than the merely architectural. 

The fantasy of dirty realism, indeed, draws strongly on the 
way in which, in parts of Tokyo, the street is somehow inside, 
so that the city as a whole, which has no profile, becomes one 
immense amorphous unrepresentable container that realizes 
the essence of the geodesic dome without the dome itself, and 
more conceptually than this distracting external figure ever 
could. Meanwhile, the echo of this macrophenomenon within, 
in the parts or microstructures, does not, I believe, take place 
in the hotels as with us: rather, in the department stores, 
which are open emporia in which one finds food markets, 



157 The Constraints 



a. 



theaters, bookstores, and all kinds of other specialized services, 
run together in a fashion that surely derives ultimately and 
historically from the great open-air markets or bazaars of the 
East and of precapitalist modes of production. Here they form 5 
a new spatial and cultural entity, of which, in the West, only 3 
the French hypermarches give any idea. Perhaps indeed such 
new forms — which cannot under any circumstances be grasped 
as regressions, or as some Spenglerian overwhelming of Eu- 
rope by Asia — represent an overleaping and a dialectic 
whereby the postmodern formal and spatial needs of late 
capitalism demand the infusion and the supplement of the 
precapitalist: not the tribal archaic, as in the early modern, 
nor the forms of antiquity, as in neoclassicism, nor the feudal, 
as in the Gothic revival, but now the great non-Western 
"civilizations" (otherwise known as the Asiatic mode, or so- 
called oriental despotism). 

At any rate the Blade Runner syndrome is just that: the 
interfusion of crowds of people among a high technological 
bazaar with its multitudinous nodal points, all of it sealed into 
an inside without an outside, which thereby intensifies the 
formerly urban to the point of becoming the unmappable 
system of late capitalism itself. Now it is the abstract system 
and its interrelations that are the outside: the former dome, 
the former city, beyond which no subject position is available, 
so that it cannot be inspected as a thing in its own right, 
although it is certainly a totality. 

In contrast, we have the Western notion of movable com- 
partments and rebuildable inner spaces, provisional rooms that 
are broken down and replaced by others at will; on the idea of 
the shed, into which you "put your stuff," as Gehry says, 
congregating your screens and furniture in one part of the 
warehouse space, and piling up boxes in the others — essen- 
tially individualistic visions and conceptions of some still inner 
space. It is only with the collectivization of that vision in 
cyberpunk and its deployment over an entire formerly urban 



Postmodernism l60 



modernist conception of a Utopian totality-enclave within the 
real that I have characterized earlier. Meanwhile the architec- 
tural allusions to Mallarme tend rather to dwell on the glacial 
emptiness of his "pure" forms, whereupon the reference to 
Mies becomes well-nigh obligatory and unavoidable. But any 
discussion of this kind of formal "nothingness" (the formal idea 
of writing a book "about nothing" was as we have seen Flau- 
bert's, in the generation that preceded Mallarme's own; the 
latter seems rather to have been a Hegelian and a proto- 
existentialist) needs to discuss the status of individual objects 
or items in the empty rooms of these poems and in particular 
the category of contingency that governs their status (it is 
more obvious in the great long poem about chance and a roll 
of the dice). Items: a curtain blowing in what is not even a 
window but only a window frame, and thus the very abstrac- 
tion or hypothesis of empty form or syntax itself; a rose, or its 
absence, in the gesture of blossoming emergence into being — 
these stark objects rattle around in the formality of the late 
sonnets like meaningless words. Indeed, they have as their 
allegory the "ptyx," a kind of container the dead Master has 
gone to the river Styx to look for, which is to say a meaning- 
less sound (chosen for the rhyme) whose henceforth Mallar- 
mean meaning the rest of the sonnet has ended up constructing 
around it, filling its empty vase-ness with the merely grammat- 
ical meaning of the sentence in which it is housed. These 
radically isolated objects, then, demand the construction of a 
verbal "context" in order to replace that absent "real" ground 
or context from whose omission they suffer. 

One wants to think this receding of a context or ground as 
a historical event, which has something to do with the seeming 
arbitrariness and optionality of the new built environment. A 
former nature ensured the look of necessity in the densely 
jumbled clods that filled its various eco-niches; but the gadgets 
and products of the industrial city can go anywhere. The 
isolated items then one by one are absolute contingency: each 



l6l The Constraints 



<5 



is the very form of unjustifiability itself, which is to say, of | 
meaninglessness; nothing productive can come of any ot them, ^ 
not even a properly metaphysical experience, so trivial are g 
they one by one and ready for the generational bonfire in ... 
which we dispose of the trinkets and furnishings of the new y 
departed. The surrealists, however, hunted those inexplicable 
trinkets down one by one in the flea markets, the stark 
isolation of each was for them an occasion for the flooding of 
libidinal investment, and the rising, like steam, of urban mys- 
tery exhibits for defense or prosecution in the great uncon- 
scious crimes whose illustrations were as exciting as the pic- 
tures in dime novels or police weeklies. Nothing of the sort in 
Mallarme, where even the "beauty" of the objects-of the 
absent flower, for example-is so cloying and fin de siecle as 
to designate itself as pure image, to derealize its own tawdr. 
ness as a shred of matter seen. The Mallarmean items would 
have to wait a long time for an aesthetic to crystahze around 
them, which could not be a surrealist one: I think, for exam- 
ple, of everything striking in Twin Teaks that derives essentially 
from the isolation of its props-the talking log, for one, but 
also everything else that looks like a clue, whatever the camera 
approaches in its nondelirious non-oneiric logic and renders in 
its false color. The characters are also a collection of this 
random type, and the ostentatious "Americanness is neutrally 
quoted in the same way, as the meaninglessness of a mas. 
Lduced item taken all by itself. Lynch comes out of Ae 
Lage-stream on the other side of mass production; in him the 
pure Mallarmean fountain is tasteless and non-nourishing a 
synthetic liquid that does not even have a medicinal flavor to 
identify it. But in visual narrative of this kind space and to 
contents, depth, the built environment, and the very hutrf 
being itself, are all drawn inside out onto the screen and 
transcoded into so many image-items. 

Mallarme's items, however, were still housed in empty 
rooms; and it must now be a question what those rooms might 



Postmodernism 



look like that are made to do justice to the radicality of the 
Itet items-an aesthetic dilemma, insofar 
be items themselves, they must house the visual and thereiore 
transcend it like its syntax. For another generate, Mies was 
Zght to have provided that, and glass and frame transpar- 
ency was the way in which the Mallarmean room was thought. 
B^omething nL enters the picture when the idea^f syntax 
is itself revised. Mallarme thought-or composed as though he 
lought-that the sentence itself was the supreme embody 
m ent 8 of absolute syntax and thereby offered the promise of 
Tome absolute closure: where the monad still sounded spat, , 
L absolute sentence buckles its definitive buckle in a pnm- 
tnal time (which evades the ideology of the cy^as we* 
and foreshadows the more contemporary conception of the 

87 "e begin to doubt syntax itself-to wonder whether 
its operations assure coherence and meaning and to suspec 
hat the very form of its necessary figures and tropes ensur 
their internal contradiction of each other-then a place » 
reached in which linguistic structuralism has already generated 
deconstructs out oT itself. It is then famously also a^ce in 
which spatial formalism is unable to rest calmly withm itself 
but begins to generate a nonstructural negation of its own 
sylm 8 a development that in the case of Peter Bsenman has 
won his work J unlovely salification of "deconstructiom J , 
a movM ot beyond formalism and rationahsm exactly, but 
against formalism and rationalism undermined by their own 
weapons and undone in a formalist and rationalist manner. 
The motivation of the device, here, remains philosophical; it 
is formulated in terms of the critique of humanism and of 
anthropocentrism (in other words of a worldview or lived, 
preconscious philosophy): 



Though Freud's exposition of the unconscious rendered this 
naive anthropocentric view forever untenable, its roots 



;63 The Constraints 

o 

persist in the architecture of today. The issues of presence | 
Ld origin are central to the question of anthropocentrism. 
In order to effect a response in architecture to this new . 
circumstance of man, this project proposes to employ an g. 
other discourse, one which attempts to eschew the anthro- 
pocentric organising principles of presence and origin. 

This passage derives, to be sure, from a somewhat later stage 
T E ilmL's own development (the one P"^ « 
to us here) a stage in which temporal layers and levels have 
cole to add conit to the pure and contradictory geometric 
T nf Houses VI and X in much the same way that the 
iZll T f Z Romeo and Juliet project (from wh,h 
the ; o te was taken) are superimposed on the black-and-white 

"deconLctionis^ period in order to «^ 
tionship with high modernism, whose fundamental value 

is ceLnly rehearsed here. It no *W*£ZZ 
the achievement of a vivid new unique persona style in the 
Itla s nl of a style immediately distinctive, which sets you 
off om the olde/gen-t^-th* is only the most obvious 
and eLtic form t!ken by the high modernist logic of innova- 
T Id die category of style it invents and deploys would m 
St enough alert I to its incompatibility with dus 
p Lular postcontemporary artist whose rational or geomemc 
Cahsm is already a repudiation of personal style in that 
^ I Xceral sense>lly as much a, his antihumanism exphc- 
itlv identifies and excludes it. 

But the Novum can take many forms. The notion of the 
, u A is vet another and not the most negligible 



of Postmodernism 162 



look like that are made to do justice to the radicality of the 
isolated items — an aesthetic dilemma, insofar as they cannot 
be items themselves, they must house the visual and therefore 
transcend it like its syntax. For another generation, Mies was 
thought to have provided that, and glass and frame transpar- 
ency was the way in which the Mallarmean room was thought. 
But something new enters the picture when the idea of syntax 
is itself revised. Mallarme thought — or composed as though he 
thought — that the sentence itself was the supreme embodi- 
ment of absolute syntax and thereby offered the promise of 
some absolute closure: where the monad still sounded spatial, 
the absolute sentence buckles its definitive buckle in a provi- 
sional time (which evades the ideology of the cyclical, as well 
and foreshadows the more contemporary conception of the 
synchronic) . 

But if we begin to doubt syntax itself — to wonder whether 
its operations assure coherence and meaning, and to suspect 
that the very form of its necessary figures and tropes ensures 
their internal contradiction of each other — then a place is 
reached in which linguistic structuralism has already generated 
deconstruction out of itself. It is then famously also a place in 
which spatial formalism is unable to rest calmly within itself 
but begins to generate a nonstructural negation of its own 
system, a development that in the case of Peter Eisenman has 
won his work the unlovely qualification of "deconstructionist": 
a move — not beyond formalism and rationalism, exactly, but 
against formalism and rationalism undermined by their own 
weapons and undone in a formalist and rationalist manner. 
The motivation of the device, here, remains philosophical; it 
is formulated in terms of the critique of humanism and of 
anthropocentrism (in other words of a worldview or lived, 
preconscious philosophy): 



Though Freud's exposition of the unconscious rendered this 
naive anthropocentric view forever untenable, its roots 



163 The Constraints 



persist in the architecture of today. The issues of presence 
and origin are central to the question of anthropocentrism. 
In order to effect a response in architecture to this new 
circumstance of man, this project proposes to employ an 
other discourse, one which attempts to eschew the anthro- 
pocentric organising principles of presence and origin. 

This passage derives, to be sure, from a somewhat later stage 
in Eisenman' s own development (the one primarily of interest 
to us here), a stage in which temporal layers and levels have 
come to add content to the pure and contradictory geometric 
syntax of Houses VI and X in much the same way that the 
color schemes of the Romeo and Juliet project (from which 
the quote was taken) are superimposed on the black-and-white 
of the axonometric figures. 

I raise the matter of the philosophical program of the 
"deconstructionist" period in order to clarify Eisenman' s rela- 
tionship with high modernism, whose fundamental value of 
Innovation is certainly rehearsed here. It no longer proposes 
the achievement of a vivid new unique personal style in the 
banal sense of a style immediately distinctive, which sets you 
off from the older generation — that is only the most obvious 
and aesthetic form taken by the high modernist logic of innova- 
tion, and the category of style it invents and deploys would in 
itself be enough to alert us to its incompatibility with this 
particular postcontemporary artist whose rational or geometric 
formalism is already a repudiation of personal style in that 
warm visceral sense, fully as much as his antihumanism explic- 
itly identifies and excludes it. 

But the Novum can take many forms. The notion of the 
revolutionary break is yet another and not the most negligible 
of them; it can be realized on whatever level, from politics to 
philosophy. In this purely formal sense, it is all one whether 
you have in mind a loathing for the overstuffed interiors of 
Victorian private life and wish to abolish that, in the name of 



Postmodernism 164 



a proletarian way with machinery and praxis, or in the name 
of some vitalism a la D. H. Lawrence; or whether you think 
that it is the intellectual or spiritual formation of the world's 
current generation that is at fault — their metaphysics or their 
relationship to the question of being, their ideological values, 
their episteme, the quality of their consciousness, their mental 
equipment, or the very shape of their being-in-the- world. In 
all these different configurations, materialist and idealist alike, 
what counts is the will to some kind of absolute break with all 
that, or even only the possibility of forming the idea of the 
very possibility of such a break. That breath of a thought, 
possibility of a possibility, is enough to ground the notion of 
the modern as some radical difference with what has gone 
before; and the great antimetaphysical project remains in that 
sense, even residually, modern. It is in any case repudiated by 
a variety of ideological postmodernisms, for which, in their 
very different ways, it is crucial to refuse the notion of radical 
change, historical difference, revolution, the break itself (even 
as a concept). 

But obviously, like Koolhaas, Eisenman is more and other 
than a residual modernist, not even a late modernist of the 
Jencks type; it therefore becomes crucial to specify the other, 
nonmodernist component of his aesthetic mode. We have in 
fact made a beginning on that specification with our discussion 
of the objects and the items: to anticipate, these will become 
the pure disconnected "parts, elements, signifiers" of a more 
completely postmodern practice (and are designated as such in 
the appropriate corner of our semiotic square). But it is 
equally clear (at least a priori) that the category of the part or 
element cannot in Eisenman play the same role or occupy the 
same function that we have found it to do in the practice of a 
Koolhaas or as it can be anticipated to do in work like that of 
Michael Graves or Charles Moore. 

The very formalism of Eisenman' s first period suggests that 
the part qua part will have been repressed in this form and 



165 The Constraints 



will only emerge in the more generalized position of content 
as such, where it is not particularly identified with any specific 
objects or ornaments nor is it to be thought of as raw material 
either in any conventional sense. "Content," for the most 
abstract of all buildings (that is to say, for whatever idea 
we might achieve of such a building), would necessarily and 
stubbornly remain the ineradicability of what is now called 
site, and to put it this way is to open up a fundamental (and 
historically new), properly postmodern possibility, that even 
site itself can be done away with. This should not be taken too 
rapidly as an ecological truth: for its ecological form (which is 
very real indeed, and chilling enough) needs to be ranged 
under a larger diagnostic rubric in order to avoid the still 
humanist pathos of the denunciation of the "domination of 
nature," the rape of and will to power over the earth itself. 
Ecological damage in that sense is a subset of capitalist fungibil- 
ity in general: the technological transformation of all forms of 
ground and raw material, including space itself, into the indif- 
ferent materials of commodification and the purely formal 
occasions for profit. We need rather to take into consideration 
the possibility that the renewed attention to the problem of 
the site is itself a function of the imminent extinction of the 
very category in question: an urgency and a desperation that 
then washes back over this theme to lend it a kind of second- 
degree historical content in its own right, the return of "con- 
tent" itself as a new event. 

Site could not, clearly, have been absent from Eisenman's 
earlier, more "formalist" moment: indeed, he goes to some 
lengths to explain how, in House X, "site was a major consid- 
eration," owing to the automative relationship between this 
suburban house and the city, as a result of which "the house 
became— for the first time in my work— a model of the 
reality of car/house seen as part of the total fabric of urbanism, 
an icon of that relationship." (ij 4 ) Here, significantly, a part/ 
whole relationship is rewritten allegorically rather than func- 



Postmodernism 166 



tionally, as a mere synechdoche; and the discussion of the site 
in terms of the structural relationship of city to suburb pre- 
cedes its evocation in purely physical terms ("a fairly steep 
continuous slope running downhill from south to north," and 
so on). These two developments are in reality the same: the 
allegory is at one with the overleaping of place into space, 
with the mapping of the house in terms of the absent geopoliti- 
cal axis of country and city rather than the perceptual and 
phenomenological, experiential, data of the isolated plot of 
land. 

I take it for granted that some form of allegory has always 
been implicit in architecture as such, although in its classical 
forms perhaps so entangled with the immediacies of perception 
that its filigrain could not be detected: thus, it is difficult, 
when it is a question of building along the line of a hill, to 
distinguish between the physical requirements of the site and a 
wall or plumb line that necessarily alludes to the ridge, re- 
peating and reproducing its specific orientation. Such difficult- 
ies are compounded by the multiple echoes the site leaves 
within the construct, which must nonetheless as they grow 
more numerous and complex separate themselves from sheer 
contiguity to become a kind of idea or even a meaning. To 
lean against a rise is to turn a natural accident into a support 
and the approach to a mode of dwelling; to multiply such 
attitudes is to produce a veritable mimesis, of leaning that then 
becomes endowed with a semi-autonomous meaning of its 
own, or at least gradually comes to ask for interpretation. I 
am struck by the omnipresence of these allegorical patterns in 
contemporary architecture (often termed "analogies"), and 
even more by the way in which they are taken for granted, as 
the inevitable fabric of the thing. But if one wanted to resist 
the anthropomorphic and humanism, would this not offer a 
different but no less dramatic starting point — a principled 
effort to do away with just such an allegorical infrastructure, 



167 The Constraints 



and to imagine an architecture capable of doing without such 



i 

allusions and such geographical mimetisms? ^ 
Eisenman's earlier houses were generally, as I understand jj 
it, taken to have attempted just that, a kind of antifoundation- 
alism in the philosophy of construction. Nor am I probably 3 
alone in seeing his later trajectory as exemplary of the various 
passages out of high structuralism toward the reinvention of 
this or that kind of content, which structuralist formalism 
began to demand like a chemical craving. Many of these 
returns from formalism found an easy missing content in 
psychoanalysis, which seems also to have played a significant 
role in Eisenman's development. Marxism meanwhile offered 
a more demanding "absolute formalism," while deconstruction, 
as we have seen, also put a "post" to structuralism in its 
commitment to the implacable foregrounding of the metaphys- 
ical structure of modern thought and consciousness. 

As Eisenman's association with Derrida is more than well- 
known and the analogies between this architecture and philo- 
sophical deconstruction have been so often rehearsed, it may 
not seem altogether abusive to experiment with a somewhat 
different analogy and to confront Eisenman's practice with 
another philosophical work of the same period, which has not 
yet I think been mentioned in its connection. Indeed, particu- 
larly in the light of the relationship between Derrida and 
Althusser, and in view of the more than occasional intersec- 
tions between their thinking, it does not seem inappropriate 
to stage a discussion of the later buildings in terms of a once 
classical text from the now extinguished Althusserian canon: 
Pierre Macherey's Towards a Theory of literary Traduction 
(1966), the major aesthetic contribution of Althusserianism, 
and a work that has, particularly via Eagleton's reading of it, 
known some influence in England and to a lesser degree in the 
United States. 

The first half of this book develops a polemic against naive 



Postmodernism 168 



or referential reading, of a type long since familiar here as 
long ago as the New Criticism: it is with the later, analytical 
chapters that we now rather have to do here, whose practice 
seems to me to offer a method and a model of far greater 
originality and interest. 

Those chapters, which deal unevenly with Borges and Jules 
Verne, with Balzac's novel The Peasants, and with Lenin's views 
on Tolstoy, offer readings that express a polemic, but also an 
experiential, feeling that the "work of art" as such is not the 
organic unity it normally passes itself off as being: that its 
unity is indeed a sham and a makeshift, if not very precisely a 
kind of ideology in its own right (this is a position that 
Eagleton's related Criticism and Ideology has very strongly de- 
fended in the English-language critical tradition). The work, 
then — the former work — is rather to be seen as an act whereby 
a batch of disparate materials — a kind of lumber room of all 
kinds of different contents, partial forms, linguistic phenom- 
ena, social and psychological raw material, semi-autonomous 
ideological fantasies, local period concepts, scientific spare 
parts, and random topical themes — are forcibly yoked to- 
gether and fused by the power of aesthetic ideology into what 
looks like an organic whole. What used to be considered a 
"work" therefore is now to be treated as best as a kind of 
anthology of disconnected parts and pieces and at worst as a 
kind of dumping ground for objective spirit. 

Yet the disparate raw materials are all clearly in one way or 
another social and historical: they come from someplace real, 
they bear, even cold, the traces of ancient struggles and of a 
once historical emergence. This is why the tension between 
such seemingly unrelated levels and building materials can be 
rewritten in the strong forms of the antinomy if not the 
contradiction itself. From the Machereyan standpoint, then, 
the incompatibility between, say, this or that sentimental ex- 
perience that the novel inscribes and this or that anecdotal 
unit, this or that mode of stylistic formulation — an incompati- 



169 The Constraints 



bility potentially so great as to show up as a kind of jarring 
wrong note on the very surface of the text — such incompati- 
bility is now to be read as a sign and symptom of some deeper 
historical and social contradiction that it is the business of the 
analyst to bring to light. 

But if that is the case, then we must now, in a second 
moment, reevaluate the act of aesthetic reunification de- 
nounced a moment ago. Freud indeed often spoke of what he 
called the "secondary elaboration" of the dream process, 
wherein the disparate wish-fulfillments and the random con- 
tent of the nascent dream were then sewn and resewn together 
in a multiplication of ornamental interrelations that the earliest 
translators significantly called "overdetermination." This pro- 
cess of aesthetic and formal unification after the fact — getting 
rid of the loose threads, making up plausible connections 
where none existed before, rationalizing the coexistence of the 
different materials in a secondary and misleading way — this is 
surely very close to what Macherey and Eagleton have, in 
mind, save for the consequence that if the disrelation of the 
materials is here seen as a contradiction, then the smoothing 
over of those incommensurabilities and the forging of some- 
thing that looks unified must now be seen as more than a mere 
aesthetic act. It is also an ideological one, and aims at nothing 
less than the resolution of the contradiction itself. Organic 
form thereby reacquires its value as a social and protopolitical 
act. On the other hand, it should also be stressed that from 
the standpoint of Machereyan analysis, this act remains ambig- 
uous, and must continue to be readable in two distinct and 
antithetical ways: it is seen as unifying the material and resolv- 
ing the contradictions by papering them over with form, 
but on the other hand the analysis itself demonstrates that 
contradictions can never be resolved and that the "work" 
itself the former work — is for all that nothing but a coexis- 
tence of discontinuous materials. 

Something like this seems to me to be happening in the 



Postmodernism 




Eisenman projects, where a layering — literally reified or pub- 
lished for us in the Romeo and Juliet box, with its superim- 
posed transparencies — marks the irreducibility of each of the 
levels to each other. This is dramatized in the superimpositions 
of the Long Beach University Art Museum project, for exam- 
ple, in the incompatibility between the coordinates of various 
time zones, 



beginning with the settlement of California in 1 849 , the 
creation of the campus in 1949, and the projected "redis- 



ljl The Constraints 




covery" of the museum in the year 2049. The idea was to 
imagine the site in the year 2049, 100 years after the 
founding of the university, and 200 years after the period 
of the gold rush. 

The building takes its form from the overlapping regis- 
tration of several maps: of the ranch that once existed on 
the site, the site of the campus, and the changing configu- 
rations of fault lines, a river, a channel, and the coastline. 
They are combined in such a way that none of the notations 
takes precedence over any other, and so as to textualize 




1J3 The Constraints 




coincidental overlaps by subjective interpretations. These 
"superpositions" reveal analogical relationships that were 
obscured when some notations, such as social delineations, 
were accorded more importance. For example, the rela- 
tionship of the channel at the northern edge of the museum 
site is similar to the relationship of the river to the entire 
campus site. Thus, the building could be seen as an archeo- 




Postmodernism 174 



logical artifact, a palimpsest both of its formation and of its 
superposed "histories." 

In areas, the stone of the building bears the mark of a 
once existing riverbed, or the outline of former ranch 
boundaries, always overlaid with similar textual marks of 
Active conditions. Thus the stone of this architecture, in- 
stead of "configurating" an "image" of a museum, records 
the traces of a lost and a future history. The different 
historical layers and shifts could be understood as marks of 
intelligence, glimpses of the way a culture organized itself. 
In this sense architecture becomes the intervention into and 
the invention of stories, and this project represents a story 
about Long Beach that is different from those which have 
spoken for it previously. (Recent Projects, ic) 

The formal paradox emerges classically in the flipover from 
description to prescription, from analysis to fresh production, 
and can be articulated in terms of the problem of the unified 
work. If that was always a lie to begin with and the work 
never was unified, then if you know that and still want to 
produce a work of your own, do you produce random frag- 
ments and discontinuous remains, or do you first imagine a 
unified thing and then deconstruct yourself? What strikes me 
in all Eisenman's recent projects is the return of history, via 
the discontinuities of the site itself: the layerings are now 
historical, ghosts of various pasts, presents, and futures, which 
may in fact be alternate worlds but whose tensions and incom- 
patibilities are all mediated through some larger absent cause, 
which is History itself. 

If so, it is a different quality of history than what high 
modernism claimed to supply: cleanly Active pasts, as surgical 
as the transparencies of the Romeo and Juliet box, without 
anything of the archaic shadows of that "well of the past" that 
overflows like the periodicity of the Nile in the opening 
Prelude to Thomas Mann's Joseph tetralogy, bottomless, each 



175 The Constraints 




2 
o 
a. 



3 



deeper memory proving to be a "time-coulisse" behind which, 
like a screen, some yet deeper layer of the older and earlier 
lies concealed. "Was aber ist die Zeit?" No origin either, this 
modernist "time sense" — already a virtually Althusserian "al- 
ways-already" about which it is not the reality of the concept 
but the passion for it, in the modernist period, that demands 
some accounting. (We wiser postmoderns know already what 
Norman Holland pointed out so long ago — about "myth criti- 
cism" — that a text does not yield a "myth-effect" unless it is 
marked that way in advance, suggestively, like directions on a 
package.) Still, even the relatively postmodern revel in their 



Postmodernism lj6 




own forms of the desire called the deep past: as witness Lucy 
Lippard's striking Overlay, in which the affinities and intricate 
retroactivities between archaic tribal art of various kinds and 
post-Smithson conceptuality are richly documented: although 
the crucial nuance must be resonated, that not some thrilling 
Jungian base note is demanded of these dolmens and cave 
paintings today, but rather, for Lippard, the communal and 
collective social life that speaks through them and that we 
continue, ever so faintly, to hear, in our postindividual soli- 
tude. 

The temptation is great to assimilate something of Eisenman 



to contemporary science fiction (Kenneth Frampton does not 
altogether resist it in his critical essay, in Recent Projects, adduc- 
ing in addition the "disturbing" allusion to Edward Albee's 
uncanny play Tiny Alice); the Long Beach project in particular 
can trigger associations with Ballard (and his own ready-made 
California ruins) that are perhaps a little too apocalyptic (and 
also too narrative) for this orthogonal architecture. The latter' s 
primal splitting of the atom seems to lie in the fracturing of 
the cube into so many hollowed el-blocks, which are not 
merely systematically rearranged (in an interminable geometri- 
cal permutation) but ultimately held apart and wedged open 



Postmodernism IjS 




by a great, nameless, cagelike force, an empty wedge that 
seems already allegorical (in a somewhat different sense from 
our use here) of that "betweenness" that Eisenman evokes as a 
kind of third party to his various dualisms. The full spatial 
enactment and embodiment of this primal drama is then exhib- 
ited in the Wexner Center itself (Ohio State University, Co- 
lumbus), where ready-made mint ruins ("old" battlements, 
earthworks, armories) spring into life around the irresistible 
movement of the glass scaffolding that is driven slantways 
through them. 

Here we return again to the superposition of grids, of 




which the Wexner Center wedge is a dramatic exemplar, not 
least because it may correspond to an altogether Active set of 
coordinates. It is indeed from this possibility of multiple grids 
in an articulated simultaneity that the possibilities of Eisen- 
man 's new kind of historical projection derive. But the grids 
also return us to that other primal dilemma of all modern 
architecture, which is the incompatibility of a focus on the 
individual building (the individual architectural "work of art") 



jMXMM^M wenaewana 



Postmodernism 180 



and that on the city itself or the urban "fabric" (no matter that 
this dilemma is itself historically generated by a private prop- 
erty system). Grids clearly correspond to precisely that fabric 
into which, with vernacular fluency, we have seen Venturi 
suggest that we insert ourselves: and to that heterogeneous 
macrocosm of the urban that it became the vocation of Kool- 
haas' s enormous microcosms to replicate like so many self- 
sufficient monads. Eisenman's Ohio State version of a formal 
response (for one does not "solve" a form-problem like this, 
which is an irresolvable contradiction, rather one acknowl- 
edges it ad hoc in some new form-producing way) is sugges- 
tively characterized by Rafael Moneo as follows: 

The entire construction becomes a fragment of a city and, 
as a consequence, it loses the unitary and synthetic image 
that building once had. Here, structures and grids are what 
our eyes see rather than references to figural aspects which 
used to characterize buildings. This most probably is pur- 
posefully sought. Eisenman Trott's architecture emerges as 
an architectural phenomenon without assuming the condi- 
tion of a building. Croquis, cj) 

"Without assuming the condition of a building." These alto- 
gether remarkable words suddenly join the ground-bass of the 
deepest vocations of all the modern arts: as Roland Barthes 
once put it, to put off as long as possible the status of the 
finished work, of what, as a reified object, was then at once 
by definition over and done with: "to prolong that penumbral 
existence, as in a waiting room," between Art as such and the 
individual work. Identification with the various grids now for 
one long moment makes this possible for Eisenman as well, 
but generates some supplementary problems in its turn. 

For nothing could be more congenial, or so it might seem, 
to the amateur of undecideability, than the multiple and in- 
compatible "readings" given off by each of these optional grids 



l8l The Constraints 

in turn. What threatens this innocent pleasure is the nostalgia 
for harmony implicit in all such pluralism (the very fact of 
naming the situation and promising to turn it into a method is 
a symptom of "humanism" and of the promise that the incom- 
patibles will all on the other side of the rainbow eventually be 
reconciled): in this case, it is Gestalt psychology that menaces 
otherwise scandalous dualisms and offers to turn them back 
into the placid Janus-faced natural alternation of the rabbit and 
its Other. 

I believe that Eisenman's specific new historicity is to be 
grasped as a response to this immediate form-problem: seen in 
this way, it is not a stylistic option or embellishment but an 
unavoidable next move. He calls this first of all "scaling," a 
word presumably derived from Mandelbrot and chaos theory 
(in which infinite enlargements and reductions infallibly repeat 
the "self-same" constitutive irregularities and anomalies); in 
my view, however, it is the "motivation" by way of the most 
postcontemporary science that is optional. In reality scaling 
achieves something more fundamental and formal: namely, to 
unwedge multiple readings from the Gestalt, by projecting the 
lines of force of the synchronic (the grids) onto any number of 
diachronic axes. Scaling is therefore the equivalent in the realm 
of "scale" itself, or dimension, of what the various color 
schemes of the Romeo and Juliet box offered to model in the 
realm of temporality: "present elements (in color), elements 
of memory (in grey), and elements of immanence (in white)" 
(Moving Arrows, plate 7) — in fact, the very forces Raymond 
Williams tried to X-ray out of actuality with his notions of the 
"residual" and the "emergent." 

In the Romeo and Juliet box, indeed, both these processes 
are at work simultaneously, offering an interplay of aesthetic 
perceptions more complex than anything since Schoenberg's 
Klangfarbenmelodie, in which the sequence of specific instru- 
ments (flute, drum, string, trumpets) was rigorously coded 
according to notes in the theme, such that the recurrence of 



Postmodernism 182 



that particular sequence thus also unexpectedly constituted a 
repetition, but in some other dimension of the work alto- 
gether. 

Scaling is also appealed to, in Eisenman, as a way of "desta- 
bilizing" narrative, or at least "the traditional idea of what is an 
architectural narrative" (Recent Projects j8): but the context 
makes it clear he has in mind all the stale narrativities still 
implicit in the various architectural metaphors — something it 
was the historical merit of his own purism to have shown up, 
and another reason why one should hesitate before receiving 
the various themes of "ruin" here in some more properly 
Science-Fictional way (it being understood that SF is taken 
here as a signal historical achievement, of the rarest kind, and 
not a high-cultural reproach). But the words traditional idea of 
authorize us to suppose that new kinds of narratives are then 
not altogether undesirable or impossible; and I will indeed take 
the Eisenman dimensional effect (still most programmatically 
visible in the Long Beach project) as just such a projection of a 
new kind of historical narrative, one in which the present 
invents its own past, much like Bertrand Russell's God, who 
created this present only a moment ago, with a wondrous 
craftsmanship that rendered all the "always-alreadies" and the 
temporal perspectives, the local and more distant depths of 
past in so uncanny and lifelike fashion that we are tempted to 
think it has been standing there for thousands of years. Post- 
modern historicity then immediately becomes self-conscious 
and modestly embarrassed about its achievement, which it 
protests ("following Nietzsche") to be only a fiction. But we 
need not make up our minds too hastily about that, since it 
may turn out that, if this is the only kind of historicity we can 
have, we will have more ambitious plans for it. I once found 
myself thinking that the postmodern "historical novel," with all 
its false chronologies and made-up chronicles and genealogies, 
constituted a referential use of fiction to free ourselves from 
the irrevocability of the "facts" of the history manuals and to 



183 The Constraints 



institute a simultaneity of multiple worlds. Here the problem 
may be that of activating and deploying narrativities without 
ending up producing a single narrative object that would finally 
be "only that": "one recognizes in this project that architecture 
is about the telling of stories, and this stone text that is being 
written, this fiction, might tell a very different story about 
Long Beach than has ever been recorded before." 

3 

It will have been understood, as we now continue around the 
semiotic square to our final "type" or position, that the grids 
of the site and the geopolitical in general are what allow 
Eisenman his special way with the dilemma of whole and part, 
or totality and contents. To conceive the part as a grid, and 
the grid as part or element, is to make that provisional new 
coexistence possible that we call Eisenman 's architecture. But 
as has also been seen, its other condition of possibility is 
that specifically modernist passion to cancel the unacceptable 
stereotypes and conventions of a dead past in order to bring 
something radically new into being. What now happens to the 
parts or components when that passion is also abdicated, along 
with the "aspiration to totality" that empowered a Koolhaas? 

The answer need not be a privative one; indeed, I have 
come to think that several rather different kinds of answers are 
possible in this situation, which in this sense then characterizes 
postmodernism in its narrower and more exclusive sense (of 
what makes a heroic effort to eschew everything about the 
modern, from totality to innovation). The three variants are 
not only a function of the different ways in which the problem 
of the part is conceived; they also respond, even more funda- 
mentally, to the other term to be synthesized, the pole of 
replication, which clearly enough itself knows possibilities of 
variation. Thus, as a general "context," the object of replica- 
tion can be late modern everyday life in general as in Venturi 



Postmodernism 184 



(that is to say, U.S. urban life or "Las Vegas"); it can however 
also be constituted by the general field of what Benjamin 
designated by the term mechanical reproduceability, or in other 
words media culture. Finally (as in Critical Regionalism), it 
can be specifically inflected in the direction of a foreign culture 
(and perhaps even, in the perspective of cultural imperialism, 
a nonhegemonic foreign culture — or at least one that has 
some cultural and traditional stake in resisting the U.S. media 
variety). 

The variations in both these poles suggest that the number 
of combinations possible is a good deal greater than the three 
variants identified here: but to do justice to the abstract possi- 
bilities would require a whole new combination scheme at this 
point and thus a whole new discussion; while these three at 
least have the virtue of existing, as genuine movements or 
currents (or in the case of Critical Regionalism, as a concept 
that seems to offer a coherent aesthetic and has been widely 
debated as such). 

At any rate, the number of different positions both logically 
and ideologically possible in that principled negation of totality 
that emerges as a central issue here is very great and probably 
not to be reduced to that familiar litany of the Fragment and 
the fragmentary that appeals back, across the literary texts 
of Nietzsche, to those of the Schlegels and the first (Jena) 
Romanticism (but the role of both these literary moments in 
deconstruction, and particularly in the work of Paul de Man, 
reminds us of the rather different participation of this feature 
in our previous moment as well). Surely a variety of attitudes 
toward the "component" can be imagined here — decorations 
and floating signifiers fully as much as outright potsherds, part 
objects, neologisms, and assorted vocabulary, the contents of 
various kinds of tool kits, and even molecular by-products or 
waste; but the range of variations probably spans the great 
curve that leads from raw materials as such to modules, that is 
to say, from style to construction. Style and construction, 



185 The Constraints 



o 



respectively, are indeed the dominants of the first two actual- 
izations of this moment on which we will touch here: "post- o 



3 



a- 



modernism" and neorationalism, respectively, where postmod- * 
ernism is clearly to be grasped in a more restricted, and indeed 
more exclusively stylistic, sense than the more historical and 
sociological one in which it has generally been used. 

I mean here, in other words, that peculiarly lavish and 
ornamental, decorative "style" that has seemed to many people 
to embody what is quintessential about postmodernism in 
general (its hedonism, its refusal of asceticism, or on the other 
hand its frivolity and essential superficiality, depending on your 
perspective) and that has latterly, after its great precursors 
Venturi and Charles Moore, seemed to find its classical and 
hegemonic embodiment in the work of Michael Graves. The 
question of the part here — component, fragment, element, or 
building block — seems dominant, well beyond the merely 
"superficial" matter of "ornamentation" as such, insofar as, 
particularly in the work of Moore and Graves, it is somehow 
the empty or paradoxical relationship of the various parts to 
each other that often seems to constitute the building as such. 
Indeed, it has been observed how in such work the "various 
elements — architrave, column, arch, order, lintel, dormer, 
and dome — begin with the slow force of cosmological pro- 
cesses to flee each other in space, standing out from their 
former supports, as it were, in free levitation" like "Dali's late 
Christs hovering over the crosses they were nailed to, or 
Magritte's men in bowler hats slowly descending from the 
skies in the form of the raindrops that determined them to 
wear their bowler hats and carry their umbrellas in the first 
place." 

This levitation — this strange afterlife in the void that is the 
condition of a figure without ground — can be compared to the 
organs that float within Koolhaas 's cubic totalities; they can be 
contrasted to the superimposed grids in Eisenman, which in 
this respect might better be characterized as grounds without 



Postmodernism i86 



a figure (and that have therefore been dialectically promoted 
to Ae status of figures in their own right). The figures of the 
stylistically postmodern suggest a cultural element that would 
be something like the collective or media unconscious through 
which such indigestible remnants float, along with the flags 
the map of Italy, and other such public icons that indeed tend 
to reduce this implicit model of the public sphere (the Piazza 
dTtalia, in New Orleans) to its most impoverished and rudi- 
mentary Fourth of July American celebratory version. This is 
then to be sharply distinguished from the way in which the 
storehouse of forms and types is figured in Italian neorational- 
ism, where it is clearly the history of architecture itself— 
identified with the whole classical history of Latin Chris- 
tendom—that offers the limbo in which more properly archi- 
tectural signifiers and part-objects wait in half-life for their 
resurrection at Aldo Rossi's hands. 

Yet a certain libidinal restraint, which can indeed be pro- 
longed on into asceticism or irony, marks a kinship between 
Rossi and Robert Venturi, who might in that respect— if Las 
Vegas were pronounced rational— be described as a kind of 
mass-cultural neorationalist whose respect for the coherence 
of that city fabric is no less than what is prescribed by the 
Italians for the much more ancient (and thus, alas, far more 
"high cultural") city fabric within which they must work, and 
whose manipulation of the pre-given components (of a vernacu- 
lar in his case, rather than a typology) is equally self-effacing 
and deliberately undramatic. Both are then menaced by a 
certain breakdown of this repression or decorum: pressure, a 
swelling away at the paradigm, a kind of internal disquiet, can 
indeed be sensed in the rich materials and Kahn-like elegance 
of Venturi's Gordon Wu building at Princeton, while Rossi's 
Hotel II Palazzo at Fukuoka comes close to a controlled delir- 
ium in the abnormal scale of its windowless green-and-orange 
facade, whose blank rows of columns simulate an enormous 
grave marker, while within a gilt hush glows within narrow 



l8j The Constraints 



spaces of great depth and height, like archaic recesses destined 
for obscure ritual uses: a building that would provide an 
excellent occasion for reflecting on the nature of the differ- 
ences that separate the postmodernity of this particular fin de 
siecle from the decadence of the last one. 

Not so paradoxically, it is in another field that we find 
the most interesting critical arguments against this particular 
practical strategy of foregrounding the part or component over 
against the former whole: the fact that this critique emerges 
from political philosophy, then, suggests some more general 
transferability of the present scheme to postmodern political 
practice and theory as well, which we will not, however, 
pursue further here. Ernesto Laclau and Chantal Mouffe's 
Hegemony and Socialist Strategy, indeed, is ideologically commit- 
ted to the task of demonstrating the logical incoherence (as 
well as the politically debilitating effects) of various doctrines 
of totality or social closure (most of them taxed with Hegelian 
or Marxian affinities): their argument clearly places their text 
within the problematic mapped out by our use of the semiotic 
square. What is particularly relevant for us is their interesting 
critique of the rival critique of totality offered by the English 
political theorists Hindiss, Hirst, and Cutler. Laclau and 
Mouffe argue that by stigmatizing global conceptions of society 
and the economy in the name of their various (for Hindess, 
Hirst, and Cutler) not necessarily related parts — such as insti- 
tutions, forms of organization, or agents — the notion of a 
preexisting unity finds itself simply transferred from the for- 
mer whole to the former parts or elements or components: 

The notion of totality is here rejected by reference to the 
nonessential character of the links uniting the elements 
of the presumed totality. In this, we have no disagree- 
ments. But, once elements such as "institutions," "forms of 
organization," or "agents" have been specified, a question 
immediately arises. If these aggregates — by contrast with 



Postmodernism 188 



the totality — are considered legitimate objects of social 
theorization, must we conclude that the relations among 
the internal components of each of them are essential and 
necessary? If the answer is yes, we have clearly moved from 
an essentialism of the totality to an essentialism of the 
elements; we have merely replaced Spinoza with Leibniz, 
except that the role of God is no longer to establish har- 
mony among the elements, but simply to secure their 
independence. (Hegemony, 103) 

Replace the "institutions, forms of organization, or agents" of 
Hindess, Hirst, and Cutler with the architectural signifiers 
or types of stylistic postmodernism or neorationalism and a 
provocative analogy begins to develop, in which the "totaliz- 
ing" coherence of the high modernist building is repudiated 
but not the formal autonomy of the parts and components 
that survive its disintegration. This seemingly logical objection 
might also go a certain way toward accounting for the kitsch 
effect of the quotation of preexisting smaller forms in this 
architecture — itself a function of the renunciation of the New 
or of Innovation. The aporia is not unlike that confronted by 
contemporary linguistics (particularly its Chomskyan form): all 
of the words and sentence structure of a given language preex- 
ist the individual speaker, who is nonetheless able to fashion 
out of them creative utterances never before spoken. 

Nor is it clear whether the solution of Laclau and Mouffe 
themselves — their conception of an articulation as "a relation 
among elements such that their identity is modified as a result 
of the articulatory practice" (ioj) — can have any particular 
relevance or application in the architectural field: although if 
analogies can be established there, they would probably have 
more to do with Eisenman or Koolhaas (in their very different 
ways) than with the architectural movements in question in 
this particular semiotic quadrant. 

As for the third movement associated with this final posi- 



189 The Constraints 



tion, several paradoxes are associated with its identification 
and placement here. What Kenneth Frampton (following 
Tzonis and Lefaivre) calls Critical Regionalism, is for one thing 
virtually by definition not a movement: he himself calls it a 
"critical category oriented towards certain common features" 
("Critical Regionalism" 326), but there seems no good reason 
for us not to go on to characterize it as an exemplar of that 
virtually extinct conceptual species, an aesthetic, for it is certain 
that Critical Regionalism knows, perhaps in un traditional pro- 
portions, the same fundamental tension between the descrip- 
tive and the prescriptive that marks all philosophical (but 
also all vanguard) aesthetics. Such systems — and it would be 
appropriate to limit its history as a project to the bourgeois 
era as "such, from the mid-eighteenth to the mid-twentieth 
centuries — in effect seek, by describing the constitutive fea- 
tures of authentic works of art as they already exist, to suggest 
invariants and norms for the production of future works. To 
put it this way is to realize how unseasonable this project is 
today, and how unfashionable the very conception of aesthetics 
must be in an age of artistic nominalism and antinomianism. It 
can be argued that the "second modernism" of the avant-gardes 
represented any number of efforts to free art from aesthetics 
(I take this to be Peter Burger's position in Theory of the Avant- 
Garde); it can also be argued that aesthetics emerges as a 
problematic with secular modernism, whose contradictions 
finally render it impossible (this would at least be one way of 
reading Adorno's Aesthetic Theory). Meanwhile, on any philo- 
sophical view, the totalizing normativity of this kind of tradi- 
tional philosophical discourse is clearly very unpostmodern 
indeed: it sins against the poststructural and postmodern repu- 
diation of the conception of a philosophical system, and is 
somehow un- and antitheoretical in its values and procedures 
(if one takes the position that what is called theory today, or 
"theoretical discourse," constitutes a displacement of tradi- 
tional philosophy and a replacement of or substitute for it). 



Postmodernism 190 



Yet it is equally clear, not merely that Frampton is aware 
of all this but also that a certain deliberate retrogression is 
built into the project itself where it is underscored by the 
slogan of an arriere-garde or rearguard action, whose untimely 
status is further emphasized by Frampton 's insistence that 
whatever Critical Regionalism turns out to be, in its various 
regions of possibility, it must necessarily remain a "marginal 
practice" ("Critical Regionalism," 327). 

But these features suggest a second paradox in any typology 
that associates the aesthetic of Critical Regionalism with the 
stylistic postmodernisms of the relevant (mainly North Ameri- 
can) contemporary architects: for while it can be said that 
Critical Regionalism shares with them a systematic repudiation 
of certain essential traits of high modernism, it distinguishes 
itself by attempting at one and the same time to negate a 
whole series of postmodern negations of modernism as well, 
and can in some respects be seen as antimodern and antipost- 
modern simultaneously, in a "negation of the negation" that is 
far from returning us to our starting point or from making 
Critical Regionalism over into a belated form of modernism. 

Such is for example very precisely the stand outlined here 
on the matter of the avant-garde, which remained, in high 
modernism, both Enlightenment and Utopian, sought to out- 
trump the vulgar bourgeois conception of progress, and re- 
tained the belief in the possibilities of a liberatory dimension 
to technology and scientific development. But the postcontem- 
porary forms of such "progress," in global modernization, 
corporate hegemony, and the universal standardization of com- 
modities and "life styles," are precisely what Critical Regional- 
ism seeks to resist. It thus shares the doxa of the postmodern 
generally with respect to the end of the avant-garde, the 
perniciousness of Utopianism, and the fear of a universalizing 
homogeneity or identity. Yet its slogan of an arriere-garde 
would also seem incompatible with a postmodern "end of 
history" and repudiation of historical teleology, since Critical 



191 



The Constraints 




Regionalism continues to seek a certain deeper historical logic 
in the past of this system, if not its future: a rearguard retains 
overtones of a collective resistance, and not the anarchy of 
trans-avant-garde pluralism that characterizes many of the 
postmodern ideologies of Difference as such. Meanwhile, if 
the current slogans of marginality and resistance are also 
evoked by Frampton, they would appear to carry rather differ- 
ent connotations than those deployed in, say, current evoca- 
tions of multiculturalism, which are urban and internal First 
World, rather than geographically remote, as in his systemati- 
cally semiperipheral examples, located in Denmark, Catalunia, 
Portugal, Mexico, California in the 1920s and 30s, Ticino, 
Japan, and Greece ("Critical Regionalism," 314—326). The 
enumeration warns us, to begin with, that "region" in this 
aesthetic program is very different from the sentimental lo- 
calism we have discussed on the occasion of Buford's view of 
the new American short-story writers: here it designates, not 
a rural place that resists the nation and its power structures 
but rather a whole culturally coherent zone (which may also 



Postmodernism l<)2 



correspond to political autonomy) in tension with the stand- 
ardizing world system as a whole. 

Such areas are not so much characterized by the emergence 
of strong collective identities as they are by their relative 
distance from the full force of global modernization, a distance 
that provided a shelter or an eco-niche in which regional 
traditions could still develop. The model shows some similari- 
ties to Eric Wolf s remarkable feasant Wars of the Twentieth 
Century, which posits a relationship between remoteness from 
colonization and the ultimate possibility of organizing popular 
resistance to it. Obviously, social and collective organization 
has to provide a mediation in both cases: in Wolf, it is the fact 
that a collective or village culture was left relatively intact that 
enables the formation of conscious popular insurgencies (I take 
it that the multiculturalisms see such forms of resistance in 
terms of reconquest and reconstruction rather than in terms of 
the survival of residual traditions). Frampton quotes the Cali- 
fornia architect Harwell Hamilton Harris to something of the 
same effect: 



In California in the late Twenties and Thirties modern 
European ideas met a still developing regionalism. In New 
England, on the other hand, European Modernism met a 
rigid and restrictive regionalism that at first resisted and 
then surrendered. New England accepted European Mod- 
ernism whole because its own regionalism had been re- 
duced to a collection of restrictions. 

("Critical Regionalism," 320) 

It should be added, in view of Frampton 's explicit dissociation 
of Critical Regionalism from populism (Anti-Aesthetic, 20—21), 
that this is not to be understood as a political movement as 
such (another feature that distinguishes it from the essentially 
political conception of the modernist avant-gardes). Indeed, 
the untheorized nature of its relationship to the social and 



193 The Constraints 



political movements that might be expected to accompany its 
development, to serve as a cultural context, or to lend morale 
and support, is something of a problem here. What seems 
clear is that a mediation of intellectuals and professionals is 
foreseen in which these strata retain a kind of semi-autonomy: 
we may then conjecture a political situation in which the status 
of national professionals, of the local architects and engineers, 
is threatened by the increasing control of global technocracies 
and long-distance corporate decision-makers and their staffs. 
In such a situation, then, the matter of the survival of national 
intellectuals becomes itself allegorical of the politics of national 
autonomy as such, and the suggestion of idealism that may 
accompany a defense of the survival of national artistic styles 
is regrounded in social existence and practice. 

There is thus a sense in which Critical Regionalism can be 
opposed both to modernism and to postmodernism alike. On 
the other hand, if one wished rather to stress its more funda- 
mental vocation to resist a range of postmodern trends and 
temptations, Frampton offers a revised account of architectural 
history that would document a continuity between a certain 
High Modernism and the critical-regional practice of the pres- 
ent day: 

A tectonic impulse may be traced across the century uniting 
diverse works irrespective of their different origins . . . 
Thus for all their stylistic idiosyncrasies a very similar 
level of tectonic articulation patently links Henrik Petrus 
Berlage's Stock Exchange of 189c to Frank Lloyd Wright's 
Larkin Building of 1904 and Herman Hertzberger's Central 
Beheer office complex of 1974. In each instance there is a 
similar concatenation of span and support that amounts to 
a tectonic syntax in which gravitational force passes from 
purlin to truss, to pad stone, to corbel, to arch, to pedi- 
ment and abutment. The technical transfer of this load 
passes through a series of appropriately articulated transi- 



Postmodernism 194 



tions and joints . . . We find a comparable concern for the 
revealed joint in the architecture of both Auguste Perret 
and Louis Kahn. (Architectural Design, 24) 

We will return in a moment to the formal implications of this 
historical revision in which it is modernism (and in particular 
the work of Frank Lloyd Wright), whose essential telos is now 
located in a tectonic vocation. 

On the other hand, with a little ingenuity, Critical Region- 
alism could be readjusted to its postmodern position in our 
scheme, on the basis of its post- Utopian disillusionment and 
its retreat from the overweening high modernist conception of 
the monument and the megastructure, and of the spatial inno- 
vation powerful enough to change the world in a genuinely 
revolutionary way. From this perspective, Critical Regionalism 
could be seen to share postmodernism 's more general contex- 
tualism; as for the valorization of the part or fragment, it is a 
kind of thinking that here returns in an unexpected way, 
namely, via the synecdochic function whereby the individual 
building comes to stand for the local spatial culture generally. 
In this sense, Critical Regionalism could be characterized as a 
kind of postmodernism of the global system as a whole (or at 
least of the semiperiphery if not the Third World), as opposed 
to the First World's own internal and external postmodern- 
isms that I have described earlier. 

But it will be more useful, in conclusion, to sketch out the 
oppositions and tensions between the critical-regionalist aes- 
thetic and the features of an actually existing postmodernism, 
something I propose to map according to the graph opposite. 

The new schema suggests some interesting formal aspects, 
in addition to the logical possibilities of new lateral syntheses 
or combinations that are intriguing enough to be left for 
another time. The crucial issues to be touched on now are, 
however, the theme of "joints and supports" as well as that of 
the tectonic generally; the matter of the scenographic and also 



STYLISTIC POSTMODERNISM 



epl 1 cation or Intertextual 1ty 
THE ANT I VANGUARD 
(TRANS "AVANT-GARDE 

PLURALISM) 
CORPORATE HEGEMONY 



< 



joints 
THE ANTISCENOGRAPHIC 
tectonl c / tactn e / tel 1 ur1 c 
THE ANTIGRID 



part/element/s1gn1f1e 
THE ANT I SYSTEM 




rearguard / 
MARGINALITY AND 
THE LOCAL. 
RESISTANCE 



CRITICAL REGIONALISM 



Postmodernism 



196 



of the "grid"; and finally the role of technology in all this, or 
in other words of the truest bearer of modernity (if not of 
modernism) in the architectural process. 

It is at any rate by way of form itself that the new aesthetic 
is best approached, for in this area Frampton provides a series 
of features that are systematically defined in opposition to 
current doxa, and in particular to Venturi's influential descrip- 
tion of the essentials of any building in terms of the "decorated 
shed" — or in other words the facade with its ornament and 
the space that is constructed and projected behind it. Both 
these features are categories of the representational for Framp- 
ton, and it is indeed the very primacy of representation in 
contemporary architecture that the notion of a Critical Region- 
alism is designed fundamentally to challenge. He does not 
engage in any elaborate polemic with the idea of the spatial, 
save to observe everything that is abstract about it (when 
contrasted to place [Anti-Aesthetic 24-25]): an abstraction in the 
concept that itself replicates abstraction in the instrumental 
relationship to the world itself. Indeed, his selection of a 
remark by Vittorio Gregotti— "The worst enemy of modern 
architecture is the idea of space considered solely in terms of 
its economic and technical exigencies indifferent to the idea of 
the site" — would seem to authorize a dialectical continuation, 
for which a certain aesthetic abstraction of space could be 
grasped as the correlative to the economic and technical one 
evoked here. Space can indeed not be seen as such, and in that 
sense a "space" is difficult to theorize as an aesthetic object in 
its own right; yet it is perhaps because the critique of visual 
representation (that will come into its own in the related 
discussion of the facade) does not take directly on this abstract 
aesthetization of space, that the diagnosis of the "scenographic" 
is here so brilliantly proposed and deployed. Flamboyant 
spaces become visible as the scene of imaginary gestures and 
dramas, and it is by way of this supplement of the melodra- 
matic and the theatrical that a critique of commodity form can 



197 The Constraints 



enter the more properly architectural diagnosis (it would for 
example be of no little interest to prolong this analysis in the 
direction of Michael Fried 's historical theory of modernism 
as a tendential resistance of "absorption" to "theatricality"). 
Frampton 's own working philosophical categories here are 
"ontological" (as opposed to "representational") categories; be- 
sides invoking Heidegger's conception of the relationship of 
dwelling to building, he would seem to rely heavily on the 
more problematical (or "humanist") notion of "experience" as 
an alternative to the spectacle and commodity conceptions of 
the visual and the scenographic. 

In fact, however, Frampton has a more formal alternative 
to these particular aesthetic modes — an alternative framed by 
the tripartite values of the tactile, the tectonic, and the tellu- 
ric, which frame the notion of space in such a way that it 
turns back slowly into a conception of place once again. This 
alternative tends now to displace those parts of the building 
that are visible (and thus lend themselves to categories of the 
visual arts) in favor of a "privileging of the joint as the primor- 
dial tectonic element": a nonvisual and nonrepresentational 
category which Frampton attributes to Gottfried Semper and 
which for him constitutes "the fundamental nexus around 
which building comes into being, that is to say, comes to be 
articulated as a presence in itself" ("Rappel a l'ordre," 22). 
The category of the joint as a primal articulation of the two 
forces that meet in it (along with its correlative of the "'break' 
or 'dis-joint' . . . that point at which things break against each 
other rather than connect: that significant fulcrum at which 
one system, surface or material abruptly ends to give way 
to another" ("Rappel a l'ordre," 24) would seem to be the 
fundamental innovation of the aesthetic of Critical Regional- 
ism, whose non- or antirepresentational equivalent for the 
other arts (or literature) remains to be worked out. 

In my view, Frampton's more conventional emphasis on 
the tactile features of such buildings is best grasped by way of 



Postmodernism 19& 



this more fundamentally structural one of forces in opposition, 
rather than as the privileging of one type of bodily sense 
("touch") as opposed to another ("sight"). Indeed, his illustra- 
tions — the relationship between a solid parquet and "the mo- 
mentum of an induced gait and the relative inertia of the body" 
in Visconti's The Damned, for example (Anti-Aesthetic 28) — 
would seem to authorize an interpretation whereby it is the 
isolation of the individual sense that becomes the fundamental 
symptom of postmodern alienation, an isolation most often 
visual, but which one could just as easily imagine in terms of 
tactility (as for example in the gleaming — but obviously highly 
tactile — surfaces of Venturi's Gordon Wu Hall, or the re- 
markable film of running water of Norman Foster's Century 
Tower in Tokyo, where paper-thin water itself becomes virtu- 
ally a new and undiscovered Science-Fictional element akin to 
polished concrete or steel). The aesthetic of Critical Regional- 
ism would presumably have to insist on the synaesthetic or 
structural-relational sensoriality of even the tactile as a vehicle 
for that more fundamental category and value that is the 
tectonic itself. 

The related value of the "telluric" can also be grasped in this 
way, as a seemingly Heideggerian and archaic, "rear-guard" 
emphasis on the earth itself and on traditional sacred struc- 
tures, which can also be read far more contemporaneously as 
a systematic negation of that emphasis on the grid (that is to 
say, on abstract and homogeneous corporate space) that we 
have found both Koolhaas and Eisenman obliged to engage in 
one way or another in their only partially "postmodern" forms 
of production. Here it is the way in which the tectonic and its 
fundamental category, the joint, necessarily enforces a down- 
ward distribution of pressures and forces that can be said, not 
merely to reveal and acknowledge the site as such but even in 
some creative sense to unveil and to produce it as though for 
the first time (Gregotti is again quoted to the effect that such 
"siting" constitutes "an act of knowledge of the context that 



199 The Constraints 



comes out of its architectural modification" ("Rappel a l'ordre" 
24). But at that point, the negation of the value of the grid 
ceases to be a merely ideological option (a kind of "humanist" 
preference for place over against the alienated poststructural 
and postmodern dehumanization of space) and expresses a 
positive and formal architectural value in its own right: a value 
that goes a long way toward "regrounding" (in all the senses of 
this word) Frampton's defense of the various forms of local or 
regional "critical" architecture in the global differentiation of 
the "ground" thus "marked" and "broken" by a truly telluric- 
tactile construction. 

We must now finally come to the role of technology and 
modernity in this aesthetic for it is in the unique relationship 
of Critical Regionalism to such "Western" realities that this 
proposal most fundamentally distinguishes itself from the pop- 
ulist or cultural-nationalist, Third World, and anti-Western or 
antimodern responses with which we are familiar. However 
deliberately regressive and tradition- oriented this aesthetic 
may seem, insisting as it does on what Raymond Williams 
would have called a cultural politics of the "residual" rather 
than the "emergent" in the contemporary situation, it equally 
explicitly acknowledges the existence and the necessity of 
modern technology in ways whose originality must now be 
shown. We have already seen, for example, how Koolhaas 
acknowledged the constraint and "necessity" of technological 
modernity (that "one third of the section of a building . . . [is] 
inaccessible to architectural thought") by concentrating it into 
the single fixed point of a kind of architectural "condensor" 
(the 1 8 1 1 Manhattan grid plan for urbanism, the elevator 
for the individual building) whose acceptance released the 
surrounding space to a new kind of freedom or innovation. 

Frampton's conception of the acknowledgement of this ne- 
cessity seems both less programmatic in that it does not fore- 
see a single kind of solution to the matter the way Koolhaas 
seems to do, and more "philosophical" or even ideological 



Postmodernism 200 




insofar as the dualistic nature of the opposition between tech- 
nology and its other is somehow through his various examples 
always maintained (this is the sense, for example, in which he 
can even evoke Norman Foster's work — here the Sainsbury 
center of 1978 — with its "discrimination between servant and 
served spaces" as an articulation still distantly redolent of 
properly tectonic values ["Rappel a l'ordre," 2 j] rather than as 
the outright "late-modern" technological and corporate cele- 
bration seen by other analysts such as Jencks). 

Still, two of his crucial illustrations for the exemplification 
of an already existing Critical Regionalism would seem to 
open up this dualism in a suggestively new way and to stage 
this aesthetic as a strategy for somehow including and defusing 
technological modernity, for outsmarting it in the very con- 
structional process itself. Thus he shows how Jorn Utzon's 
Bagsvaerd Church projects a kind of double life, its exterior 
"combination of modular assembly and in-situ casting" consti- 



201 The Constraints 

o 

tuting "an appropriate integration of the full range of concrete g 
techniques which are now at our disposal" and "not only 
according] with the values of universal civilisation but also § 
'representing] ' its capacity for normative application" ("Criti- 
cal Regionalism" 314); while the interior of the church sud- 3 
denly projects a vault that goes well beyond its customary 
signification of "the sacred in Western culture" and indeed 
incorporates "the subtle and contrary allusions" deployed by 
the Chinese pagoda roof (along with the "Nordic vernacular 
of the stave church"), whose ideological consequences as an 
architectural "symbolic act" Frampton here analyzes with ex- 
emplary perspicuity ("Critical Regionalism" 31c). 

A rather different, if not inverted, way of dealing with the 
modern Frampton then deduces from the practice of Tadao 
Ando, whose very theory (itself no doubt a development out 
of the uniquely Japanese philosophical attention to what was 
in the 1930s and 1940s called the problem of "overcoming 
modernity") characterizes it as the strategy of an "enclosed 
modernity": here the technological is as it were wrapped 
within the renewal of more authentic Japanese attention to 
light and detail and thus ultimately to what Frampton calls the 
tectonic ("Critical Regionalism" 324). The procedure here 
would seem to be something like the reversal or inversion of 
Utzon's move, described above; yet both hold out the possibil- 
ity of inventing some new relationship to the technological 
beyond nostalgic repudiation or mindless corporate celebra- 
tion. If Critical Regionalism is to have any genuine content, it 
will do so only on the strength of such invention and its 
capacity to "enclose" or to reopen and transfigure the burden 
of the modern. 

It is, however, worth emphasizing the degree to which the 
very concept and program of Critical Regionalism reflects its 
moment in history, and in particular expresses the pathos of a 
situation in which the possibility of a radical alternative to late 
capitalist technologies (in both architecture and urbanism alike) 

Eftjjl X^MSkM wengewan 



Postmodernism 202 



has decisively receded. Here not the emergent but the residual 
is emphasized (out of historical necessity), and the theoretical 
problem is at one with a political one, namely, how to fashion 
a progressive strategy out of what are necessarily the materials 
of tradition and nostalgia? How to use the attempt to conserve 
in an actively liberatory and transformational way? The prob- 
lem has its historical roots in the specificity of postmodern 
technology and urbanism, where "progress" — if the concept 
exists at all any longer — involves a very different ratio of the 
introduction of new machinery to the transformation of the 
built environment than it did in the nineteenth century (in 
which a different kind of technology obtained, with a very 
different, more visible and stylistic impact on nature than is 
the case with the information technologies). So it is that today 
very often some of the most militant urban or neighborhood 
movements draw their vitality from the attempt to prevent 
an older city fabric from being disaggregated or destroyed 
altogether: something that foretells significant and ominous 
dilemmas in coordinating such "chains of equivalence" (to 
speak like Laclau and Mouffe again) with those of "new social 
movements" that necessarily refuse such conservative family- 
and-neighborhood ideological motivations. 

Frampton's conceptual proposal, however, is not an inter- 
nal but rather a geopolitical one: it seeks to mobilize a plural- 
ism of "regional" styles (a term selected, no doubt, in order to 
forestall the unwanted connotations of the terms national and 
international alike), with a view toward resisting the standard- 
izations of a henceforth global late capitalism and corporatism, 
whose "vernacular" is as omnipresent as its power over local 
decisions (and indeed, after the end of the Cold War, over 
local governments and individual nation states as well). 

It is thus politically important, returning to the problem of 
parts or components, to emphasize the degree to which the 
concept of Critical Regionalism is necessarily allegorical. What 
the individual buildings are henceforth here a unit of is no 



203 The Constraints 



longer a unique vision of city planning (such as the Baroque) 
nor a specific city fabric (like Las Vegas) but rather a distinctive 
regional culture as a whole, for which the distinctive individual 
building becomes a metonym. The construction of such a 
building resembles the two previously discussed movements of 
a stylistic postmodernism and Italian neorationalism to the 
degree to which it must also deploy a storehouse of preexisting 
forms and traditional motifs, as signs and markers by which to 
"decorate" what generally remains a relatively conventional 
Western "shed." 

In order for this kind of building to make a different 
kind of statement, its decorations must also be grasped as 
recognizable elements in a cultural-national discourse, and the 
building of the building must be grasped at one and the same 
time as a physical structure and as a symbolic act that reaffirms 
the regional-national culture as a collective possibility in its 
moment of besiegement and crisis. But perhaps it is with 
allegory as with the mythical that its effects remain wanting 
unless the object has been labeled in advance and we have 
been told beforehand that it is an allegorical effect that has 
been sought after? This interesting theoretical problem, how- 
ever, becomes visible only when a "text" is isolated from the 
social ground in which its effects are generated: in the present 
instance, for example, it should be clear enough that an archi- 
tectural form of Critical Regionalism would lack all political 
and allegorical efficacy unless it were coordinated with a vari- 
ety of other local, social, and cultural movements that aimed 
at securing national autonomy. It was one of the signal errors 
of the artistic activism of the 1960s to suppose that there 
existed, in advance, forms that were in and of themselves 
endowed with a political, and even revolutionary, potential by 
virtue of their own intrinsic properties. On the other hand, 
there remains a danger of idealism implicit in all forms of 
cultural nationalism as such, which tends to overestimate the 
effectivity of culture and consciousness and to neglect the 



Postmodernism 204 



concomitant requirement of economic autonomy. But it is 
precisely economic autonomy that has been everywhere called 
back into question in the postmodernity of a genuinely global 
late capitalism. 

An even graver objection to the strategies of Critical Re- 
gionalism, as to the various postmodernisms generally when 
they claim a political vocation for themselves, is awakened by 
the value of pluralism and the slogan of difference they all in 
one way or another endorse. The objection does not consist in 
some conviction that pluralism is always a liberal, rather than 
a truly radical, value — a dogmatic and doctrinaire position that 
the examination of any number of active moments of history 
would be enough to dispel. No, the uneasiness stems from, the 
very nature of late capitalism itself, about which it can be 
wondered whether pluralism and difference are not somehow 
related to its own deeper internal dynamics. 

It is a feeling raised, for example, by the new strategies of 
what is now called post-Fordism: the term can be seen as one 
of the optional variants for such terms as postmodernity or late 
capitalism, with which it is roughly synonymous. However, it 
underscores one of the originalities of multinational capitalism 
today in a way that tends to problematize the assumptions of 
the strategy of critical regionalism itself. Where Fordism and 
classical imperialism, in other words, designed their products 
centrally and then imposed them by flat on an emergent public 
(you do have a choice of color with the Model-T: Black!), 
post-Fordism puts the new computerized technology to work 
by custom-designing its products for individual markets. This 
has indeed been called postmodern marketing, and it can be 
thought to "respect" the values and cultures of the local popu- 
lation by adapting its various goods to suit those vernacular 
languages and practices. Unfortunately this inserts the corpora- 
tions into the very heart of local and regional culture, about 
which it becomes difficult to decide whether it is authentic any 
longer (and indeed whether that term still means anything). It 



20$ The Constraints 



is the EPCOT syndrome raised to a global scale and returns us 
to the question of the "critical" with a vengeance, since now 
the "regional" as such becomes the business of global American 
Disneyland-related corporations, who will redo your own na- 
tive architecture for you more exactly than you can do it 
yourself. Is global Difference the same today as global Identity? 



Bibliographj 



Attali, Jacques. Noise. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 
1985. 

Borie, Jean. Le Celibataire jrancais. Paris: Le Sagittaire, 1976. 

Brodsky, Joseph. "Catastrophes in the Air." In Less than One. New York: 

Farrar, Strauss, Giroux, 1986. 
Buford, Bill. Introduction to "New American Writing." Granta, no. 8. 

(<98 3 ). 

Burger, Peter. Theory of the Arant-Garde. Minneapolis: University of 

Minnesota Press, 1984. 
Claudel, Paul. Preface to Arthur Rimbaud. Oeuvres completes. Paris: 

Mercure de France, 191 2. 
Colletti, Lucio. Marxism and Hegel. London: Verso, 1973. 
Collingwood, R. G. Essay on Metaphysics. Oxford: Oxford University 

Press, 1940. 

Deleuze, Gilles. Presentation de Sacher-Masoch. Paris: Editions de Minuit, 
1967. 

Eisenman, Peter. House X. New York: Rizzoli, 1982. 

. Moving Arrows, Eros, and Other Errors: An Architecture of Absence. 

London: Architectural Association, 1986. 



graphy 208 

. Recent Projects. Edited by Arie Graafland. Nijmegen: Idea Books, 

1989, 

. El Croquis. Special Issue no. 41 (October/December 1989). 

Elliott, Robert C. The Shape of Utopia. Chicago: University of Chicago 
Press, 1970. 

FitzGerald, Frances. Fire in the Lake. Boston: Little, Brown, 1972. 

Flatley, Jonathan. "Platonov's Melancholy Bodies: Mourning, Utopia, 
and Sexuality in Chevengur." Annual Bulletin, Institute of Philosophy 
of the Russian Academy of Sciences, Moscow. Forthcoming. 

Frampton, Kenneth. "Towards a Critical Regionalism: Six Points for an 
Architecture of Resistance." In Hal Foster, ed., The Anti-Aesthetic. 
Seattle: Bay Press, 1983. 

. "Critical Regionalism: Modern Architecture and Cultural Iden- 
tity." In K. Frampton, Modern Architecture: A Critical History. London: 
Thames and Hudson, 198c. 

. "Rappel a l'ordre: The Case for the Tectonic." Architectural Design 

co, no. 3/4 (1991). 

Freud, Sigmund. "The Antithetical Meaning of Primal Words." The 
Standard Edition, vol. 11, pp. 153—161. London: The Hogarth Press, 
'9J7- 

Fuss, Diana. Essentially Speaking. London: Routledge, 1989. 
Groys, Boris. Gesamtkunstwerk Stalin . Munich: Hanser, 1988. 
Guha, Ranajit. A Rule of Property for Bengal. Paris and The Hague: 
Mouton, 1963. 

Habermas, Jurgen and Niklas Luhmann. Theorie der Gesellschaft oder 

Sozialtechnologie. Frankfurt: Suhrkamp, 1971. 
Hindess, Barry and Paul Hirst, A. Cutler, and A. Hussein. Marx's Capital 

and Capitalism Today. 2 vols. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 

1977. 

Hirschman, Albert O. The Passions and the Interests. Princeton: Princeton 
University Press, 1977. 

Huntington, Samuel. "Political Order and Political Decay." In S. Hunt- 
ington, ed., Political Order in Changing Societies. New Haven: Yale 
University Press, 1968. 

Jacobs, Jane. The Death and Life of Great American Cities. New York: 
Random House, 1961. 

Jameson, Fredric. Late Marxism. London: Verso, 1992. 

. Postmodernism; or, The Cultural Logic of Late Capitalism. Durham: 

Duke University Press, 1992. 



209 Biblio 
ea 
>■< 
a 

. "World Reduction in Le Guin." Science Fiction Studies 2, no. 3 ^ 

(!97j)- 

Kant, Immanuel. The Critique of Pure Reason. 1781. Reprint, London: 
Macmillan, 1958. 

Karatani, Kojin. The Origins of Modern Japanese Literature. Durham: Duke 

University Press, 1992. 
Kojeve, Alexandre. Introduction a la lecture de Hegel. Paris: Gallimard, 

1947- 

Koolhaas, Rem. Delirious New York. New York: Oxford University Press, 
1978. 

. Interview in El Croquis. Special issue, vol. C3 (Madrid) (March 

1992). 

Laclau, Ernesto and Chantal Mouffe. Hegemony and Socialist Strategy. 

London: Verso, 1985. 
Lefaivre, Liane. "Dirty Realism in European Architecture Today." Design 

Book Review 17 (Winter 1989): 17—20. 
Lefebvre, Henri. The Production of Space. Oxford: Blackwell, 1991. 
Levi-Strauss, Claude. La geste d'Asdiwal. Paris: Imprimerie Nationale, 

19*8. 

Lippard, Lucy. Overlay. New York: Pantheon, 1983. 

Loos, Adolf. "Ornament and Crime." In L. Mttnz and G. Kuntsler, Adolf 

Loos: Pioneer of Modern Architecture. London: Thames and Hudson, 

1 966. 

Macherey, Pierre. A Theory of Literary Production. London: Routledge and 
Kegan Paul, 1978. 

Marcuse, Herbert. "On the Affirmative Character of Culture." In Nega- 
tions, trans, by Jeremy J. Shapiro. Boston: Beacon Press, 1968. 

Mayer, Arno. The Persistence of the Old Regime. New York: Pantheon, 
1 98 1 . 

Podoroga, Valery. "The Eunuch of the Soul: Positions of Reading and 

the World of Platonov." SAQ 90, no. 2 (Spring 1991): 357-408. 
Proust, Marcel. A la recherche du temps perdu. 4 vols. Paris: Bibliotheque 

de la Pleiade, 1987-1989. 
Rey, Pierre-Philippe. Les alliances de classes. Paris: Maspero, 1973. 
Robinson, Kim Stanley. Red Mars. New York: Bantam, 1993. 
Rorty, Richard. Philosophy and the Mirror of Nature. Princeton: Princeton 

University Press, 1980. 
Smith, Paul. Discerning the Subject. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota 

Press, 1988. 



graphy 210 

Tafuri, Manfredo. Architecture and Utopia. Cambridge: MIT Press, 
1976. 

Thompson, E. P. "Time, Work-Discipline, and Industrial Capitalism." 

Past and Present, vol. 38 (December 1967). 
Venturi, Robert, Denise Scott Brown, and Steven Izenour. Learning from 

Las Vegas. Cambridge: MIT Press, 1977. 
Virilio, Paul. War and Cinema. London: Verso, 1989. 
Wolf, Eric. Peasant Wars of the Twentieth Century. New York: Harper and 

Row, 1969. 

van Wolferen, Karel. The Enigma of Japanese Power. New York: Knopf, 
1989. 

Yakushev, Henryka. "Andrei Platonov's Artistic Model of the World." 
Russian Literature Triquarterly 16 (1979): 171 — 188. 



Index 



Adorno, T. W., 13, 40, 47, 189 
Albee, Edward, 17^ 
Althusser, Louis, 3, 16, 13 c, 

167, 174 
Ando, Tadao, 201 
Arendt, Hannah, 1 ^4 
Aristotle, 33, 36 
Attali, Jacques, 76 

Bakhtin, Mikhail, 23, 31, 108 
Ballard, J. G., 176 
Blazac, Honore de, 153 
Barthes, Roland, 16, 37, 180 
Bataille, Georges, 24 
Baudelaire, Charles, 12, 84, 86 
Beauvoir, Simone de, 34 
Benjamin, Walter, 184 
Bergson, Henri, 8 
Blade Runner (Ridley Scott, 
1982), 146, ijo, I5J, i£7 



Bloch, Ernst, 79 
Borie, Jean, 37 
Brecht, Bertolt, ij2 
Buford, Bill, 14^— ijo, 191 
Burger, Peter, 189 
Burke, Edmund, 31, ci 

Chandler, Raymond, icS 
Claudel, Paul, 89 
Coletti, Lucio, 2—3 
Collingwood, R. G., 37—39 
Confucius, 20, 49, i2j 
Critical Regionalism, 184, 189— 
204 

Delany, Samuel R., 28 
Deleuze, Gilles, 10, 22, 41, cc, 
138 

de Man, Paul, 3, 184 
Derrida, Jacques, 23, 38, 167 



dex 



212 



Descartes, Rene, ci 
Dewey, John, 38 
Dickens, Charles, 1 53 

Eagleton, Terry, 167—169 

Einstein, Albert, 69 

Eisenman, Peter, 142, 162—183, 

i8r, 188, 198 
Engels, Friedrich, 1 j 

Fanon, Frantz, 34 
FitzGerald, Frances, 12c 
Flaubert, Gustave, 35, 37, 84, 
1 60 

Ford, Henry, 40, 204 

Forster, E. M., 115 

Foster, Norman, 198, 200 

Foucault, Michel, 34 

Fourier, Charles, cc, C7, c8— C9, 

Frampton, Kenneth, 17c, 184, 

189—204 
Freud, Sigmund, 4, 7, 13, jg, 

169 

Fried, Michael, 197 
Fuss, Diana, 4c 

Galileo Galilei, 77 
Gehry, Frank, 144, 145, 157 
Gibson, William, ij£ 
Gide, Andre, xv 
Gramsci, Antonio, 6 c 
Graves, Michael, 164, 18c 
Gregotti, Vittorio, 196, 198 
Greimas, A. J., xiii 
Groys, Boris, 3 1 , £ 1 
Guha, Ranajit, 24 

Habermas, Jurgen, 43, 80 
Haraway, Donna, 138 



Harris, Harwell Hamilton, 192 
Hegel, G. W. F., xvi, j, 6, 

7, 13, 18, 131, 143, ice, 

ir6 

Heidegger, Martin, 34, 38, 77— 
78, 81, 8c, 86, 89, no, 197, 
198 

Hemingway, Ernest, 1 1 £ 
Hindess, Barry, and Paul Hirst, 

187-188 
Hirschman, A. O., 
Holland, Norman, 1 74 
Hugo, Victor, 1C3 
Huntington^ Samuel, 49 

Jacobs, Jane, 30 
Jencks, Charles, 164, 200 
Joyce, James, C4, 132, 138 
Junger, Ernst, 78 

Kafka, Franz, ^8, 79, 123—128 

Kahn, Louis, 186 

Kant, Immanuel, xvi, 2, 6, 8, 

ii, 16, 38, 39, 42, ci 
Karatani Kojin, 22 
Kepler, Johannes, 77 
Keynes, John Maynard, 14 
Kirkpatrick, Jeanne, 48 
Kojeve, Alexandre, 18, ic6 
Koolhaas, Rem, 57— c8, 60, 134— 

14c, 164, 180, 183, 18c, 188, 

198, 199 

Laclau, Ernesto, 43, 6j, 187— 

188, 202 
Lawrence, D. H., 164 
le Carre, John, 1^9 
Le Corbusier (Charles-Edouard 

Jeanneret), c 4 , 13c, 137, 144, 

146, ic 3 



213 



Lefaivre, Liane, 141;, ico, 189 
Lefebvre, Henri, 22 
Le Guin, Ursula, 28 
Levi-Strauss, Claude, 3, 23—24, 
86 

Lippard, Lucy, 174— 17 c. 
Loos, Adolf, 6, 31 
Luhmann, Niklas, 80 
Lukacs, Georg, 36, 43—44, 
1 20 

Lynch, David, 161 
Lyotard, Jean-Francois, 7, 35, 
43, 44 

Macherey, Pierre, 167—169 
Mallarme, Stephane, 36, J4, 

1 J9— 162 
Mandelbrot, Benoit, 181 
Mann, Thomas, 174 
Marcuse, Herbert, 1 24 
Marin, Louis, 70 
Marx, Karl, 2, 4, 13, 18, 27, 

29, 47, iS-cg, 62, 66, 69, 7c, 

83, l SS 
Mayer, Arno, 13, 39 
Mies van der Rohe, Ludwig, 36, 

132, 160 
Moneo, Rafael, 180 
Moore, Charles, 164, 1 8c— 186 
Morris, William, cc, 74 
Mouffe, Chantal, 43, 6g, 187— 

188, 202 

Nabokov, Vladimir, 147 
Newton, Isaac, 69 
Nietzsche, Friedrich, 13, 35, 38, 
184 

Orwell, George, c$, c8 



Parmenides, 16, 19 

Platonov, Andrei, xvi-xvii, 78- 

82, 1 1 1 — 1 13, 1 19— 1 22 
Proust, Marcel, 9, 12, 21, 132 

Rey, Pierre-Philippe, 26 
Ricoeur, Paul, 1 3 
Rimbaud, Arthur, 89 
Robinson, Kim Stanley, 65 
Rorty, Richard, 33, 38—39, 44, 

Rossi, Aldo, 186-187 
Rousseau, Jean-Jacques, 67, 126 
Runge, Philipp Otto, 22 
Russell, Bertrand, 182 

Sartre, Jean-Paul, 12, 33—34, 37, 

4°, 42-43, 61, 64 
Schlegel, Friedrich, 1 84 
Schoenberg, Arnold, 132, 181 
Semper, Gottfried, 197 
Smith, Paul, 45 
Solzhenitsyn, Aleksander, xvii 
Spinoza, Baruch, 69 

Tafuri, Manfredo, 13—14, 40 
Thompson, E. P., 84 
Tolstoy, Leo, 70 
Tzonis, Alexander, 1 89 

Utzon, Jorn, 200—201 

Valery, Paul, 8, c8 

Venturi, Robert, 13c, 141— 143, 

146, 180, 183, 18c, 186, 198 
Villiers de ITsle Adam, Auguste, 

9 

Virilio, Paul, 9—10 
Visconti, Luchino, 198 



dex 214 

c 




Wagner, Richard, 132, 159 
Wallerstein, Immanuel, 76 
Weber, Max, 23, 84—85 
Wells, H. G., ss 
Wilde, Oscar, 54 
Williams, Raymond, 28, 70, 

181, 199 
Wittgenstein, Ludwig, 6, 38 



Wolf, Eric, 192 
Wolferen, Karel van, 158 
Wright, Frank Lloyd, 132, 153 
194 

Yeats, William Butler, 39 
Zizek, Slavoj, 4, 76 



Photo Credits 



p. 136: Rem Koolhaas, La Bibliotheque de France 

(Office for Metropolitan Architecture) 

p. 137: Rem Koolhaas, La Bibliotheque de France 

(Office for Metropolitan Architecture) 

p. 139: Rem Koolhaas, Zeebrugge Sea Terminal 

(Office for Metropolitan Architecture) 

p. 140: Rem Koolhaas, Zeebrugge Sea Terminal 

(Office for Metropolitan Architecture) 

p. ic6: Blade Runner 

(Jerry Ohlinger's Movie Materials) 

pp. 170—73: Peter Eisenman, University Art 

Museum, California State University at Long Beach 

(Eisenman Architects) 

pp. 175—78: Peter Eisenman, Moving Arrows, Eros, 
and Other Errors (Romeo and Juliet project) 
(Eisenman Architects) 

p. 179: Peter Eisenman, Wexner Center for the 
Arts, Ohio State University, Columbus 
(Eisenman Architects; photo Wolfgang Hoyt) 
p. 191: Tadao Ando, Temple under Water, 
Tsuna-gun, Hyogo, Japan (Tadao Ando) 
p. 200: Tadao Ando, Church of the Light, 
Osaka, Japan (Tadao Ando) 



Designer: 
Text: 
Compositor: 
Printer: 
Binder: 



Teresa Bonner 
Perpetua 
Maple- Vail 
Maple- Vail 
Maple- Vail 



Fredric Jameson continues his investigation of postmodernism under 
late capitalism in The Seeds of Time. In three parts Jameson presents the 
problem of Utopia, attempting to diagnose the cultural present and to 
open a perspective on the future of a world that is all but impossible to 
predict with any certainty— "a telling of the future," as Jameson calls it, 
"with an imperfect deck." 

"Jameson's approach remains a Mallarmean Marxism that glides just 
above the clutter of the empirical, lucidly and accurately swooping down 
to isolate chosen particulars of cultural data for placement in an intricate 

and unexpected critical 'syntax' The implicit subject of The Seeds of 

Time is timely indeed: our collective failure of historical imagination." 

— The Nation 



FREDRIC JAMESON is Distinguished Professor of Comparative 
Literature at Duke University. He is the author of numerous works, 
including The Prison-House of Language, The Political Unconscious, The 
Ideologies of Theory (two volumes), Marxism and Form, and the prize- 
winning book, Postmodernism; or, The Cultural Logic of Late Capitalism. 

Wellek Library Lectures 

Printed in U.SA. 

Columbia University Press • New York 



isbn D-Eai-aaosT-x 




9 78023 1 "080590 



i=|=i B^t^W^uRI wengewang.orcji 



